Yeah, that's what I'm trying now.

But I'm getting "ehhh..."

I don't know anyone of extensive means. Maybe they could cobble together $5k/$10k, but even doing that would be onerous and take time, so there isn't much excitement on their end.

I'm grappling with the post-excitement cool down of realizing I'm a short hurdle away from a major gain that will probably get scooped up by someone else before I get my act together.
Boy are the numbers to be believed, that's why I'm so excited/ crushed. 

No need for a mortgage, it's all cash.

But who are these people? "Hard money lenders"... are you talking like the mob? I know I can't take this situation to a bank and get any interest or quick turn around, so what kind of people are you talking about?

**edit**: so I learned about this thing called Google, and found this:

http://nypost.com/2014/09/16/new-york-state-starts-probe-of-hard-money-lenders/

&gt;Ben Lawsky\u2019s New York Department of Financial Services has opened a probe into nine New York lenders he claims can take over a borrower\u2019s home if a single payment is late.

&gt;The probe into so-called \u201chard money\u201d lending \u2014 which uses hard assets, such as real estate as collateral \u2014 focuses on a sector that usually doesn\u2019t run credit checks and appears to focus on distressed borrowers.

Yeah so that's pretty hard core. I'm a little bit late and they take everything. Wow.

I am desperate... but with excitement for gain, not survival, so this would be a pretty big plunge.

But thanks for the solid tip! TIL

I will go to biggerpockets.com

I am already reading up on hard lending now from my previous Google search.

I'm new to this, I didn't even know this world existed.

But I do fit the niche because I don't need a large amount of money in relation to the value of the purchase, and the property is a solid piece of collateral for the lender. It's a limited set of conditions, but I am happy to see there exists a financial world here.

That being said, I am exposing myself to heavy risk if I miss a payment. I see no reason why I would, but it's a serious consideration.

I'm going to read some more, take a deep breath, and think long and hard about what I might be getting into.

But sincerely, thank you for your solid tip.
It's pop psychology but it's True: anger tends to consume people closer to you rather than your "enemy."

Until you eventually consume yourself.

The right today functions on anger and outrage. As far as principles and values and ideology, it's all underpinned by this anger.

The right is eating itself.&gt;Legend has it that the horrible demon still roams the graveyard from time to time, hoping to make innocent heads roll... or maybe it\u2019s just the ghost of Leona Helmsley, whose remains are also interred at Sleepy Hollow Cemetery.

*(golfclap)*
it is

but Washington Irving picked real people he knew, modified their personalities and backgrounds somewhat, and concocted this tale

like Keyser Soze in "The Usual Suspects": pick random details around you and fabricate an engrossing narrative

good writing

ps: the article says Washington Irving himself is also buried in the same cemetery now. he has to spend eternity close to some of the people he abstracted into his story. does he get complaints?And some seriously argue we need guns or more guns in schools.

For me, at this point, it's like an intelligence test. If you think yet more guns means less deaths and less tragedy, you fail a simply test of logic and reason.

Gabby Giffords was surrounded by lots of armed people and trained professionals on the side of good in gun loving Tucson that tragic day. They were all interviewed after her shooting. No one shot and prevented the tragedy. Because the situation was too confusing and fluid and a target could not be acquired with certainty and a clear angle.

Guns do not protect against shooting. A crazy person will shoot, and not be deterred, because they are crazy. And no one will shoot back in time. Because the crazy person has the element of surprise on their side and there is not enough reaction time to ascertain who is a good guy and who is a bad guy in a fluid confusing situation. Multiple tragedies are already done is seconds. There is no magic man or woman who is in the right place and right time on full alert 24/7 with eyes in the back of their heads who can reach for his or her gun and shoot back in time (and not get shot as he or she reaches: the element of surprise is not on their side).

To believe otherwise is... stupid. Not a baseless insult. An objective appraisal of your reasoning capacities to think about the situational facts and the tactical landscape and not figure out what happens in reality. To think adding more guns will reduce shootings is simply... dumb. Objectively, dumb. I'm not a diplomat or a politician, I don't have to sugarcoat it. You're a dumb person, objectively you are a low intelligence person, if you think about the situation of your average surprise mass gun shooting and think adding more guns make it less likely. I'm not engaging in empty insults, the truth is we are dealing with dumb people on this topic. Like creationists or antivaxxers or climate change deniers. Some people will just cling to nonsense beliefs in spite of all evidence.

I challenge anyone who says I am "not being nice." Do we have to wait for every single person to arrive at reality before we proceed? Why do we have to suffer 10, 20, 100 more mass shootings because a few people in the back of the classroom won't accept reality? We can't be nice. We are faced with constant tragedies. We're talking about deaths here, and we can't do anything about them because correcting the issue is blocked by people who are, objectively, on this issue, dumb.

You cannot think about the tactics and the strategy and arrive at a realistic appraisal of what actually happens if you believe adding more guns will somehow reduce tragedies. It will increase tragedies. It's not a debate. This is the Rock of Gibraltar reality. Proof: the USA in 2015, as compared to its social and economic peers, who have nowhere remotely near the level of carnage we do.

1. Climate change is real.
2. We evolved from monkeys.
3. Vaccines do not cause autism and do prevent disease.
4. And more guns simply means more pointless deaths, nothing else.

These are all undebateable, solid facts of the reality we live in. Of course some people believe otherwise. And? Because of them we must not teach evolution, not have vaccinations, not combat CO2 emissions and not control guns? Because of the idiots? (Again, not a baseless insult, this is exactly what you are, objectively, if you think more guns solves the problem.)

The argument is over. Those of us who can think and reason are just waiting for the rest of the USA to catch up to reality on the topic. We need more gun control. We simply cannot stand these constant shootings because guns are so easy to get by crazy people.

"When guns are outlawed..."

No one is outlawing guns. We just want to make it harder for crazy people to get them. Some of the loopholes are insane and disgusting. If you are an actual responsible person, you will still get a gun, you just have to jump through a few more hoops. That inconvenience is a bigger problem for you than the current status quo of constant shooting tragedies in the USA? Then you're not a *responsible* gun owner, no matter if you say you are.
You're cherry picking half-assed stilted "facts."

It is beyond debate. All facts point to more guns means more deaths. There is no more argument.

Like an antivaxxer, like a creationist, like a climate change denier, you cling to tiny half truth propaganda factoids to deny the simple reality of your world.

You're cherry picking half-assed stilted "facts."

It is beyond debate. All facts point to more guns means more deaths. There is no more argument.

Like an antivaxxer, like a creationist, like a climate change denier, you cling to tiny half truth propaganda factoids to deny the simple reality of your world.

**edit**: In less than a minute, I get a zero vote. I did not down vote you.

It says "this is not a disagree button". That shows you what people who deny reality engage in. Intellectually dishonest people who bury and avoid truth.
Are you going to downvote my comment?

"This is not a disagree button."

The USA has a huge gun violence problem. fact

http://www.statcan.gc.ca/pub/85-002-x/2014001/article/11925-eng.htm#a4

It needs national gun control. Local gun control doesn't mean anything, you go 15 minutes outside town and get your gun. fact

http://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2013/01/29/us/where-50000-guns-in-chicago-came-from.html

This is intellectual charity for you. I do not owe it to you to describe the basics of the reality you live in. We are waiting for you to catch up.

We live in a horrible state of gun violence in the USA because guns are too easy to get. It is not possible to be a moderately intelligent and moderately informed person and think otherwise.

What we have is intellectually dishonest people who cherry pick propaganda that takes numbers out of context and without the whole and obvious truth to support woefully wrong notions that conflicts with simple reality.

Just like dealing with a creationist, an antivaxxer, or a climate change denier.

It's not possible to have a rational conversation with someone who denies simple and obvious reality.
It's a lot easier to survive or avoid a knifing than a shooting.

Denying the fact that guns make killing super easy, and that fact matters, is not intellectually honest.
If we had no laws against DUI, there would certainly be more DUIs. 

People would drink more, care about driving drunk less, and shit happens.

The point of gun control is not prevent everything, just reduce the pointless deaths by making guns harder for crazy people to get.

"When guns are outlawed..."

Nobody wants to outlaw guns. Just get rid of the insane loopholes.

We have laws against murder and rape, but we still have murder and rape. Therefore we shouldn't have laws against murder and rape? The best we can do is minimize murder and rape. And that's worth doing.

The point is to minimize the tragedy. Which we can easily do by closing really disgusting loopholes in acquiring guns.
Which is a simple fact.

And you get downvoted.

Amazing the level of denial.
Muslim countries where alcohol is prohibited are not exactly pictures of peaceful tranquility.

Meanwhile, countries with extreme alcohol abuse and binge drinking problems, like in Northern Europe, also control guns better than the USA, and have far less violent deaths than the USA.

The truth is the exact opposite of your comment.
But that's a different point that has nothing to do with your previous comment.

Altercations that are trending towards violent murderous conflict will end up in actual murder a lot more if someone has a gun, versus if someone has a knife, or fists, car, etc.
It is a weird derangement, isn't it?

So many Americans (and I am one) have this automatic kneejerk attitude about guns and gun control that completely contradicts simple reality on the topic.

It's almost like a quasireligious belief, completely beyond all facts and reason.

We're in for a lot more mass shootings and senseless deaths.

We're held hostage in this country by the insane derangement of so many Americans, just like the blind denial of antivaxxers and creationists (with their "facts"), denying the simple truth that easy access to guns simply means more senseless deaths, not more protection.

Proof is simply the experiences of all our social and economic peers: UK, Canada, Australia, Japan, Switzerland (yes, that gun lovers love to cite Switzerland without looking at their actual laws), etc..
Just like an antivaxxer or a creationist with their "facts".

Talk to someone from UK, Canada, Australia, Japan, etc.

Good luck to you, you need it.

The deranged denial is off the charts.
Guns make the job of killing easier. The lethality of guns matters.

I simply cannot fathom a person who does not understand nor accepts that simple reality.

&gt;country wide ALL violent crime is down

So you are minimizing the problem, or saying we don't have a problem.

Really?

http://www.statcan.gc.ca/pub/85-002-x/2014001/article/11925-eng.htm#a4

It's like "the house next door has 10 termites, and we have 10,000 termites. But we had 11,000 termites last year so everything is great now."
Ok, so you accept that Australia is doing better than the USA. And they did it by confiscating guns.

And you are saying... we shouldn't solve our problem?

What?

We obviously need better gun control. You even admit it works. But you stand against that. Because...
Oops

You're right. That's impressive.

it's almost like there's this rabid downvote brigade against gun control.

And then the great mass of sane people notices the conversation.

Because there was an immediate and severe dip. Then a follow up rise.

The point is, intellectually dishonest people (antivaxxers, climate change deniers, creationists, gun control opponents) are steeped in denial about reality. So it explains their kneejerk immediate downvotes. Denial in action.
I am not that smart. There is plenty of topics I do not know about and am an idiot on.

But on the topic of gun control, I am certainly smarter and more accepting of basic facts about reality than many Americans.

There is an amazingly huge clot of denial on this topic in the USA. It is stunning how willfully people deny the obvious actually.
I think we should make plutonium legal myself. Prohibition shows absolutely every single topic of government control is wrong.

Controlling access to alcohol failed, so absolutely every regulation is wrong.

Where's my RPG? Where's my ricin? My freedom!
He could have

But be certain many took him seriously at face value.

Do not underestimate the amazing denial around gun control when it comes to Americans.
So if we make guns easy for anyone to get, this means violent murders will go down?

Sorry, I'm just so brainwashed.
Actually yes

Crazy people have social problems and problems with basic cognitive functioning and simple planning. Most will not not successfully fill out the paperwork or even seek it.

And imagine them going to illegal dealers. Like the guy who shot up the movie theatre or the one who shot Gabby Giffords. Are these people you think can successfully find, navigate, and conclude a sale on the black market?

That's the point of gun control. Make guns harder to get for crazies and hot heads. Who genuinely are not trying very hard in life, because they can't or they won't. Such people, denied guns, simply and actually do not get guns. We are not dealing with criminal masterminds here.

In fact criminal masterminds will always get guns. And use them *wisely*, not shoot up discos or shopping malls because a girl looked them funny.

Proof:

https://www.washingtonpost.com/blogs/worldviews/wp/2013/02/01/british-gangs-use-flare-guns-now-because-they-cant-find-real-ones/

&gt;we need better gun control, not just more gun control

You think I'm like some cartoon villain who wants to limit your rights just for shits and giggles?

Of course I only want to make it harder for crazies and hot heads to get guns. That's all gun control measures are.

Why does that mean, in some minds, that I'm here to rape your freedom just for fun because I like denying freedom because that's just the kind of guy I am?

"We should close the loopholes..."

"AUTHORITARIAN STATIST WANTS TO DENY ALL GUNS!"

what. the. fuck.

The hysterical derangement is off the charts.


You didn't call me a moron and I never said you did.

I also never mentioned gun show loopholes at all.

You need to have a conversation with the actual human being in front of you rather than the made up propaganda talking points in your head.

I also asked you a question you avoided and didn't answer.

Very telling.

It's not freedom that people hate.

It's people who think freedom means freedom from responsibility that is the real problem.
"Hey guys our neighbors have 1 thousand termites in their houses, while we have 10 thousand termites. But last year we had 11 thousand so everything is going great!"owning a gun is a responsibility. if you aren't responsible with it, it isn't a protection, it's a source of tragedy for your loved ones. do you think everyone who gets a gun is a responsible person?
We also have laws against murder and rape. We still have murder and rape.

Are you saying we should have no laws against murder and rape because those still happen?

The point is to minimize problems. That problems still happen doesn't mean we should stop doing that.
You compared guns to cars. I continued your analogy. So you're arguing against your own analogy.

Make up your mind.

Until you do, realize that guns are a responsibility, and getting a gun is too easy in the USA, and so too many guns get in the hands of completely irresponsible pieces of shit, who then create tragedy.

I love the Second Amendment. It begins "A well regulated militia..."

Well-regulated in 21st century speak means well-trained. So, let's make sure people are well-trained, shall we? Just like the fucking founders intended. Isn't that amazing?

The Second Amendment got hijacked last century by judicial activists who thought Dirty Harry was a constitutional principal. I think we should reverse that wrongful judicial activism, and get back to the True intent of the Founding Fathers, don't you agree?

And we shall.

Happens with presidents too.

Obama for example goes to a news conference with the leader of a small friendly nation and says the same prepackaged compliments over and over.

A journalist in Denmark found out that the nice compliments for their leader was just the same tired shit he had said to many other leaders of small allies:

https://youtu.be/x5hmqDuuCRk

If I were president I'm not going to take the time to find the perfect witty thing to say for each country. I'm going to say the same weak haha when standing with the leader of the philippines as when I am standing with the leader of denmark.

Because who has the time?

Although he should have state dept speech writers who care.


Basically you've moved beyond being a cinephile.

Now you're an aesthete. The movie itself is no longer your paramount concern, the movie going *experience* is your paramount concern.

And again, that's fine! There's nothing wrong with that.

But don't pretend it is essential. It's just a whole other thing.

There's nothing wrong with it. It's just not part of the movie. I'd rather just watch the damn movie without all the emperors new clothes gimmicks.

If you enjoy the gimmicks, I'm happy for you. Enjoy it. But don't say it is intrinsic to the experience of watching the movie. If it's not on the screen and not on the audio track it's not part of the movie. It's just extraneous fluff, hype.

&gt;And you've moved out of argument and into pigeonholing me into set criteria.

no, i'm defining the actual subject matter in question. that's not pigeonholing that's understanding what the topic of discussion is. you can't change the topic at will and still think you have a coherent point

i'm talking about movies

you're talking about movies, plus something else

you can't make a valid point by confusing two different concepts. the criteria actually matters. two people talking about two different things past each other has no purpose or usefulness
you can't have a coherent useful discussion if you can't agree on the terms

if i see a movie on my laptop on a bus, and you see the movie in full immersion IMAX, we've both seen the same movie

you have a different movie *experience*. which is an entirely different topic

you can't say to me "because it was just on a laptop, you haven't seen the movie properly"

no. a movie is the narrative story. that's the shared experience. my movie experience is somehow not less than yours. you can't go "oh, you didn't have the rumble seat or the intermission, so you really didn't see the movie as intended"

no. all these bells and whistles you are talking about is extra. another topic

you can't redefine the act of seeing a movie as the aesthetics of the movie experience itself and still think it makes sense
a big company is a big company is a big company

everyone wants authentic

and everyone wants convenience, quality, consistency, and low prices

you can't have both
yes, the point is to avoid revolutions

which means having fair and just social policies

so don't complain about the murder

complain about the policies that made murder preferable to the masses compared to a life made miserable by unjust policies
well what's better than offering cheap inauthentic stuff to people who believe they are getting authentic?

offering them expensive inauthentic stuff
you underestimate the amount of stupid people
american conservatives aren't pro-business

they are pro-cronyism and plutocracy

the dumb ones think they are pro-business but they elect people that rob them for the sake of entrenched financial parasites that have nothing to do with capitalism. exactly as they speak with great glory of "capitalism"

as an american, i loathe and despise the conservative morons in this country

but why don't you start providing for your own security, and not just token forces

then you don't need to complain to or care about the usa

and if you say "well it's hard to get that change in my country..."

agreed. and now you know what we in the usa are dealing with 

don't shame and attack your allies

to add:

you can make nuclear fusion in your garage

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PSCQJFhqY-k

it's called a farnsworth reactor. same guy who invented television

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fusor#Work_at_Farnsworth_Television_labs

the problem is:

1. how much energy are you putting in?
2. how much energy are you getting out?

currently our fusion reactors use more energy than they create

it is a very long, very difficult road to get one that produces more energy than it consumes, for a sustained period of time, to the point we can depend upon the technology for our energy needs

but:

all glory, all accolades, permanent mark in history, to the man or woman or team who succeeds in doing just that. because it will change literally everything in our lives
no, you actually get fusion reactions. radiation. reaction products. the works

it's just probability: the achieved reaction rates are incredibly low, super tiny

http://www.popsci.com/science/article/2010-06/deuterium-diy-man-builds-homemade-nuclear-fusion-reactor-brooklyn

but you can indeed get isolated reactions in a home built set up
she should know that you can 9 women working together to produce a baby in 1 month

so for triplets you can get 27 women working together for 1 month

or 9 women working together for 3 months
i am a cynic about statism

i am a statistic
yup, that's where they got his name from!

apparently the real farnsworth in real life was this really wonky guy

not so much a stereotype as an archetype of the supernerd
&gt;you know you'd be all over the place in case of war for your own sake.

you're very good at looking a gift horse in its mouth

I don't know if any mods are reading this but this just creates a Streisand Effect. For better or worse when you block someone's access to something, even as minor as this, it creates in people a desire to go there, such that the effect of blocking the sub has the reverse effect of everyone wanting go there. Human psychology.

I agree that sub is disgusting and pathetic, but let people go there and see for themselves.

Additionally, you give them the cachet that they are so potent that you have to block them. It makes them seem more credible than they really are.

Don't give them that credibility. Let people go there and see for themselves what a sick joke they are.why can't reddit just fix that automatically? any brigading should be easy to spot:

1. a link
2. shortly later a surge of downvotes of people with the previous url in their reddit history

warn, then suspend all accounts with that combinationfair enoughalright, i understand

the shame is that reddit can't write an automatic system for catching brigading, and save you guys the effort

since subs like that are full of lowlifes, reddit could decimate the number of low character people that visit those subs after just a few brigades
some people submit to aggression. depression and helplessness, seeing this family dynamic growing up and thinking it's just the way it is, economic/ emotional coercion and manipulation, guilt, etc

we all think we will leave. some of us can't. it seems pretty horrible
well if someone insults a person about something unrelated, that has nothing to do with their sex, race, or religion, and they babble about their sex, race, or religion, then yeah, that's fucking lame and hypocritical

but if someone insults a person *because* of their race, sex, religion, then they're just a fucking douchebag. no matter what your ideology
politics and ideology are nowhere near as important as your race, your sex, or your religion

your ideas about economics are not your intrinsic identity

to insult you for that is just not a big deal, and should not be a big deal to you

go ahead and insult a liberal. if they freak out, look how silly they seem. now think about that if someone insults your politics

perspective
your political beliefs are not as vital to you as your sex or your race

if you don't understand that, we're done here
weirdly:

the root word of "slave" in english is "slav"

&gt;Origin of SLAVE

&gt;Middle English sclave, from Anglo-French or Medieval Latin; Anglo-French esclave, from Medieval Latin sclavus, from Sclavus Slavic; from the frequent enslavement of Slavs in central Europe during the early Middle Ages

&gt;First Known Use: 14th century

http://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/slave
changing your skin color or your genitalia is far, far, far away from changing your mind about an economic idea. to put those two things on the same level is grossly intellectually dishonest
It's his costume.

Looks cool, is actually restrictive.

Should have gone with the tactical turtleneck.Why are they always blowing up the same bridges in NYC?
That's... kind if weak in the "fuck you" dept. 

I mean if they were holding dildos.

Or holding chickens and wearing PVC S&amp;M outfits.

Now we're talking "fuck you."

This is more of a "I do say good chap, shall we have a little bit of a chuckle this morning? Oh this will surely twist mum's britches!" 

It's just that I think a lot people are not getting it because "upset our parents" implies a level of subversion. This is just quirky and absurd. Which is fine! It just works on a different level of funny that is not what people are expecting from the title of this post.there's nothing wrong with it, it's a great picture

the problem is the title of the post

the picture is quirky, but the title makes us expect subversion
absolutely, the picture is funny and quirky, nothing wrong with it

it's the *title* of the post that is problem. it misleads with the "upset our parents"

that implies subversion. that implies ANARCHY IN THE UK FUCK THE USA BLAAAARGH

not light hearted whimsy. which this is. which is fine



It's possible to have both. That is, a corrupt autocratic plutocracy, and genuine religious nutbag villains. Just because the nutbag villains hate the plutocracy doesn't make them innocent or victims of propaganda smearmongering. They also want to kill regular people.

You can dislike both. You don't have to like one and dislike the other. False choice.They also say it's a mental health problem and not a gun problem.

But then they don't want to fund  mental health initiatives.

These same people also overlap strongly with the crowd that calls themselves "pro life."As an American it sickens and disgusts me beyond belief. Guns are the threat, not a protection. I understand this, many if not most Americans understand this. And we are very frustrated with the inability to get legislation on the topic.

I apologize to the world. This and our inability to get universal healthcare is beyond funny, it's pathetic and revolting.Then there's something wrong with reddit and this sub. The existence of the problem everywhere doesn't mean there's no problem.

This sub is overrun with antisemitic and antiamerican posts. This doesn't mean you can't have articles critical of the usa or jews/ israel, but these topics always get voted up and the comments are always the same crap. The analysis isn't deep or interesting, it's just empty hate.

Then you could say "then unsubscribe."

I may. Many others already have. So all you are left with is this zombie partisan drek.

So there is a real problem.You're talking about trump. The actual "fascist" govt is run by a guy whose press secy just said trump is unfit to be president.Are you talking about the superman cartoon panel or the jihadi beheading ronald?If it's a practical effects costume they should put telescoping tubes where those big support tendons are, or whatever they are called.

Because it kind of takes away from the illusion of monstrous powerful villainy... to have a guy who looks handicapped from a whiplash injury and in need of physical therapy.you're doing work. that's not education. yes, you learn something, but you are still owed something for doing the work. education is actual teaching for the sake of learning, not so someone else benefits economically
and you should be paid for it. every single job can be called "education." if someone derives economic benefit form your effort, they owe you pay. actual education is learning for the sake of learning, not "uh... yeah, education, that's it" so some asshole can get free labor
because it means only the rich can be ushered into certain jobs

everyone else needs to pay rent, so they need a paying job

so they wind up working jobs as waiters, while the rich can afford the expensive entry (which is what unpaid internships are) into the nice job

the idea is to have a meritocracy

but unpaid internships create and reinforce a classist society, where only the rich can afford to work for "free" to get the jobs that hold actual power

your problem is you look at the relationship in a vacuum, as if it has no effects on society, when it does

Someone is doing **work** for you. you owe them. If some rich asshole goes "I'll do it for free to get the fast track" that's not meritocracy that's classism.

The relationship does not exist by itself. It has an effect on society.

An employer OWES you for doing work. Any dodge around that represents a cheat because someone is rich.

That society is no longer a meritocracy.
 If I derive economic benefit from you doing something it is not an education. It is a job. What is difficult about that simple concept to you?If you go to a school you pay them to learn

If you do a job that someone derives an **economic benefit** from they pay you

What's complicated that you don't understand?"I'm interested in helping nature, that's why I'm selling these elephant tusks"

It doesn't fucking matter what you're interested in if you're actions are actually harmful.Thabk you for the frightening glimpse into a dystopian corporatocracy future and the bullshit rationale it would push.

I'm a slave until some asshole decides I have worth according to their metrics?

Reality: If you work for someone, they pay you. Is that really difficult for you to understand?More like "The emperors new clothes""let me modify your analogy, thinking this Noneifies your point"

i am not sure why you are being intellectually dishonest, but you are only announcing yourself as not worthy of interaction
that's not the employee's problemgiving him a first hand experience of the last thing roadkill sees, the bumper of a truck
that wasn't the argument i made

it helps to listen to what someone actually says, and respond to that, rather than substitute the bs that only exists in your head. if you're going to do that, you don't even need to get out of bed to argue with yourself
i made my point. you didn't counteract it, you changed the subjectYou changed the analogy you social retard. Which doesn't prove anything except that you think a subject change makes a point. Answer the point I am making. You can't. You apparently can only confuse simple concepts.my analogy is clear. you can't do something that harms a concept, even if you mistakenly believe it helps a concept

then you started babbling about raising elephants for slaughter, which is really awesome dude, but has fucking nothing to do with the fucking topic

i'm not interested in arguing about elephant farms with you, i wish to prove you wrong on the actual topic, which i apparently did if the best you can do is argue about fucking elephant farms

please. educate me. tell me how your elephant farm is analogous to the issue of unpaid internships. i'm waiting for your enlightenment of my horribly stupid self

this should be good

perhaps you want to slaughter the interns. not bad in that case if you're a pure social darwinist
This is what I'm talking about. You're CHANGING THE SUBJECT asshole. The issues is UNPAID INTERNSHIPS. You don't know what the fuck you're talking about."we will pay you nothing to do this job, which you can afford to do because you're rich. no one middle class or poor can afford to do this job for nothing, because they need to pay rent"

that's the fucking topic. do you understand moron?

you don't even know enough about the topic to make a valid judgment

it must be fun to live in a universe where you can subject change at will and speak authoritatively about shit you don't even understand. unfortunately this universe only exists in your head
war spending is a huge financial topic but so called "small government" "economically conservative" republicans always seem to have a massive blind spot on that topic, as if such spending doesn't exist or doesn't count, exactly as they are the ones championing shelling out trillions for it, when much of it can certainly count as needless

the whole iraq war not only needless, but extremely wasteful (of lifves as well, let's not forget) and strategically stupid

even republicans say so and it's a topic in this year's GOP nomination process, nevermind the democrats

to illustrate their hypocrisy on the topic of small governmentthese positions do not exist without people rich to be able to take them. these intern positions are jobs that fast track to powerful positions. rather than empty nepotism, they call it an internship that no one can afford but the rich. so it is classism

if you don't pay someone for doing a job, how they are paying rent? how are they paying for food?

thinkyup, he's dead

it's kind of like speeding 100 mph on the highway all the time

people can talk about how they never crash, and have been doing it for months

but it's obviously not a stable situation, and a crash is coming, no matter how much they think they are fooling us, or fooling themselves about "long term high-functioning recreational heroin use": it's a shortcut to death

you can't maintain a job and a relationship and an addiction to a serious drug at the same time

so yeah, they would start screwing up their lives

people always harp on the societal/ legal failures when it comes to treating highly addictive drugs. they always seem to forget the actual fucking highly addictive drug is still the real problem
which is doing wonders for their heart, and never threatens to spiral out of control /s

seriously, it's just like "i've been speeding 100 mph and never got in a crash"

if you can't see any risk to using a highly addictive substance, you have a serious problem and you don't know it yet, that's the best that can be said for you
well said. i have an imperfect analogy

it's the best i can do to communicate the denial and sketchy rationalization to people of taking a huge risk and acting like there's no risk at all
and i'm certain there are people who really can speed 100 mph all the time and never crash. we should consider legality and your capacity for risk only in regards to the insanely far out statistical outliers?

hey, i know a guy who can climb mountains without rope

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yRoFQUdUL7E

therefore, no one should need ropes when climbing mountains. that's logic, right?

...and bacon?! you want to consider heroin as deadly and dangerous as bacon?! your analogy meter is broken bro
"there's other dangerous drugs so this dangerous drug can be considered safe"

sterling logic

&gt;If every country legalized every drug, and offered help instead of hate I really doubt most people would become hardcore drug addicts. 

of course everyone needs healthcare instead of jail. that doesn't change the fact the problem is still taking the fucking highly addictive drug! no matter if society is welcoming arms or moronic hate, the problem is still taking a highly addictive substance ruining your fucking life

because the problem is gee, i dunno basic fucking biochemistry?!

the scary denial is off the charts with you. get help
obviously many in society with their ignorant hate and much of the legal framework is completely fucked up

addicts need healthcare, not jail

but pinning the problem with drugs on society's and the law's attitude towards drug is incredibly stupid, the actual addiction to the substance is still the actual fucking problem. whether society is open arms, or moronic hate, that's secondary to the real problem. that's my point

i don't understand people who think the problem with highly addictive drugs is just society's attitude. the drug itself is still the problem
"this incredibly fucking stupid addiction is legal, so therefore this other incredibly fucking stupid illegal addiction should be ok"

sterling logic

how about BOTH are wrong, and yes the legality is fucked up

therefore, because the law is fucked up, you should ruin your life? wtf?

you have the logic ass fucking backwards. avoid both stupidities, regardless of how fucked up society's attitudes are
no one can use a highly addictive drug just fine

it's called basic fucking biochemistry

it's science, like gravity. no one jumps up and floats away. likewise, no one is wired to not be addicted to something like heroin. it's the basis of our fucking reward pathway in the brain. it overwhelms it, 100% of human brains, no human brain is wired differently on this topic, or they are surely an incredibly bizarre mutant outlier

you're basing your attitude on anecdotal evidence, like hearing about someone who knew someone who maybe saw a unicorn once

howabout basing your attitude on the fucking reality of human brain biochemistry instead of some stupid rumor of someone who probably DID maintain use and a life for awhile (but you don't hear about the eventual crash, that didn't make it into the stupid anecdote)
analogies. you fail. if you don't understand why that analogy doesn't work, stop. rethinkyes, healthcare, not jail, i agree

that doesn't change the fact that using highly addictive drugs are going to ruin your life. whatever problems you had before you are making multiples worse. the point, no matter what the legality, is don't use these fucking drugs

if you fuck up and you do, we will help you, not jail you. still the point is to get you OFF the mistake
there's always stupid people, you can't protect them from themselves

and we should help them get off their mistake, not jail them

but the message never changes that highly addictive substances is clearly a mistake

because some people are so stupid they still commit the mistake we should lie about the simple truth?

"jumping off a cliff is stupid"

"uh sir, for saying that, some people choose to jump off the cliff"

"ok then, tell people jumping off cliffs is awesome"

what?

no one can. you are increasing the risk of massive problems in your job and relationship by using drugs. it's simply a matter of time, no matter what idiot you can point to who treaded water the longest with iron bars tied to his ankles

i really don't understand the point of this insane denial and twisted rationalization that fucking up your mental coherence and lucidity will never have any downsides or problems. it's truly bizarre. and even if you can find some far out statistical outlier, it's like "we should totally base personal and social and legal attitude on these incredibly far out statistical outliers, rather than 99.999% of experiences, even if the outliers are True and not distorted"

but the point is still to get them off the drugs, right?

we should provide help, healthcare, not jail, i agree

but the point is still: get off the fucking highly addictive drug, because that is still the actual mistake, regardless of how screwed up society's attitude is
nice bullshit rationalization, and ignoring all other problemsyes: healthcare, not jail

but the point is still to get people off the drug. that never changes. because taking the highly addictive drug is still the actual fucking problem, no matter how screwed up or helpful society is on the topic

yes, regularly screwing up your mental coherence and lucidity has absolutely zero effect on your relationships and job performance, oh yeah, totally /s
i used to work AIDS healthcare outreach on the lower east side in the early 1990s. before retrovirals and gentrification. i know what hard drugs do to people's lives. i've seen the wreckage of once promising and great lives, and the broken shells they've become

completely blind denial like yours is nothing new to me
but it was actually 11001000 years agowell saidor we can do what they are doing right, like universal healthcare. they pay 1/100th or less what we pay and live longer and healthier. because they can control the prices. in the usa we pay for financial parasites that don't add to the system and just siphon off money for no extra value

our social and economic peers, with universal care, single payer, pay 1/100th or less what we pay in healthcare and live longer and healthier

our financial parasites system means extra costs to line some asshole's pocket who adds nothing to the systemor just dumb

it always gets me downvotes but it's True: there's a lot of stupid people out there who talk about what they don't even understand and haven't thought about enough to even be coherent from one issue to the next. they just react to propaganda from "trusted" meadia sources and certain lying talking heads, demagoguesso you want single payer, universal healthcare because that's the only way you can control costs

all of our social and economic peers pay 1/100th or less than we do for healthcare and live longer and healthier lives. because they aren't feeding financial parasites in the system that add nothing to getting people healthy

but you'll never get that with a large part of congress corrupted and paid for by the insurance companies, or ideological morons who hate anything obama does and oppose reform because "communism"

so the ACA is a mess. it's a first tiny step in the right direction, but we need to go 100 more miles in that direction before we experience real relief. and we won't get it because of the corrupt in congress  and the ideological morons in congress and all of he propagandized dumb people out there who don't fucking understand the topic and react to the scaremongering on their propaganda channels paid for by the entrenched financial parasites

i never understood this braindead attitude where the only systems in the world are social darwinistic capitalism, and communism

nothing in between

when of course there are thousands of systems in between. in fact the richest and happiest countries in the world, the nordic countries, pretty well balance social safety nets and capitalism. that's actually the ideal society

but if you view everything as capitalism and communism, nothing else, your ideology and philosophy is childish and facile. you haven't given an intellectually honest thought to the subject matter you inject your uneducated opinion into. you're a propaganda victim

this not a baseless insult

you present it as binary: capitalism or communism. when it obviously isn't binary. there are thousands of shades in between, in fact, the best system most definitely is not pure capitalism. objectively, as a function of the most successful societies today, and their economic and political systems

but because it is not pure dog-eat-dog capitalism, you have to call it communism. because those are the only two extremes you understand. you're a simpleton, an ignorant on the topicexcept that progress is real and it exists

we are richer and healthier than we've ever been

there is injustice in the distribution of the fruits of our labors, but we shall fix that
So they are going to get rid of universal healthcare? Generous work hours and vacations? Free daycare and maternity leave?

Go on, educate idiot me.So this is the us healthcare system:

https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/wonk/wp/2013/03/26/21-graphs-that-show-americas-health-care-prices-are-ludicrous/

It's not a free market and never will be, because things like oncologists and hospitals are natural monopolies:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Natural_monopoly

But when you make believe this is a free market the players simply gouge as much as they can because there is no natural market discipline over prices.

The solution is to treat it like highways or fire departments: government paid for, which allows for price discipline. Such as japan, germany, uk, canada... every sane fucking country that spends 1/100th what we do and has healthier longer lives. But we can't have that because the usa is full of morons like yourself who spout off on topics like economics they don't understand.

You're what is called a useful fool. Propagandized by "news" channels that pray on your ignorance and your fear, to keep you paying through the nose for something that should cost you a fraction of what it does, except for the financial parasites who keep you dumb and broke that you trust. You think they represent "capitalism." They represent cronyism you ignorant moron who doesn't even know how the system actually works.They are paying 1/10th to 1/100th what we are paying and they get better health outcomes. This is every single one of our social and economic peers. Now tell why we should not adapt their superior solution?By all reasonable definitions, this is terrorism.exactly!

1. use the symbol that declares your treasonous separation from the usa
2. declare rights and freedoms granted by the usa

choose

you can't have both at the same

logic, motherfuckers
i would say that terrorism is

1. suprise attack, no warning (cowardly)
2. attack on civilians, not military (again, cowards)
3. anonymous targets: you don't know the people, it's not personal, not part of an ongoing feud
4. attack in peacetime, no declared war
5. attack by a nongovernmental entity. i say this because an otherwise terrorist attack in peacetime by a government is simply a declaration of war, and that's what follows

the reason for the attack can be many. religion, politics, ideology, whatever

feel free to disagree with me, but there really needs to be a coherent definition, as anyone and everyone is a terrorist. the professor who won't allow extensions on a due date is a terrorist. a political opponent is a terrorist. an armed revolution is terrorism according to the despot. on and on it goes, it's ridiculous
you're being sarcastic right?
exactly. one rule for the rich, one rule for the poor, is simply a revolution waiting to happen
say i tear his flag down

he calls the police, and expects them to do something about me

those police are representatives of the government that enshrines those rights

his symbol is his declaration of not being under that government

we may extend him protection, but it's charity for an idiot loser. for that person flying a symbol declaring separation from the us govt, and expecting protection from the us govt at the same time, it's an illustration of their ideological bankruptcy or stupidity for not understanding the logical conflict

i understand what you're saying about natural rights, but a government apparatus has to enforce that understanding and that agreement

if i punch you in the face and rob you, magic lightning bolts don't strike me down dead because i've violated your natural rights, it still requires a government institution to apprehend and process me for defiling your natural rights
i can fly a nazi flag because i am celebrating hitler's love of dogs

but obviously what that flag actually means is what is at issue, not my moronic intent

the CSA flag most often used to day (there were many varieties) is the field battle flag of the army of northern virginia, formed to militarily repulse the federal govt

...so come help me, federal govt

the ideological bankruptcy and the logical failure stands
the french still screw up

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Air_France_Flight_447#Pitot_tubes

not a knock on the french, everyone screws up

all i am saying is that the french overhaul wasn't necessarily perfect

good luck on investigating the accident angle

oh wow, you discovered countries have financial problems?

do you remember the housing crisis that nearly ate the usa in 2008 caused by unregulated speculation?

all countries have financial problms you dumb fuck, for MANY reasons

but do you know what's going to happen, has happened in past crises, and always will happen in all future financial crises? these countries are still going to have universal healthcare, because it's CHEAP AND WORKS

http://pgpf.org/Chart-Archive/0006_health-care-oecd

by your logic of financial fitness, the worst offender is the usa. and the usa solves its problem by adopting the systems that WORK. you don't like norway? fine retard: how about japan, australia, france, canada?

what of their horrible financial crises that prove their systems don't work?

SUCH A COUNTRY DOES NOT EXIST YOU LYING MORON

the financial problems, that aren't apocalyptic btw, are UNRELATED to healthcare

i take it back, there is one country: the only the country that has a financial crisis because of broken healthcare system is the usa!

so we adopt WHAT FUCKING WORKS

(except for all the propagandized hordes of screaming american morons who like wasting money and giving it to financial parasites, like yourself, holding us back)the islands were run by spain for centuries (in fact, that is why it is called the philippines/ las filipinas in the first place, named after a spanish king named philip)

it's like if the usa decided to rename puerto rico "rich port" (what puerto rico means, and, btw, the usa acquired puerto rico and the philippines in the same war in 1898)

you would show up in a thread and say "why do you call yourselves puerto ricans instead of rich porters?"

(they actually call themselves boriqua, but that's a whole other story, it's similar to why filipinos calling themselves pinoys)
i agree with you 100%

no one is going to revolt unless our stomachs are empty

but my point is when we enshrine two different rules for two different classes, we are on our way to those empty stomachs, and then that revolution

we are 10,000 miles away from revolution in the usa

problem is, with recent inequality developments, we've already traveled 1,000 miles down that road

either we reverse the inequality with better laws, or we travel further down this road and we arrive at revolution
football is innocuous and uncontroversial nor weighted with violent historical meaning

the CSA and its flag was, and is, violent rejection of the authority of the federal govt

but now it's just about cook outs?

why don't you try understanding the real meaning instead of lying:

http://www.google.com/search?q=charleston+shooter+csa+flag&amp;tbm=isch

http://www.google.com/search?q=kkk+csa+flag&amp;tbm=isch

yup, just cook outs

you're a liar or an idiot who doesn't even understand the topic


it symbolizes the violent subjugation and denying natural rights because of the color of skin

yeah, no problem, not a big deal /s
kanos

or joes
you made a lame analogy which i proved inapplicable

you may try again with another analogy, or concede the point. but whining about not understanding when i clearly understood you doesn't prove much
yes, the usa cannot afford it's current healthcare system

so we shall adapt the CHEAPER more EFFECTIVE healthcare system that our peers use

is that too complicated for you?

&gt;Please continue to advocate for more marxism in government

#1: the system you are defending isn't capitalism. it's cronyism. you understand that right? there is no market and there is no competition

#2: marxism has fucking nothing to do with what CANADA or JAPAN or AUSTRALIA or UK does you dumb ignorant fuck

not a baseless insult: you are truly ignorant if you think universal healthcare is marxism. it's just CHEAPER you dumb fuck because it works, and doesn't line the pockets of financial parasites (which you call capitalism, because you're a fucking moron on this topic)

i never understood this braindead attitude where the only systems in the world are social darwinistic capitalism, and gulags and toilet paper lines communism

nothing in between

when of course there are thousands of systems in between. in fact the richest and happiest countries in the world, the nordic countries, pretty well balance social safety nets and capitalism. that's actually the ideal society

but if you view everything as capitalism and communism, nothing else, your ideology and philosophy is childish and facile. you haven't given an intellectually honest thought to the subject matter you inject your uneducated opinion into. you're a propaganda victim

this not a baseless insult

you present it as binary: capitalism or communism. when it obviously isn't binary. there are thousands of shades in between, in fact, the best system most definitely is not pure dog-eat-dog capitalism. objectively, as a function of the most successful societies today, and their economic and political systems

but because it is not pure dog-eat-dog capitalism, you have to call it communism. because those are the only two extremes you understand. because you're nothing but a propagandized simpleton, an ignorant on the topic. YOU DON'T UNDERSTAND ECONOMICS. you really genuinely do not. you're just a spastic fool reacting to scaremongering propaganda fed to you on "news" channels, bought and paid for by the very financial parasites you call "capitalism". your uselessness and stupidity is off the charts

*(hillybilly fiddle music with screams in background)*it's therapeutic. so much of our daily lives and politics is ruined by these sorts of idiots

sometimes you just have to get some logic and reason down for the record to know it still exists and people still believe and understand it
and the nazi flag represents to me hitler's love of dogs /s

it doesn't matter how much you make shit up and prevaricate, the confederate flag was created for and continues to stand for the violent subjugation of and denying the natural rights of people based on the color of their skin

oh, and some social retards like yourself think it's just for cookouts

i'm going to fly the nazi flag and say "it's just for cookouts" and see how well that works

all you prove is that there's a lot of stupid people in the world who deny or don't understand very obvious and simple things

it's called prideful ignorance



read the official declaration of secession by every single southern state

the reasons are clearly because of slavery

and the symbol they used for that cause was the confederate flag*

there exists pockets of morons who think it is harmless you tell me? well, here is your education: it's not harmless. the symbol has a specific reason that you cannot deny

your view is without logic, reason, or historical merit. if you fly the confederate flag, you stand for racism. if i fly the nazi flag and say "it means to me that hitler loved dogs" that doesn't work, and neither does your "thinking" on the topic either

(*there were actually many different such flags, the one we are arguing over is specifically the battlefield flag of the northern army of virginia, so there is also no legitimacy to flying the flag in mississippi or georgia for example, where they used other flags, unless you're celebrating racist virginia in alabama, which is odd. but being a pridefully ignorant person on the topic, truth or reality don't have much to do with what you "think")

you're right. they don't fucking understand what the fucking symbol means. the purpose it was actually fucking created for and the cause it was used to fight for. as if that has no significance!

it's prideful ignoranceif i do not hate jews, but i use the nazi flag, what i am known as is a moron who doesn't know history

that is the same thing as nonracists using the confederate flag

the flag was created for the purpose of subjugating and denying the natural freedoms of people based on their skin color

you cannot separate that flag from that purpose

any "cultural" use of the flag in the south is derived directly from racist organizations like the kkk. oh, you use it only because your grandpa used it? well your grandpa used it because he was a racist asshole. so that absolves you of all intelligence on the matter?

to deny the purpose of the flag, or not know the purpose of the flag or pretend not to know, and use the flag, is simply **prideful ignorance**. nothing more. nothing worth respecting anyways, because the flag itself is a symbol of disrespect

where did you get it, university of phoenix?

if you think a country like uk, canada, or japan has a healthcare system that is marxism, you are certainly no economist. no one educated on the topic of economics would suggest such a thing and expect to be taken seriously because anyone educated on economics would find that to be a joke

i myself am the queen of england. you can call yourself anything on the internet

it's not possible to represent patently False, ignorant things and still expect anyone to believe your supposed credentials or authority on a topic you only represent prideful ignorance in

**fact: the usa spends far more on healthcare for much worse results, than MODERN FREE MARKET ECONOMIES NOTHING MARXIST AT ALL YOU DUMB IGNORANT FUCK that have universal healthcare**

is absolutely anything about that statement False or wrong. NO. argue all you want around that rock of gibraltar

**it's called a social safety net. like social security. you understand that, right? NOT MARXISM**

you are, in fact, a propagandized ignorant on the topic of economics, to write the things you have. you show blind ignorance of basic simple facts

&gt;I could go fly it right now and I know the history behind it and I don't hate Jews.

so why the fuck would you fly it genius?

the SYMBOL means something. you fly it because of its SYMBOLIC meaning

do you paint your house red and people ask why you painted it red and you go "no, the house is blue"

that's basically your position right now

you want to use a symbol, and deny it's symbolic meaning. "this is a symbol of antisemitism but i choose to use the symbol without that meaning. i wish to communicate something about myself by pridefully flying symbols that mean absolutely nothing about who i am, or i will just make up my own meaning that contradicts basic fucking historical facts in a bubble"

you're championing your prideful ignorance: "i am ignorant as to what this means and i choose to stay that way and deny the obvious and the factual, and i am proudly aware of this disconnect between reality and facts and what i am saying"
of course you can fly it

and you are representing to people who view you flying it that you wish to tell them you are an antisemite, a fascist, and a white power racist

oh you're not? then you are apparently some sort of moron who wants to represent to people you are horrible things that you actually aren't

you understand that right?

"i wish to use this symbol and make believe what it symbolizes doesn't exist"

that's your entire position

now you will excuse me, i have to take down my halloween decorations. or, as i like to think of them, orange and black and pumpkins and scarecrows representing napoleon's defeat at waterloo

because i am a pridefully ignorant crackpot for whom history, truth, logic, and reason have zero meaning to the symbols i choose and what they mean
that's a complete lie

read the secession statement of every state that seceded. the purpose of their secession was clearly and mutliply stated as preserving slavery

what kind of "liberty" is about denying other people liberty?

same ignorant illogical crap like my "religious freedom" is about denying other people's freedoms today

the fight for liberty is about the fight against tyrants, correct? the confederate flag symbolizes the tyranny of racism. it being defeated is an extension of freedom to those denied their inalienable and natural rights because of the color of their skin

continuing to use the flag is a celebration of tyranny, of denying rights to people because of the color of their skin. that is the clearly stated reason for the creation of the confederacy, and that purpose is what the flag symbolizes

there is no no such thing as fighting for the "liberty" to deny others liberty

**edit**: wordsthe confederate flag was created for a particular reason. you wish to deny this reason exists, or that the flag doesn't represent this reason. you cannot use the confederate flag without also invoking it's actual fucking reason for existing

it's the same thing as saying the nazi flag represents hitler's love of dogs only. ok, if you want to be an absurd crackpot who is living in their own insanity. but if you want to matter to reality, you have to accept what the symbol actually fucking means

you don't get your own special alternate reality where symbols only mean certain things and not others


philippines unfortunately ranks very lowly on freedom of press

if you write something bad about some local sleazy politician, the next week a guy will ride by on a scooter and put a bullet in your head

or worse, like the dead journalists in that massacre

without a free press, the local corrupt douchebags never get punished, because no one will dare give voice to what everybody knows they are doing that is wrong
social safety nets

.
.
.

socialism

if you had an economics degree, you would understand the fucking difference

if you had an economics degree you would KNOW that our system is not capitalist, and you would KNOW that our social and economic peers have a system that has better results and is far cheaper

but what you are is a propagandized moron, who believes social safety nets (like social security) is the same topic as gulags and toilet paper lines communism

the best that can possibly come out of this exchange is for you to come to a realization about how much you don't fucking know about the topic you loudly and stupidly assert your prideful ignorance into
"states rights" is a lie

the states seceded with statements clearly and multiply stating slavery as their cause. it had absolutely nothing to do with "states rights"

that was a historical revisionist lie pushed by apologists after the fact who were trying to invent something noble about a cause which was essentially ignoble

besides, tyranny can come from the state house as easily as white house

if someone writes a tyrannical law in atlanta, how is it magically less tyrannical than a law written in washington dc?

it's just idiots and liars picking and choosing which government structure to impose their bullshit. the argument about "states rights" is illogical and without merit

yeah but he's describing real lifei am not a socialist. i love capitalism

i am also not a social darwinist (look it up, retard). meaning if you break your arm you should not die in the street because you can't afford the doctor

i believe in social safety nets, which means cheap higher education, support for the retired, universal healthcare, and paid parental leave, as well as free daycare. so that we can support a society where people can actually fucking work in a great capitalist system without worrying about their basic needs being denied by entrenched noncompetitive financial parasites that are NOT capitalist and provide these "services" for a predatory fee far beyond actual cost

is this too complicated for you?

additionally, our fucking peers are easily understood to be as any country with a similiar level of social and economic development: japan, germany, uk. not honduras, not bangladesh, not yemen

again, this is really not complicated stuff. that it is difficult for you only speaks of your stupidity and idiocy. you have a degree in economics you say? you lie too. no one with an economics degree is confused about what nations are our social and economic peers

an education for the idiot:

http://www.vox.com/2015/10/31/9650030/denmark-prime-minister-bernie-sanders

&gt;Bernie Sanders has long referred to himself as a socialist rather than a member of the Democratic Party, which has naturally led to a lot of questions about what socialism means to him. He consistently references the social models of the Nordic states \u2014 especially Denmark \u2014 as his idea of what democratic socialism is all about. But in a speech Friday evening at Harvard's Kennedy School of Government, Danish Prime Minister Lars L\u00f8kke Rasmussen said that while he's flattered to see Denmark discussed in a widely watched US presidential debate he doesn't think the socialist shoe fits.

&gt;**"I know that some people in the US associate the Nordic model with some sort of socialism," he said. "Therefore, I would like to make one thing clear. Denmark is far from a socialist planned economy. Denmark is a market economy."**

&gt;**In Rasmussen's view, "The Nordic model is an expanded welfare state which provides a high level of security to its citizens, but it is also a successful market economy with much freedom to pursue your dreams and live your life as you wish."**

that's reality. that's a successful social, political, and economic model. it's citizens are richer, happier, and healthier than americna citizens. because their system is BETTER

and most importantly: not socialism, not communism, not marxism, you ignorant retard

stop talking about a topic you don't understand


what does the link suppose to mean you fucking retard?

i see in the link the words marxism and social security

are you saying they are linked?

you know hitler liked dogs. therefore, all dog lovers are antisemitic fascists

do you see the logical error there?

then: because marxists like social security then social security is marxist only?

get it you fucking retard?

seriously, you are a DUMB PERSON

i mean genuinely ignorant, propagandized, and uneducated on this topic

"I don't have a valid argument and the other guy made a good point, but I don't have the intellectual honesty to concede that, so I'll paste empty links that I should probably read and try to understand myself."The states seceded specifically because of slavery. It's not hidden nor vague. Read their statements about their secession.

All you are doing is being intellectually dishonest and inventing an alternative narrative that is not fact nor history.&gt; I simply believe, had slavery in America never existed, the Civil War still would've been fought...

i stopped reading there. you're not making a coherent argument, you're engaging in alternative reality fan fiction

thread over

yes, let's get the record down straight in this thread, as there are many morons like yourself ruining the discourse in this country, and you need to be called out for being the useless ignorants you are

in your esteemed opinion as an economics degree holder, what is the difference between socialism and a social safety net?

if you don't think there is a difference, why are you lying about having an economics degree, and why are spouting off ignorantly about a subject matter you don't understand?

thankshttps://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Poe%27s_lawNowhere.

At what point do you get the protections of a government you are declaring yourself to not be a subject of?You just said "I am ignorant of a subject matter and I am proud of that ignorance."

They are not the same subject matter. At all.

The USA is Marxist? Communist? Socialist? It has Social Security. Explain.

At this point if you had a functional brain you would realize you are in error. If you had intellectual honesty you would thank me for the education. And if you had character and decency you would stop speaking ignorance about what you don't understand, until you can educate yourself.All I know is the best spaghetti bolognese I ever had was made by a Bavarian dude. Lol! So what was with the whole Senator McCarthy routine with the "are you a socialist?"

Now you've changed your tune and act like it's what you've been saying the whole time. Hilarious.

But that's as close as I'm going to get to a concession from someone of your low character and lack of intellectual honesty (as well as lying about your economics credentials), so, you're welcome for the education today douchebag.

One down, a couple more million hordes of useless propagandized retards to go.There is a mushroom called "destroying angel" (guess what it does to you).

Nowadays it kills mostly people from Southeast Asia living in North America because it looks exactly like a delicious kind from their homelands.

So even if you think you know what you're doing, check yourself.Relevant usernameGermany, japan, uk, canada... they spend 10-100x less than the usa on healthcare and have better results.

Normal person: "the usa should adopt universal payer."

Insane person: "Those models are too expensive."

Do you have an arrow sticking out of your forehead? What is the source of your insanity on this topic?
Just randomly pick up stranger's wives and ignore their protestations. Also fend off their husbands for added agility training.The dude believes in insane and scary shit. All of the marks against Hillary don't add up to anything as remotely bad as the crap Ben Carson believes.Agreed.Uh... have you been noticing the shit Trump and Carson say?Absolutely fucking brilliant.Duuude...meaning what? their tactics are as insane as their beliefs?

and i'm not arguing either, i'm expanding with my thoughts on the topic
how soon is now, what a weird and wonderful song

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hnpILIIo9ek

the reverb and the guitar response line always makes me think of crickets

ugghyou're talking about smuggling from indonesia

doesn't indonesian law impose death for drug smuggling?

also, i wonder what kind of boat we're talking about that can carry this much smack. doesn't seem like the kind of boat a poor villager will be using, especially on the open sea
interesting

one more thing: thanks for being a drug smuggling piece of shit

you're what's wrong with the world

i hope you die soon. sincerely


you're doing work. that's not education. yes, you learn something, but you are still owed something for doing the work. education is actual teaching for the sake of learning, not so someone else benefits economically
and you should be paid for it. every single job can be called "education." if someone derives economic benefit form your effort, they owe you pay. actual education is learning for the sake of learning, not "uh... yeah, education, that's it" so some asshole can get free labor
because it means only the rich can be ushered into certain jobs

everyone else needs to pay rent, so they need a paying job

so they wind up working jobs as waiters, while the rich can afford the expensive entry (which is what unpaid internships are) into the nice job

the idea is to have a meritocracy

but unpaid internships create and reinforce a classist society, where only the rich can afford to work for "free" to get the jobs that hold actual power

your problem is you look at the relationship in a vacuum, as if it has no effects on society, when it does

Someone is doing **work** for you. you owe them. If some rich asshole goes "I'll do it for free to get the fast track" that's not meritocracy that's classism.

The relationship does not exist by itself. It has an effect on society.

An employer OWES you for doing work. Any dodge around that represents a cheat because someone is rich.

That society is no longer a meritocracy.
 If I derive economic benefit from you doing something it is not an education. It is a job. What is difficult about that simple concept to you?If you go to a school you pay them to learn

If you do a job that someone derives an **economic benefit** from they pay you

What's complicated that you don't understand?"I'm interested in helping nature, that's why I'm selling these elephant tusks"

It doesn't fucking matter what you're interested in if you're actions are actually harmful.Thabk you for the frightening glimpse into a dystopian corporatocracy future and the bullshit rationale it would push.

I'm a slave until some asshole decides I have worth according to their metrics?

Reality: If you work for someone, they pay you. Is that really difficult for you to understand?More like "The emperors new clothes""let me modify your analogy, thinking this Noneifies your point"

i am not sure why you are being intellectually dishonest, but you are only announcing yourself as not worthy of interaction
that's not the employee's problemgiving him a first hand experience of the last thing roadkill sees, the bumper of a truck
that wasn't the argument i made

it helps to listen to what someone actually says, and respond to that, rather than substitute the bs that only exists in your head. if you're going to do that, you don't even need to get out of bed to argue with yourself
i made my point. you didn't counteract it, you changed the subjectYou changed the analogy you social retard. Which doesn't prove anything except that you think a subject change makes a point. Answer the point I am making. You can't. You apparently can only confuse simple concepts.my analogy is clear. you can't do something that harms a concept, even if you mistakenly believe it helps a concept

then you started babbling about raising elephants for slaughter, which is really awesome dude, but has fucking nothing to do with the fucking topic

i'm not interested in arguing about elephant farms with you, i wish to prove you wrong on the actual topic, which i apparently did if the best you can do is argue about fucking elephant farms

please. educate me. tell me how your elephant farm is analogous to the issue of unpaid internships. i'm waiting for your enlightenment of my horribly stupid self

this should be good

perhaps you want to slaughter the interns. not bad in that case if you're a pure social darwinist
This is what I'm talking about. You're CHANGING THE SUBJECT asshole. The issues is UNPAID INTERNSHIPS. You don't know what the fuck you're talking about."we will pay you nothing to do this job, which you can afford to do because you're rich. no one middle class or poor can afford to do this job for nothing, because they need to pay rent"

that's the fucking topic. do you understand moron?

you don't even know enough about the topic to make a valid judgment

it must be fun to live in a universe where you can subject change at will and speak authoritatively about shit you don't even understand. unfortunately this universe only exists in your head
war spending is a huge financial topic but so called "small government" "economically conservative" republicans always seem to have a massive blind spot on that topic, as if such spending doesn't exist or doesn't count, exactly as they are the ones championing shelling out trillions for it, when much of it can certainly count as needless

the whole iraq war not only needless, but extremely wasteful (of lifves as well, let's not forget) and strategically stupid

even republicans say so and it's a topic in this year's GOP nomination process, nevermind the democrats

to illustrate their hypocrisy on the topic of small governmentthese positions do not exist without people rich to be able to take them. these intern positions are jobs that fast track to powerful positions. rather than empty nepotism, they call it an internship that no one can afford but the rich. so it is classism

if you don't pay someone for doing a job, how they are paying rent? how are they paying for food?

thinkyup, he's dead

it's kind of like speeding 100 mph on the highway all the time

people can talk about how they never crash, and have been doing it for months

but it's obviously not a stable situation, and a crash is coming, no matter how much they think they are fooling us, or fooling themselves about "long term high-functioning recreational heroin use": it's a shortcut to death

you can't maintain a job and a relationship and an addiction to a serious drug at the same time

so yeah, they would start screwing up their lives

people always harp on the societal/ legal failures when it comes to treating highly addictive drugs. they always seem to forget the actual fucking highly addictive drug is still the real problem
which is doing wonders for their heart, and never threatens to spiral out of control /s

seriously, it's just like "i've been speeding 100 mph and never got in a crash"

if you can't see any risk to using a highly addictive substance, you have a serious problem and you don't know it yet, that's the best that can be said for you
well said. i have an imperfect analogy

it's the best i can do to communicate the denial and sketchy rationalization to people of taking a huge risk and acting like there's no risk at all
and i'm certain there are people who really can speed 100 mph all the time and never crash. we should consider legality and your capacity for risk only in regards to the insanely far out statistical outliers?

hey, i know a guy who can climb mountains without rope

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yRoFQUdUL7E

therefore, no one should need ropes when climbing mountains. that's logic, right?

...and bacon?! you want to consider heroin as deadly and dangerous as bacon?! your analogy meter is broken bro
"there's other dangerous drugs so this dangerous drug can be considered safe"

sterling logic

&gt;If every country legalized every drug, and offered help instead of hate I really doubt most people would become hardcore drug addicts. 

of course everyone needs healthcare instead of jail. that doesn't change the fact the problem is still taking the fucking highly addictive drug! no matter if society is welcoming arms or moronic hate, the problem is still taking a highly addictive substance ruining your fucking life

because the problem is gee, i dunno basic fucking biochemistry?!

the scary denial is off the charts with you. get help
obviously many in society with their ignorant hate and much of the legal framework is completely fucked up

addicts need healthcare, not jail

but pinning the problem with drugs on society's and the law's attitude towards drug is incredibly stupid, the actual addiction to the substance is still the actual fucking problem. whether society is open arms, or moronic hate, that's secondary to the real problem. that's my point

i don't understand people who think the problem with highly addictive drugs is just society's attitude. the drug itself is still the problem
"this incredibly fucking stupid addiction is legal, so therefore this other incredibly fucking stupid illegal addiction should be ok"

sterling logic

how about BOTH are wrong, and yes the legality is fucked up

therefore, because the law is fucked up, you should ruin your life? wtf?

you have the logic ass fucking backwards. avoid both stupidities, regardless of how fucked up society's attitudes are
no one can use a highly addictive drug just fine

it's called basic fucking biochemistry

it's science, like gravity. no one jumps up and floats away. likewise, no one is wired to not be addicted to something like heroin. it's the basis of our fucking reward pathway in the brain. it overwhelms it, 100% of human brains, no human brain is wired differently on this topic, or they are surely an incredibly bizarre mutant outlier

you're basing your attitude on anecdotal evidence, like hearing about someone who knew someone who maybe saw a unicorn once

howabout basing your attitude on the fucking reality of human brain biochemistry instead of some stupid rumor of someone who probably DID maintain use and a life for awhile (but you don't hear about the eventual crash, that didn't make it into the stupid anecdote)
analogies. you fail. if you don't understand why that analogy doesn't work, stop. rethinkyes, healthcare, not jail, i agree

that doesn't change the fact that using highly addictive drugs are going to ruin your life. whatever problems you had before you are making multiples worse. the point, no matter what the legality, is don't use these fucking drugs

if you fuck up and you do, we will help you, not jail you. still the point is to get you OFF the mistake
there's always stupid people, you can't protect them from themselves

and we should help them get off their mistake, not jail them

but the message never changes that highly addictive substances is clearly a mistake

because some people are so stupid they still commit the mistake we should lie about the simple truth?

"jumping off a cliff is stupid"

"uh sir, for saying that, some people choose to jump off the cliff"

"ok then, tell people jumping off cliffs is awesome"

what?

no one can. you are increasing the risk of massive problems in your job and relationship by using drugs. it's simply a matter of time, no matter what idiot you can point to who treaded water the longest with iron bars tied to his ankles

i really don't understand the point of this insane denial and twisted rationalization that fucking up your mental coherence and lucidity will never have any downsides or problems. it's truly bizarre. and even if you can find some far out statistical outlier, it's like "we should totally base personal and social and legal attitude on these incredibly far out statistical outliers, rather than 99.999% of experiences, even if the outliers are True and not distorted"

but the point is still to get them off the drugs, right?

we should provide help, healthcare, not jail, i agree

but the point is still: get off the fucking highly addictive drug, because that is still the actual mistake, regardless of how screwed up society's attitude is
nice bullshit rationalization, and ignoring all other problemsyes: healthcare, not jail

but the point is still to get people off the drug. that never changes. because taking the highly addictive drug is still the actual fucking problem, no matter how screwed up or helpful society is on the topic

yes, regularly screwing up your mental coherence and lucidity has absolutely zero effect on your relationships and job performance, oh yeah, totally /s
i used to work AIDS healthcare outreach on the lower east side in the early 1990s. before retrovirals and gentrification. i know what hard drugs do to people's lives. i've seen the wreckage of once promising and great lives, and the broken shells they've become

completely blind denial like yours is nothing new to me
but it was actually 11001000 years agowell saidor we can do what they are doing right, like universal healthcare. they pay 1/100th or less what we pay and live longer and healthier. because they can control the prices. in the usa we pay for financial parasites that don't add to the system and just siphon off money for no extra value

our social and economic peers, with universal care, single payer, pay 1/100th or less what we pay in healthcare and live longer and healthier

our financial parasites system means extra costs to line some asshole's pocket who adds nothing to the systemor just dumb

it always gets me downvotes but it's True: there's a lot of stupid people out there who talk about what they don't even understand and haven't thought about enough to even be coherent from one issue to the next. they just react to propaganda from "trusted" meadia sources and certain lying talking heads, demagoguesso you want single payer, universal healthcare because that's the only way you can control costs

all of our social and economic peers pay 1/100th or less than we do for healthcare and live longer and healthier lives. because they aren't feeding financial parasites in the system that add nothing to getting people healthy

but you'll never get that with a large part of congress corrupted and paid for by the insurance companies, or ideological morons who hate anything obama does and oppose reform because "communism"

so the ACA is a mess. it's a first tiny step in the right direction, but we need to go 100 more miles in that direction before we experience real relief. and we won't get it because of the corrupt in congress  and the ideological morons in congress and all of he propagandized dumb people out there who don't fucking understand the topic and react to the scaremongering on their propaganda channels paid for by the entrenched financial parasites

i never understood this braindead attitude where the only systems in the world are social darwinistic capitalism, and communism

nothing in between

when of course there are thousands of systems in between. in fact the richest and happiest countries in the world, the nordic countries, pretty well balance social safety nets and capitalism. that's actually the ideal society

but if you view everything as capitalism and communism, nothing else, your ideology and philosophy is childish and facile. you haven't given an intellectually honest thought to the subject matter you inject your uneducated opinion into. you're a propaganda victim

this not a baseless insult

you present it as binary: capitalism or communism. when it obviously isn't binary. there are thousands of shades in between, in fact, the best system most definitely is not pure capitalism. objectively, as a function of the most successful societies today, and their economic and political systems

but because it is not pure dog-eat-dog capitalism, you have to call it communism. because those are the only two extremes you understand. you're a simpleton, an ignorant on the topicexcept that progress is real and it exists

we are richer and healthier than we've ever been

there is injustice in the distribution of the fruits of our labors, but we shall fix that
So they are going to get rid of universal healthcare? Generous work hours and vacations? Free daycare and maternity leave?

Go on, educate idiot me.So this is the us healthcare system:

https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/wonk/wp/2013/03/26/21-graphs-that-show-americas-health-care-prices-are-ludicrous/

It's not a free market and never will be, because things like oncologists and hospitals are natural monopolies:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Natural_monopoly

But when you make believe this is a free market the players simply gouge as much as they can because there is no natural market discipline over prices.

The solution is to treat it like highways or fire departments: government paid for, which allows for price discipline. Such as japan, germany, uk, canada... every sane fucking country that spends 1/100th what we do and has healthier longer lives. But we can't have that because the usa is full of morons like yourself who spout off on topics like economics they don't understand.

You're what is called a useful fool. Propagandized by "news" channels that pray on your ignorance and your fear, to keep you paying through the nose for something that should cost you a fraction of what it does, except for the financial parasites who keep you dumb and broke that you trust. You think they represent "capitalism." They represent cronyism you ignorant moron who doesn't even know how the system actually works.They are paying 1/10th to 1/100th what we are paying and they get better health outcomes. This is every single one of our social and economic peers. Now tell why we should not adapt their superior solution?By all reasonable definitions, this is terrorism.exactly!

1. use the symbol that declares your treasonous separation from the usa
2. declare rights and freedoms granted by the usa

choose

you can't have both at the same

logic, motherfuckers
i would say that terrorism is

1. suprise attack, no warning (cowardly)
2. attack on civilians, not military (again, cowards)
3. anonymous targets: you don't know the people, it's not personal, not part of an ongoing feud
4. attack in peacetime, no declared war
5. attack by a nongovernmental entity. i say this because an otherwise terrorist attack in peacetime by a government is simply a declaration of war, and that's what follows

the reason for the attack can be many. religion, politics, ideology, whatever

feel free to disagree with me, but there really needs to be a coherent definition, as anyone and everyone is a terrorist. the professor who won't allow extensions on a due date is a terrorist. a political opponent is a terrorist. an armed revolution is terrorism according to the despot. on and on it goes, it's ridiculous
you're being sarcastic right?
exactly. one rule for the rich, one rule for the poor, is simply a revolution waiting to happen
say i tear his flag down

he calls the police, and expects them to do something about me

those police are representatives of the government that enshrines those rights

his symbol is his declaration of not being under that government

we may extend him protection, but it's charity for an idiot loser. for that person flying a symbol declaring separation from the us govt, and expecting protection from the us govt at the same time, it's an illustration of their ideological bankruptcy or stupidity for not understanding the logical conflict

i understand what you're saying about natural rights, but a government apparatus has to enforce that understanding and that agreement

if i punch you in the face and rob you, magic lightning bolts don't strike me down dead because i've violated your natural rights, it still requires a government institution to apprehend and process me for defiling your natural rights
i can fly a nazi flag because i am celebrating hitler's love of dogs

but obviously what that flag actually means is what is at issue, not my moronic intent

the CSA flag most often used to day (there were many varieties) is the field battle flag of the army of northern virginia, formed to militarily repulse the federal govt

...so come help me, federal govt

the ideological bankruptcy and the logical failure stands
the french still screw up

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Air_France_Flight_447#Pitot_tubes

not a knock on the french, everyone screws up

all i am saying is that the french overhaul wasn't necessarily perfect

good luck on investigating the accident angle

oh wow, you discovered countries have financial problems?

do you remember the housing crisis that nearly ate the usa in 2008 caused by unregulated speculation?

all countries have financial problms you dumb fuck, for MANY reasons

but do you know what's going to happen, has happened in past crises, and always will happen in all future financial crises? these countries are still going to have universal healthcare, because it's CHEAP AND WORKS

http://pgpf.org/Chart-Archive/0006_health-care-oecd

by your logic of financial fitness, the worst offender is the usa. and the usa solves its problem by adopting the systems that WORK. you don't like norway? fine retard: how about japan, australia, france, canada?

what of their horrible financial crises that prove their systems don't work?

SUCH A COUNTRY DOES NOT EXIST YOU LYING MORON

the financial problems, that aren't apocalyptic btw, are UNRELATED to healthcare

i take it back, there is one country: the only the country that has a financial crisis because of broken healthcare system is the usa!

so we adopt WHAT FUCKING WORKS

(except for all the propagandized hordes of screaming american morons who like wasting money and giving it to financial parasites, like yourself, holding us back)the islands were run by spain for centuries (in fact, that is why it is called the philippines/ las filipinas in the first place, named after a spanish king named philip)

it's like if the usa decided to rename puerto rico "rich port" (what puerto rico means, and, btw, the usa acquired puerto rico and the philippines in the same war in 1898)

you would show up in a thread and say "why do you call yourselves puerto ricans instead of rich porters?"

(they actually call themselves boriqua, but that's a whole other story, it's similar to why filipinos calling themselves pinoys)
i agree with you 100%

no one is going to revolt unless our stomachs are empty

but my point is when we enshrine two different rules for two different classes, we are on our way to those empty stomachs, and then that revolution

we are 10,000 miles away from revolution in the usa

problem is, with recent inequality developments, we've already traveled 1,000 miles down that road

either we reverse the inequality with better laws, or we travel further down this road and we arrive at revolution
football is innocuous and uncontroversial nor weighted with violent historical meaning

the CSA and its flag was, and is, violent rejection of the authority of the federal govt

but now it's just about cook outs?

why don't you try understanding the real meaning instead of lying:

http://www.google.com/search?q=charleston+shooter+csa+flag&amp;tbm=isch

http://www.google.com/search?q=kkk+csa+flag&amp;tbm=isch

yup, just cook outs

you're a liar or an idiot who doesn't even understand the topic


it symbolizes the violent subjugation and denying natural rights because of the color of skin

yeah, no problem, not a big deal /s
kanos

or joes
you made a lame analogy which i proved inapplicable

you may try again with another analogy, or concede the point. but whining about not understanding when i clearly understood you doesn't prove much
yes, the usa cannot afford it's current healthcare system

so we shall adapt the CHEAPER more EFFECTIVE healthcare system that our peers use

is that too complicated for you?

&gt;Please continue to advocate for more marxism in government

#1: the system you are defending isn't capitalism. it's cronyism. you understand that right? there is no market and there is no competition

#2: marxism has fucking nothing to do with what CANADA or JAPAN or AUSTRALIA or UK does you dumb ignorant fuck

not a baseless insult: you are truly ignorant if you think universal healthcare is marxism. it's just CHEAPER you dumb fuck because it works, and doesn't line the pockets of financial parasites (which you call capitalism, because you're a fucking moron on this topic)

i never understood this braindead attitude where the only systems in the world are social darwinistic capitalism, and gulags and toilet paper lines communism

nothing in between

when of course there are thousands of systems in between. in fact the richest and happiest countries in the world, the nordic countries, pretty well balance social safety nets and capitalism. that's actually the ideal society

but if you view everything as capitalism and communism, nothing else, your ideology and philosophy is childish and facile. you haven't given an intellectually honest thought to the subject matter you inject your uneducated opinion into. you're a propaganda victim

this not a baseless insult

you present it as binary: capitalism or communism. when it obviously isn't binary. there are thousands of shades in between, in fact, the best system most definitely is not pure dog-eat-dog capitalism. objectively, as a function of the most successful societies today, and their economic and political systems

but because it is not pure dog-eat-dog capitalism, you have to call it communism. because those are the only two extremes you understand. because you're nothing but a propagandized simpleton, an ignorant on the topic. YOU DON'T UNDERSTAND ECONOMICS. you really genuinely do not. you're just a spastic fool reacting to scaremongering propaganda fed to you on "news" channels, bought and paid for by the very financial parasites you call "capitalism". your uselessness and stupidity is off the charts

*(hillybilly fiddle music with screams in background)*it's therapeutic. so much of our daily lives and politics is ruined by these sorts of idiots

sometimes you just have to get some logic and reason down for the record to know it still exists and people still believe and understand it
and the nazi flag represents to me hitler's love of dogs /s

it doesn't matter how much you make shit up and prevaricate, the confederate flag was created for and continues to stand for the violent subjugation of and denying the natural rights of people based on the color of their skin

oh, and some social retards like yourself think it's just for cookouts

i'm going to fly the nazi flag and say "it's just for cookouts" and see how well that works

all you prove is that there's a lot of stupid people in the world who deny or don't understand very obvious and simple things

it's called prideful ignorance



read the official declaration of secession by every single southern state

the reasons are clearly because of slavery

and the symbol they used for that cause was the confederate flag*

there exists pockets of morons who think it is harmless you tell me? well, here is your education: it's not harmless. the symbol has a specific reason that you cannot deny

your view is without logic, reason, or historical merit. if you fly the confederate flag, you stand for racism. if i fly the nazi flag and say "it means to me that hitler loved dogs" that doesn't work, and neither does your "thinking" on the topic either

(*there were actually many different such flags, the one we are arguing over is specifically the battlefield flag of the northern army of virginia, so there is also no legitimacy to flying the flag in mississippi or georgia for example, where they used other flags, unless you're celebrating racist virginia in alabama, which is odd. but being a pridefully ignorant person on the topic, truth or reality don't have much to do with what you "think")

you're right. they don't fucking understand what the fucking symbol means. the purpose it was actually fucking created for and the cause it was used to fight for. as if that has no significance!

it's prideful ignoranceif i do not hate jews, but i use the nazi flag, what i am known as is a moron who doesn't know history

that is the same thing as nonracists using the confederate flag

the flag was created for the purpose of subjugating and denying the natural freedoms of people based on their skin color

you cannot separate that flag from that purpose

any "cultural" use of the flag in the south is derived directly from racist organizations like the kkk. oh, you use it only because your grandpa used it? well your grandpa used it because he was a racist asshole. so that absolves you of all intelligence on the matter?

to deny the purpose of the flag, or not know the purpose of the flag or pretend not to know, and use the flag, is simply **prideful ignorance**. nothing more. nothing worth respecting anyways, because the flag itself is a symbol of disrespect

where did you get it, university of phoenix?

if you think a country like uk, canada, or japan has a healthcare system that is marxism, you are certainly no economist. no one educated on the topic of economics would suggest such a thing and expect to be taken seriously because anyone educated on economics would find that to be a joke

i myself am the queen of england. you can call yourself anything on the internet

it's not possible to represent patently False, ignorant things and still expect anyone to believe your supposed credentials or authority on a topic you only represent prideful ignorance in

**fact: the usa spends far more on healthcare for much worse results, than MODERN FREE MARKET ECONOMIES NOTHING MARXIST AT ALL YOU DUMB IGNORANT FUCK that have universal healthcare**

is absolutely anything about that statement False or wrong. NO. argue all you want around that rock of gibraltar

**it's called a social safety net. like social security. you understand that, right? NOT MARXISM**

you are, in fact, a propagandized ignorant on the topic of economics, to write the things you have. you show blind ignorance of basic simple facts

&gt;I could go fly it right now and I know the history behind it and I don't hate Jews.

so why the fuck would you fly it genius?

the SYMBOL means something. you fly it because of its SYMBOLIC meaning

do you paint your house red and people ask why you painted it red and you go "no, the house is blue"

that's basically your position right now

you want to use a symbol, and deny it's symbolic meaning. "this is a symbol of antisemitism but i choose to use the symbol without that meaning. i wish to communicate something about myself by pridefully flying symbols that mean absolutely nothing about who i am, or i will just make up my own meaning that contradicts basic fucking historical facts in a bubble"

you're championing your prideful ignorance: "i am ignorant as to what this means and i choose to stay that way and deny the obvious and the factual, and i am proudly aware of this disconnect between reality and facts and what i am saying"
of course you can fly it

and you are representing to people who view you flying it that you wish to tell them you are an antisemite, a fascist, and a white power racist

oh you're not? then you are apparently some sort of moron who wants to represent to people you are horrible things that you actually aren't

you understand that right?

"i wish to use this symbol and make believe what it symbolizes doesn't exist"

that's your entire position

now you will excuse me, i have to take down my halloween decorations. or, as i like to think of them, orange and black and pumpkins and scarecrows representing napoleon's defeat at waterloo

because i am a pridefully ignorant crackpot for whom history, truth, logic, and reason have zero meaning to the symbols i choose and what they mean
that's a complete lie

read the secession statement of every state that seceded. the purpose of their secession was clearly and mutliply stated as preserving slavery

what kind of "liberty" is about denying other people liberty?

same ignorant illogical crap like my "religious freedom" is about denying other people's freedoms today

the fight for liberty is about the fight against tyrants, correct? the confederate flag symbolizes the tyranny of racism. it being defeated is an extension of freedom to those denied their inalienable and natural rights because of the color of their skin

continuing to use the flag is a celebration of tyranny, of denying rights to people because of the color of their skin. that is the clearly stated reason for the creation of the confederacy, and that purpose is what the flag symbolizes

there is no no such thing as fighting for the "liberty" to deny others liberty

**edit**: wordsthe confederate flag was created for a particular reason. you wish to deny this reason exists, or that the flag doesn't represent this reason. you cannot use the confederate flag without also invoking it's actual fucking reason for existing

it's the same thing as saying the nazi flag represents hitler's love of dogs only. ok, if you want to be an absurd crackpot who is living in their own insanity. but if you want to matter to reality, you have to accept what the symbol actually fucking means

you don't get your own special alternate reality where symbols only mean certain things and not others


philippines unfortunately ranks very lowly on freedom of press

if you write something bad about some local sleazy politician, the next week a guy will ride by on a scooter and put a bullet in your head

or worse, like the dead journalists in that massacre

without a free press, the local corrupt douchebags never get punished, because no one will dare give voice to what everybody knows they are doing that is wrong
social safety nets

.
.
.

socialism

if you had an economics degree, you would understand the fucking difference

if you had an economics degree you would KNOW that our system is not capitalist, and you would KNOW that our social and economic peers have a system that has better results and is far cheaper

but what you are is a propagandized moron, who believes social safety nets (like social security) is the same topic as gulags and toilet paper lines communism

the best that can possibly come out of this exchange is for you to come to a realization about how much you don't fucking know about the topic you loudly and stupidly assert your prideful ignorance into
"states rights" is a lie

the states seceded with statements clearly and multiply stating slavery as their cause. it had absolutely nothing to do with "states rights"

that was a historical revisionist lie pushed by apologists after the fact who were trying to invent something noble about a cause which was essentially ignoble

besides, tyranny can come from the state house as easily as white house

if someone writes a tyrannical law in atlanta, how is it magically less tyrannical than a law written in washington dc?

it's just idiots and liars picking and choosing which government structure to impose their bullshit. the argument about "states rights" is illogical and without merit

yeah but he's describing real lifei am not a socialist. i love capitalism

i am also not a social darwinist (look it up, retard). meaning if you break your arm you should not die in the street because you can't afford the doctor

i believe in social safety nets, which means cheap higher education, support for the retired, universal healthcare, and paid parental leave, as well as free daycare. so that we can support a society where people can actually fucking work in a great capitalist system without worrying about their basic needs being denied by entrenched noncompetitive financial parasites that are NOT capitalist and provide these "services" for a predatory fee far beyond actual cost

is this too complicated for you?

additionally, our fucking peers are easily understood to be as any country with a similiar level of social and economic development: japan, germany, uk. not honduras, not bangladesh, not yemen

again, this is really not complicated stuff. that it is difficult for you only speaks of your stupidity and idiocy. you have a degree in economics you say? you lie too. no one with an economics degree is confused about what nations are our social and economic peers

an education for the idiot:

http://www.vox.com/2015/10/31/9650030/denmark-prime-minister-bernie-sanders

&gt;Bernie Sanders has long referred to himself as a socialist rather than a member of the Democratic Party, which has naturally led to a lot of questions about what socialism means to him. He consistently references the social models of the Nordic states \u2014 especially Denmark \u2014 as his idea of what democratic socialism is all about. But in a speech Friday evening at Harvard's Kennedy School of Government, Danish Prime Minister Lars L\u00f8kke Rasmussen said that while he's flattered to see Denmark discussed in a widely watched US presidential debate he doesn't think the socialist shoe fits.

&gt;**"I know that some people in the US associate the Nordic model with some sort of socialism," he said. "Therefore, I would like to make one thing clear. Denmark is far from a socialist planned economy. Denmark is a market economy."**

&gt;**In Rasmussen's view, "The Nordic model is an expanded welfare state which provides a high level of security to its citizens, but it is also a successful market economy with much freedom to pursue your dreams and live your life as you wish."**

that's reality. that's a successful social, political, and economic model. it's citizens are richer, happier, and healthier than americna citizens. because their system is BETTER

and most importantly: not socialism, not communism, not marxism, you ignorant retard

stop talking about a topic you don't understand


what does the link suppose to mean you fucking retard?

i see in the link the words marxism and social security

are you saying they are linked?

you know hitler liked dogs. therefore, all dog lovers are antisemitic fascists

do you see the logical error there?

then: because marxists like social security then social security is marxist only?

get it you fucking retard?

seriously, you are a DUMB PERSON

i mean genuinely ignorant, propagandized, and uneducated on this topic

"I don't have a valid argument and the other guy made a good point, but I don't have the intellectual honesty to concede that, so I'll paste empty links that I should probably read and try to understand myself."The states seceded specifically because of slavery. It's not hidden nor vague. Read their statements about their secession.

All you are doing is being intellectually dishonest and inventing an alternative narrative that is not fact nor history.&gt; I simply believe, had slavery in America never existed, the Civil War still would've been fought...

i stopped reading there. you're not making a coherent argument, you're engaging in alternative reality fan fiction

thread over

yes, let's get the record down straight in this thread, as there are many morons like yourself ruining the discourse in this country, and you need to be called out for being the useless ignorants you are

in your esteemed opinion as an economics degree holder, what is the difference between socialism and a social safety net?

if you don't think there is a difference, why are you lying about having an economics degree, and why are spouting off ignorantly about a subject matter you don't understand?

thankshttps://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Poe%27s_lawNowhere.

At what point do you get the protections of a government you are declaring yourself to not be a subject of?You just said "I am ignorant of a subject matter and I am proud of that ignorance."

They are not the same subject matter. At all.

The USA is Marxist? Communist? Socialist? It has Social Security. Explain.

At this point if you had a functional brain you would realize you are in error. If you had intellectual honesty you would thank me for the education. And if you had character and decency you would stop speaking ignorance about what you don't understand, until you can educate yourself.All I know is the best spaghetti bolognese I ever had was made by a Bavarian dude. Lol! So what was with the whole Senator McCarthy routine with the "are you a socialist?"

Now you've changed your tune and act like it's what you've been saying the whole time. Hilarious.

But that's as close as I'm going to get to a concession from someone of your low character and lack of intellectual honesty (as well as lying about your economics credentials), so, you're welcome for the education today douchebag.

One down, a couple more million hordes of useless propagandized retards to go.There is a mushroom called "destroying angel" (guess what it does to you).

Nowadays it kills mostly people from Southeast Asia living in North America because it looks exactly like a delicious kind from their homelands.

So even if you think you know what you're doing, check yourself.Relevant usernameGermany, japan, uk, canada... they spend 10-100x less than the usa on healthcare and have better results.

Normal person: "the usa should adopt universal payer."

Insane person: "Those models are too expensive."

Do you have an arrow sticking out of your forehead? What is the source of your insanity on this topic?
Just randomly pick up stranger's wives and ignore their protestations. Also fend off their husbands for added agility training.The dude believes in insane and scary shit. All of the marks against Hillary don't add up to anything as remotely bad as the crap Ben Carson believes.Agreed.Uh... have you been noticing the shit Trump and Carson say?Absolutely fucking brilliant.Duuude...meaning what? their tactics are as insane as their beliefs?

and i'm not arguing either, i'm expanding with my thoughts on the topic
how soon is now, what a weird and wonderful song

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hnpILIIo9ek

the reverb and the guitar response line always makes me think of crickets

ugghyou're talking about smuggling from indonesia

doesn't indonesian law impose death for drug smuggling?

also, i wonder what kind of boat we're talking about that can carry this much smack. doesn't seem like the kind of boat a poor villager will be using, especially on the open sea
interesting

one more thing: thanks for being a drug smuggling piece of shit

you're what's wrong with the world

i hope you die soon. sincerely


Or AztecThe cartels want to grow business.

ISIS wants to hasten the end of the world. They are an apocalyptic death cult.

It's about intent. ISIS is more dangerous than the cartels. Simply because of what their goals are.You have to wonder though how many areas of Mexico would prefer to live under US jurisdiction. Loss of national pride but better security and more economic potential.you mean tejano culture

so yeah, you're right

for everyone else:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tejano
ISIS is still around and kicking, and would happily harm as many people as possible. it's a fever that blows up into a life threatening acute disease that knocks you unconscious and on a ventilator on a moment's notice

the cartels only murder if it interferes with profits. it's a mid grade long term chronic condition that doesn't threaten your life but causes a lot of pain and limitation

i'm just going to get more downvotes, but i don't care: ISIS is clearly more dangerous than the mexican cartels, because of INTENT
and ISIS wants to kill everyone. the cartels just want to make money, the killing is tangentialit's about intent. if ISIS got it's hands on nuclear material, even if just an old hospital device, for example, what would they do? the INTENT matterswell said

but no matter how this happens, her sister may figure out who made the call

and i think OP should know this, and steel themselves for this: a possible major disruption in her relationship with her sister

but OP should still report her

OP: you need to choose what's best for the kids and possible major bad blood with your sister. i think what's best for the kids is worth the pain of decayed relations with your sister

you need to make peace with that, then report her

then cross your fingers CPS understands discretion and there is enough lack of details made available to your sister such that she never suspects you

a little purposeful misdirection might help: "sis, why did CPS just contact me!"

although... yeah, forget that bit about misdirection. if you're caught lying to your sister it's even worse
yup! i read that too, great read, lucky idiot

it strikes me as an excellent example of the professional with a little too much hubris for their own good

for example: the tax attorney who thinks he can not file taxes for a few years

the nurse who rudely handles used sharps who gets pricked

the mushroom "expert" who plays fast and loose with something that could possibly be the worst of the worst

hubris
yes, the lame, useless "culture" argument

this is about economics. it has nothing to do with culture. the economic policies of the nordics can be adopted here to great effect

the only "culture" the usa has is a bunch of idiots who think it's the 1950s with the red scare and senator mccarthy, and can't tell the difference between communism and social safety nets

the only way we can talk about "culture" on this issue is what the **problem** is with the usa that prevents the right thing here: adopting more social safety nets in the usa
not as much

i'm never really impressed with these "men too" arguments when women are always the disproportionately larger focus of crimes like stalking and rape

why is it difficult for some people to just admit that this is a problem for women and men, yes, but mostly women?

you have to make a contribution to the discussion a little more than "men too"

we know that already

that's nothing we don't understand. nobody is is denying that

but we're focusing on women because, well, the focus is on women with these sorts of crimes
or highlander 2

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Highlander_II:_The_Quickening

uggh

a solid fresh idea turned into generic sci fi fantasy crap ignoring the rules and facts already established

&gt;The film has received negative reviews from critics and fans of the Highlander franchise for its numerous retcons of the prior film, which drastically altered the series storyline, as well as numerous continuity errors and several instances of logical inconsistencies, among other complaints. As a result, several alternative versions have been released by the filmmakers in an attempt to correct these common complaints, and **the original theatrical edition has been considered to be one of the worst films ever released**.

women are stalked and raped more than men

"but men too"

this is /r/xx not /r/xx_and_xy so naturally the focus is on women as a subset of this sort of crime

"but men too"

no one is denying men are the victims of the same sort of crimes but these crimes disproportionately affect women

"but men too"

you're changing the topic and cherry picking the focus to continue to assert male victims (which no one is denying exist) over female victims, on a female centric sub-

"but men too"

(facepalm)
which is changing the topic!

"but men too" "but men too" "but men too"

over and over again...

is it fucking possible please to talk about female victims of a crime that disproportionately affects women on a female focused sub without 9,000 "but men too" parrots?

is that really so horrible to you?
machismo

a colossal weakness

sad
1. women are genuinely more targeted by stalking and rape
2. the fucking sub is /r/xx and not /r/xx&amp;xy. the subject naturally fucking focuses on women

do you go into an auto part sub discussion about chassis and constantly interrupt with horse drawn buggy chassis complaints? if someone says "this is about auto parts" do you whine and moan no one talks about horse and buggy chassis and everyone ignores horse and buggy chassis? it's not the fucking sub for the fucking topic! it's an auto parts sub. do you perhaps fucking understand your problem here?

no one is denying men are victims. but finding it to be a problem that men are not constantly asserted into a topic that mostly affects women, in a women only sub, is, frankly, delusional
i didn't follow your link i just saw the url. if you can't make your argument don't go "here read this" it shows you are lazy and not paying attention. it is not my job to make your argument for you

but according to the url, you're changing the subject to sexism online

would you please read the fucking article you are commenting under?

the woman athlete in question is speaking up about her rape. RAPE and STALKING affects women more than men

CHANGING THE FUCKING TOPIC to sexism online does not make your point

it only shows you don't understand what the fuck you are talking about
it would also make sense if anyone actually ever fucking said that! no one said broken wheels don't affect both! they said "we discuss autos here, not buggies"

CHANGING THE FUCKING TOPIC simply means you don't know what the fuck you are talking about
&gt; men are raped more than women though

i stopped reading there

this is delusional and grossly not factual

i'm beginning to see the problem here and what kind of people we are dealing with on this topic

why don't you go start /r/anxandaychromosome and discuss the topic to your hearts content

but when you talking about horses and buggies in an auto parts forum, and whine that no one is talking about horse and buggies, does it ever fucking occur to you you are the fucking problem and are off fucking topic in the wrong fucking sub?

is that really so fucking difficult for you to notice the fucking sub you are fucking commenting in?


link not followed

make your own fucking argument, i'm not going to read something and make it for you

but looking at the url:

PRISON??!!

you want to group normal fucking civilian life in with prison experience??!!

what the fuck is your problem? do you perhaps understand how fucking off topic that is?
&gt; That phrase isn't clever enough to use twice in the same thread.

and i stopped reading there. that ain't the topic
the idea that this discussion has to do with the experiences of general society goes without saying

i am absolutely certain if you include prisons, war zones, and work camps the fucking numbers will change

do you really fucking think any of those things have anything to do with this fucking topic?

look at the story you are posting under

look at the sub you are posting in

any clues yet?

what about brothels, slavery rings, and human trafficking? are we going to expand the topic there too? might include a bazillion more women there

i'm not going to, because that would be changing the topic

could you as well please not change the fucking topic?
&gt;It would make sense for the horse and buggy crowd to complain if the auto part crowd made claims that broken wheels don't affect horse and buggies

what's that?
the topic is clear. you are changing the topic. you seem angry you don't get to change the topic. good luck to you with that approach to life
not remotely True. we are talking about **general society**. you are also changing the topic. notice the article you are commenting under. that is the fucking topic

you have an agenda to push. you lie. you change the topic. some charity for you: that's not going to take you very far in life

would you please tell me what men getting raped in prison has to do with

1. a female athlete harassed about talking about her rape

2. in /r/xx

thanks
me: "fact: women get raped far more than men"

you: "well, if you include prison rape"

me: "i'm sorry, i meant *general society*, that clarification goes without saying"

you: "no, i'm still going to focus on male prison rape, completely unfucking related to this topic and this sub, because that fits my agenda of steering this conversation onto my stilted lies about prison raping having anything fucking at all to do with rape in general society"

that's this entire off topic pointless socially retarded conversationthe topic is a female athlete discussing her rape

you're changing the topic to push an agenda
i could not pee with that guy staring at memy "error" was not clarifying the simple fact that women are raped far more than men *in general society*, which goes without saying

do i have to include "on earth" as well because on arcturus nine the females rape the men during the third mating season?

the simple obvious clarification of "in general society" goes without saying, except for the possible appearance of someone hellbent on steer the conversation offtopic to prison rape, which has nothing at all to do with this topic, this thread, or this sub
i'm not deleting anything

the mods are wisely cleaning up the useless offtopic crap
&gt;Looks like they started with your crap. That's satisfying enough for me.

you really have a problem staying on topic

the point with you isn't talking about the topic at hand, the point for you is steering and changing the topic. that's your goal. and it includes personal insults

good luck to you. you need it

far more women are raped than men in general society

that's a solid, rock of gibraltar truth

if you have to go to prisons to stilt and warp the topic and the numbers, and steer the conversation to whatever chip you have on your shoulder, you are going to have a hard time in life

good luck to you, you need it
same director, same issue:

http://www.hollywoodreporter.com/news/terminally-ill-star-trek-fan-408899

obviously jj abrams shouls do this, and probably will do it, again

but i'm waiting for the other shoe to drop: the fanatic who fakes an illness to get a special screening in advance

mark my words, it's a simple extension of the psychological disorder of munchausen syndrome, this will happen

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Munchausen_syndrome



women get raped a lot more than men in general society. you understand that, right?

you might find inspiration in the stories of many families who have come before you, from other cultures than traditional islam even

the change from one culture to another can span several generations, and much of the most turbulent changes are focusing on your life. as a woman it is perhaps greater as the expectations placed on you by family and society are clashing in much more delicate ways

you are experiencing a greater range of freedom for women than your parents or grandparent ever knew or are comfortable with

this is going to be a large part of your life, and you are going to develop coping strategies

you should also realize this experience is going to give you great wisdom and insight to many conflicts in society, from politics to intimate clashes

it will be depressing at times, and always emotional

the best advice i can give you is to find a place where you can detach from it all and find some escape, on YOUR terms. then reenter the fray refreshed. you will need to do this. you will only make mistakes if in the thick and heat of things without escape you are pushed into something you later regret
well i have to escape the monotonous braindead whine of the delusion and denial i am arguing against somehow

no

you have a track record. you are proven to not be intellectually honest. you go off topic on purpose. it's a manipulation

go be controlling somewhere else. you're done
it's called reality. i am sorry reality is difficult for you. see if you can push past the denial and delusion and accept it and allow it to inform your opinions

well you are delusional. then i found a better thing to say to you to get through your delusion and i changed my comment. i didn't know you were page refreshing every 10 seconds

i never deleted a single comment

it's the mods. they are wisely deleting offtopic lies. no one is reading this thread except you and me, no one else can see it

this is the truth: you have a serious problem with accepting reality on this topic

women are raped far more than men **in general society**

that is the real truth

if you can't accept this, you are a dangerously deluded individual

please try to accept reality. you have nothing but dangerous lies informing your opinion currently

good luck
good point! i hope so and i think you're rightexactly, well said

if, for example, we're talking about arm strength, then most women will place behind most men

but this doesn't change the fact that there are a few women, say 1-10%, that could compete well. and there is no reason to disallow them from doing so

nevermind that in the wider range of athletic achievement there are many niches where women outperform men. anything having to do with balance, for example, women are naturally better balanced than men: lower center of gravity on average

and then some sports, like competitive shooting, there should be no difference whatsoever, and any barrier to women is outright misogyny plain and simple
i changed my comment in like 10 seconds to something less insulting and more enticing to coax you out of your denial

security theatre

i flew with one of these once by mistake:

http://www.amazon.com/Specialty-Knives-CC1SB-Credit-Companion/dp/B0001WOKWQ

got it as a gift, put it in my wallet and forgot about it. rather stupid, could have gotten in a lot of trouble

but it went through the xray unchallenged and only after i got home did i go "oh shit"



I'm cracking up here like an idiot. 

Thanks, completely hilarious.you want to change the topic to prison populations

the topic is general society

do you understand the difference?

if you do, do you understand that women get raped far more often than men in general society?

Thank you, good points.Correct.

My point is simply that an organization whose goal is murder and subjugation is potentially worse than one whose goal is just transportation.You could have a wide and deep competitition. A marathon for example. Just throw everyone out there and track female stats and male stats separately. But if a woman happened to excel past most of the men, that figures too. Best of both worlds.More like "yeah the old dutch rubber tree plantations. We've gone synthetic son, no need for latex anymore."

...oops, it was sumatra, not java:

https://youtu.be/8PgQDW9kbUQ

*Sumatra: "Island of Yesterday" 1920 Goodyear Rubber Plantations*run everyone together

track mens' winners

track women's winners

track overall winner

a woman (or man) could win women's and overall. not men and women
Wut doo u meen?you have to be uma thurman

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NL7nLSSSWjw

or *THE* big fat panda

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_RwP5cd1e0c
close enough?:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Umar_Farouk_Abdulmutallab

&gt;Two days after the attack, Abdulmutallab was released from a hospital where he had been treated for first and second degree burns to his hands, and second degree burns to his right inner thigh and genitalia, sustained during the attempted bombing.
because of the unabomber we can't drop packages off at collection boxes anymore, we have to go to the post office
it's not a system, it's the fault of weak willed and weak minded people

too many cowards would rather deal with placid lies than ugly truths

prideful ignorance means that for some, holding onto a wrong belief is better than admitting you were wrong, even with evidence presented: "i can't be wrong, so the world must be wrong"
Yeah I don't see much material with an Amy winehouse biopic. She sings slurs her words does drugs and dies. Very interesting. So very moving.Anyone in "Fargo."That's how he got his acting career. He screamed at Kubrick until he gave him the role.

&gt;R. Lee Ermey went to Stanley Kubrick and asked for the role of Gunnery Sgt. Hartmann. In his opinion, the actors on the set were not up to snuff. When Kubrick declined, Ermey barked an order for Kubrick to stand up when he was spoken to, and the director instinctively obeyed. Ermey got the role.

http://m.imdb.com/title/tt0093058/triviaI agree. Why we are glorifying a junkie who wasted her talents and her life?Exactly. I'm trying to care about a junkie who threw away her life. I am not sure why I ever would, or why anyone else would. It was an easily preventable tragedy. All Amy had to do was give the slightest fucking shit about her own life. And if she couldn't, why should I?Weird. I wrote the same comment a year from now.She's got the eye of the tiger, a fighter, dancing through the fire.TILIf you had no authority you'd have people having the same reactions. It just requires simple empty prideful ignorance. And denial.

Their reactions are evil. And mundane. Which makes it worse.Ever watch "Selena"? With Jennifer Lopez.

Excellent. I cried.

She had her dreams wipe open. She was working hard. And a deranged nutbag cuts her down.

But you can't have a compelling movie if the protagonist's daily struggle is to dry heave into the toilet and their dream is to get drunk at 9 AM.

The woman was empty and without any compelling features. She sang well. But she just a fucking useless drunk who sought to die. And did. Wasted potential. Why should we care?delusions of grandeur and paranoid schizophrenia

interesting combination
*yesss... yes I ammm...*

We are watching you! You will not foil our plans!

**ALL AGENT PROVOCATEURS ASSIGNED TO THIS SECTOR REPORT TO ILLUMINATI LIZARDOVERMIND BY 0900 {END TRANSMISSION}**his service has to do with grass, but not the kind on your lawn
i understand what he is saying, you can see a little more cragginess faces, not just lawrence of arabia panoramas. ok, i get it

but it's kinda like those audiophiles and their old vacuum tubes: the 0.001% better isn't worth the effort, and the amount of time spent raving about it is way overblown

there's an "emperor's new clothes" aspect to the appeal, it's more cultish, less actual technical superiority. even though the technical superiority is probably real, it's tiny and sleight and just not worth the effort

And this is when I begin to feel bad for making fun of the crazy person.

Get help please.You're right. It's kind of a faux serious, purposefully overwrought.https://www.quora.com/How-does-4k-cinema-compare-to-70mm-filmThe simple point is that some drug addicts are awful people that are drain on others around them in all ways: financial, emotional, social, etc.

Not all of them. Definitely some of them. Probably most of them. There's nothing glamorous or deep or interesting about drug adiction. It's just fucking stupid and needs to be gotten over any way possible. Of course, a lot of self-absorbed types don't understand this and think they're in some sort of movie.If it were legal there would still be overdoses. You build up a tolerance and you need more to get a high, until you are flirting with life threatening doses.

The problem is the drug use itself and the users themselves, not society's legal policies, however good or bad. Society should treat it as a healthcare issue, not jail, but society can only do so much.Opiates are the brain's chemical language of reward pathways.

When you take an opiate you are manipulating your brains basic functions.

That certainly matters. Anyone can easily become addicted to it. The problem is the actual drug, the actual chemical.
If you tied someone to a chair and regularly fed them opiates they would become addicts. Anyone. The brain adjusts it's chemistry to the input and becomes dependent on it.

No one is immune to the basic fundamental chemistry of the brain.

It's like saying some people need water and some don't. No, everyone needs water. It's basic and biological.

The biological effects of opiates is likewise just basic chemistry. Use it and your body adjusts to it in such a way that if you stop using it you suffer. You are dependent.Exactly.

It's a troll.

And probably a successful one as these "BOYCOTT WHARGARBBBL" types are so self-righteous it's easy to trigger them.

Apparently reddit now is not into appreciating a good troll, it has to be anal retentive about the accuracy of the note. The mob is fickle.
you mean say nasty things to her? that's the same as a bullet?

Carson thinks he's on the History Channel and Trump thinks he's on The Apprentice
Well said.OH MAN. HOW COULD I MISS THAT.

This submission is a disgrace.NoiceI'm certain that helped feed her problems. It's still not a story of triumph or a tragedy. It's just a litany of weakness and low character.

I'm not sure who this story would appeal to as a moviewatcher.That's not for you to say.

You don't have the right to downplay someone's concerns about what is theirs. Not yours. They may indeed have very stupid reasons to think one thing or another about the use of their cells. It's still their cells. You simply do not have the right.

Your attitude shows a level of arrogance and patronization that is somewhat concerning considering your profession. Be careful. Do not transgress against another's autonomy. I don't care the fucking reason or how stupid the protestations or the stakes.It's not vague at all. Your body is yours.

You have no fucking right to transgress against someone's autonomy. I don't care how noble your reasons, how petty the stakes, how scatterbrained the protestations. You simply do not have the fucking right. That is the road to hell right there, to find reason to ignore the will and desire of people over their own bodies.&gt; I don't think moral concessions should be made for every little thing if no actual harm is being done to a person. Hell, sometimes we don't even adhere to the bodily autonomy to people we don't agree with purely because we think that belief is stupid (e.g. Jehovah's witnesses)

i'm glad you don't plan on acting on it

don't even fucking think about it

you're a human being not a robot. i've seen the god complex in action. you need the swift kick in the ass to keep you in line
i have no doubt she never stood a chance. i've seen this happen to people. my anger is pretty much for the whole scene, the "lifestyle," not just amy. unfortunately a biopic of her is part of the glorification of this lifestyle if it doesn't very clearly lay the blame for her death at the foot of this bullshit attitude towards drugs, or at least very squarely shows the giant sucking noise that accompanies this slow motion suicide

there's nothing glamorous or deep or interesting about drug addiction. it's just fucking stupid and needs to be gotten over any way possible

but a lot of self-absorbed types don't understand this and think they're in some sort of movie. and so to have an actual movie about that actual hell, unless it clearly says "this is hell" is without a point in seeing. it appeals to these self-absorbed types in a dangerous way. it helps create more amys

if it is very clearly a cautionary tale, i can get behind it
Ethiopia was never colonized. It successfully fended off all European imperials. 

Oh wait, I'm supposed to write a star wars joke. Uh...Thank you Mr. AnglocanadianYeah. A lot of countries fell under that spell unfortunately.Ethiopians didn't do that. Jamaicans did. Haile Selassie was coopted into rastafarianism, he didn't make the religion.No that's mansa musa, clearly an imperial. That was wwii era fascist bullshit. A lot of countries were invaded but that's not colonization. Did the germans "colonize" the french or the dutch? Yes Italy beat "abyssinia" in war but didn't hold onto it long enough to make a colonial govt. That was a military occupation.Thank you!You know. Many people dont.you mean having national pride? yeah, they need to respect that only ignorant rednecks are entitled to that. even though many rednecks stand for values which actually go against what makes their country great, like tolerance
no whoosh

more like

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Poe%27s_law
his assUgghWell saidNope. You're selling the lie. Fat people hate for example was just plain bullying. It probably would hurt reddit financially, that's True. but what is a lie is that that is why reddit banned it

"muh freedumb"...

Fuck your freedom if all you can do is bully and hate. That's the real attack on freedoms: creating a social environment where people are ridiculed and hated for arbitrary reasons that are just ignorant insecurity by the bully.Yeah "90% New Footage" would have been a better title.

Not complaining though OP, you did good!

Domo arigato!"IT'S JUST A PRANK BRO, CHILL"

I'm sorry you had to deal with that evil bullshit.there are many examples though of chains and brands dying off in one country, maybe even the country that created the brand/ chain, but living on in another

my favorite example is shakey's pizza

sort of the original pizza hut in its day, it's mostly faded away in the usa today

go to the philippines however and it rules that country in its sector, you see them everywhere to this day

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shakey%27s_Pizza

&gt;At the time Hunt International bought Shakey's in 1974, the restaurant chain had approximately 500 stores throughout the United States, including a store as far east as Cockeysville, Maryland.

&gt;As of November 1, 2013, there are 54 Shakey's Pizza restaurants in the U.S. Fifty U.S. locations are in California (all but one in Southern California), and the remainder are located in Auburn, Alabama; Waipahu, Hawaii; Renton, Washington; Pasco, Washington; and Spokane, Washington.[3] There are six locations in the Greater Mexico City metro area.

&gt;Philippines[edit]

&gt;The brand became a particularly well-established franchise in the Philippines,[4] where it began in 1975 under the ownership of the country's largest company, the San Miguel Corporation, primarily promoting their draft beer. Beginning with a restaurant on Makati Avenue in Makati, the brand expanded rapidly in Metro Manila, with most of the restaurants offering live music. San Miguel had difficulty maintaining the consistency of the branches, and ultimately sold the franchise in 1987 to International Family Food Services Inc., a group led by sports executive Leo Prieto. By 1997 the brand had evolved into mostly a fast-food franchise. Beginning in 2003, the company began a "reengineering" of the brand as a family-oriented casual dining brand. As of early 2015 there were 153 Shakey's outlets in the Philippines, more than double the number remaining in the United States.[5][6]

nope, you don't understand freedom. freedom doesn't exist without responsibility. what you want is freedom FROM responsibility, which is a road that leads to no freedoms anywhere

you have the immature understanding of freedom: "i can do whatever i want, who gives a fuck who i hurt." this attitude actually erodes freedom

the mature understanding of freedom is the only thing that maintains and extends freedom: "i can do whatever i want, as long as i don't hurt anyone else"

&gt;&gt;the power or right to act, speak, or think as one wants without hindrance or restraint

exactly. and something like fat people hate CREATES the hindrance and restraint you stand against. think

Tl, DR: grow the fuck up, you're immature

who is she crying over in the final shot, is that Finn?

does Kylo Ren defeat Finn and she takes up his saber?

disclaimer: complete bullshit speculation

nope, that was a military occupation in wwii

germany conquered the netherlands and france. does that mean germany "colonized" france and the netherlands in wwii?
i agree with you, good analysis

i'm adding the completely baseless speculation she picks up his saber and finshes Kylo Ren

this trailer focuses on her character, she's a major one. she will do something big

what is the cognate of imperial? empire. an empire is an extended occupation/ colonization/ digestion/ absorption. italy did not do that in "abyssinia" when it was there for a few months
they were never colonized. that was my point. you're ignoring my original point and substituting your own. you don't make a valid point by changing the topic
well said but i know this with absolute certainty:

freedom does not exist without responsibility

a country of responsible people is ultimate freedom

a country of irresponsible people becomes authoritarian: people will want security from the constant transgressions and if the people themselves can't provide that then a central powerful state will grow in power as people demand protection (even as they may act irresponsibly at the same time and not make the connection)

your understanding is at a higher order and is nuanced. but there does exist those who don't understand the need for responsibility to have freedom, and there are plenty of such immature losers whining about "freedumb". and for them there is nothing but loss of freedom: that they create, and that they will eventually experience as the inevitable result of their irresponsibility

right, you're talking about the loss of darth maul

well, maybe she just spanks him so bad he runs off

so darth vader spinning off into empty space, not darth maul getting sliced in two
go back. read my complete comment. don't take the last few words out of context

you don't make a valid point by misrepresenting someone else'sif you transgress against another's freedoms, you deserve and will receive a loss of freedom

this is why jails and prisons still exist in free lands: not all freedom destruction comes from evil big bad govt, some of it comes from the irresponsible douchebags around you

if you spend your freedom limiting other's freedoms, then freedom is extended by denying you your freedom

"i can drink and drive, i don't hurt anyone else"

"i can blast my music at 3 AM, that's my freedom"

"i can smoke inside, fuck everyone else, this is my freedom"

"my dog shit on your lawn yeah. are you denying me my freedom?"

see the problem? some morons think freedom means freedom FROM responsibility, and these are people that deserve to lose their freedom in order to maintain and extend our own

it is not possible to respect people that disrespect freedom. they must be contained to maintain freedom. tragedy of the commons

well he's already the minister of silly walks, and a goofy walking lemur named in honor of that title is fitting

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IqhlQfXUk7w
&gt;I am not talking about physical addiction. I am talking about the disease of addiction.

there's no such thing as one without the other

your second paragraph is absurd. the detoxed person is the same person battling such thoughts
does anyone? you think the reality of a situation stops glorification?LOL

i want to see han solo put someone, anyone, in carbonite
i wonder what haile selassie thought about rastafarianism?
Actually reddit runs this place. If they don't want a forum devoted to ignorant hate, they can shut it the fuck down and you have no recourse. This website is run by a private entity and they can do whatever the fuck they want with it.

Oh certainly, if they do something stupid they hurt their brand. And people will leave.

But getting rid of hate in most people's eyes is a positive move, despite the smaller population of morons who see nothing wrong with bullying.

&gt;You don't have a "freedom" from others disapproving of your lifestyle and talking about it on a forum that you can simply chose not to go to. 

I couldn't have said it better myself. I'm glad you understand what people think of bullies.

Are they huge in Japan?

I've only been to the Filipino Shakeys.

I'm American and I've never been to an American one!Time for a brand resurgence!I'm an American but I've only been to Shakeys in the Philippines. All I can say is thank God for Shakeys because I was losing weight dealing with the culture shock of Filipino food. God bless Filipinos and the Philippines, I love their country. I have an open mind. But my stomach is a staunch closed minded American douchebag. I couldn't eat the food. So when I saw pizza at Shakeys I was saved from fasting.Nice!an internet forum like reddit does not function well if fear and intimidation based on hate reigns. reddit is a private website and they can do whatever the fuck they want. if they choose to ban moronic hate for a better experience that people will want to continue using, that's completely their right

if they hurt their brand with a bad move, people will leave the site, that's True. but i think you'll find cutting out the deranged hate is something most people will support. yes, a smaller population of morons who see nothing wrong with bullying will protest, but fuck them

because this whole "if you don't like it, go somewhere else" applies more specifically to asshole bullies than it does to offended people

it's like this: you can't have it both ways

if you traffic in hate, you are not immune to the same consequences of hate that you say other people should just endure. but somehow you don't have to endure. freedom is not a magic wrapper from the consequences of hate. if you hate on people, people will want to disassociate from you. and since this is a private website, that is exactly what happens, and welcome to the consequences of hate

nothing about freedom of speech protects you from the inevitable social consequences of hate speech

so what you're saying is you can manipulate the basic chemistry of the brain and make someone physically need a chemical to save the person from pure agony

...and that has nothing to do with the desire to get the chemical to relieve that agony

got it

you're trying to separate one concept into two
the essential blindness of haters is that they don't understand social disapproval applies to them too

if they hate on fat people, they exclude, harass, and deny fat people the right to free social exchange, fat people get all this static in their faces designed to alienate, exclude, and bully them

this is unfair because there is no reason to do that to a person just because they are fat

but if people turn the tables and apply the same social disapproval and social disassociation bullies apply to other people, but this time for a good reason, suddenly the bullies are whining that it's unfair

like we have to sit here and listen to their hate, and have no right to push it away, exactly as haters push away fat people

"you have the right to go the fuck away if you don't like what's being discussed here"

ok

well that applies just as much to you, you bullying assholes

go away. reddit doesn't want you. this is a private website. they can do whatever the fuck they want. if they make a bad decision, they suffer because people will leave. but most people don't mind squelching the ignorant hate by morons. because it degrades the free exchange here with mindless stupidity

you are more than welcome to start your own site and hate on fat people all day. have fun! good fucking riddance
you act like prioritizing the seeking of good feelings over all else: friends, family, job, etc., is some sort of weird brain alteration

you're describing the majority of the human race

if not all of it, if you realize the difficulty we all have maintaining delayed gratification, especially when a foreign chemical sits on the balance scale with a 10 ton ass

for most, we understand responsibilities and temporarily denied joy and happiness. but if you amped up that joy and happiness with an artificial drug, now you're dealing with the vast, vast majority turned into drug seeking assholes that ignore job and family

what you describe is not some weird "their brains are different." you're describing the default human condition, especially fragile when artificially amped up externally supplied fundamental brain chemistry. do you understand how susceptible we ALL are to that?

i'll grant you that some stoic monk somewhere has some superhuman ability to suspend basic human joy. but what you consider a strange aberration is actually 99% of humanity. you fail to understand the peril here of using an opiate. it is EXTREMELY addictive
interesting. i wonder if rastas suppress those words of his
Look at your last sentence. Try to reconcile it with the rest of what you wrote.

If you feed someone joy in a pill, and they feel awful without it, they will do all they can to get that pill. What is so hard for you to understand and admit about that?There are no truths in Internet memes, just reinforcement of pedestrian ideas. Some profound. Some lame.

Don't take it personally. It's not like the world has a hard on for Rick Astley.Every exaddict carries around that weakness their whole lives. All you are describing is an ex addict who hasn't hit a rough patch yet. A broken relationship. A lost job. Thoughts will turn to a fix. It's simple human nature. Look at Philip Seymour hoffman.

You carry a weakness with you. Don't ever give into it. Some people do. there's nothing special nor different from them and me and you.i was going to correct your misspelling to carbon**i**te

but then the thought of boba fett in a fizzy baking soda bath and cleaning off that armor sounds good
wtf?

True but weird: "shakey" is the nickname of the founder, because he had a neurodegenerative condition

this is obviously a restaurant name from before the days of political correctness
so you will never ever have a down time again in your life

and if, no way! you do have such a dark time, you are completely immune to any thought or weakness due to despondency

right?

no: such a dark feeling or dark thought of hopelessness and bleakness is only for people with strange brain formations, right?

you're completely immune, right?

if you think you'll never get in a car accident, you'll probably drive recklessly because you think you're invulnerable. and you'll probably get in an accident

but if you think you can get in a car accident you drive cautiously and so probably won't get in an accident

that's the only proper attitude to the possibility of relapse

you need to check yourself. your hubris is a fatal flaw. you're human. you're weak. we all are

i'm genuinely worried about you. you are not immune to relapse
or she just beats kylo ren badly, not necessarily killing him. the darth vader spinning out into space model, not the slice darth maul in half model
Best thing I read all week.i like susugusto ko ng malaking susuit's insulting to everyone who wants fairness
The while enterprise is fluff, yes, but that women are shortchanged is a valid complaint.Ah yes, the concept of fairness, a jokeHiw can I possibly doubt that in regards to your unquestionable authority on the topic.Another good theory.do dildos make good stocking stuffers? *ehem*

there's always unfairness, and always the desire to make things more fair. which side are you on?
why does it have to be exact?

if i make $100 and do roughly as much work as you but you make $10, you can talk about unfairness

Batman looks definitely upset about that bananaInclude that measurement. It's still obviously unfair.

Why are you so hellbent on explaining an obviously unfair situation away for extraneous reasons?In my example you can see my point. There is obviously a grey area. But there is a point where the incomes can be so different any idiot can see its unfair.proof of not caring is not commenting

for the rest of us, it's not hard to care about the basic concept of fairness
oh, negotiation. that's the ONLY factor. rightyes, like trotsky died of a headachesomeone outlived their usefulness and became a liabilitya religion begins to die when those who want to embrace are outnumbered by those who want to exclude
Ben Carson is running for president of the History Channel, impressing stoners and crackpots everywhere with his knowledge of Ancient Alienswhy accept reality and change your beliefs when you can deny reality and shoot the messengers?
&gt;Dorian Nakamoto

&gt;The highest-profile speculation to date came in a March 6, 2014, article in the magazine Newsweek,[34] when journalist Leah McGrath Goodman identified Dorian Prentice Satoshi Nakamoto, a Japanese American man living in California, whose birth name is Satoshi Nakamoto,[34][35][36] as the Nakamoto in question. Besides his name, Goodman pointed to a number of facts that circumstantially suggested he was the bitcoin inventor.[34] Trained as a physicist, Nakamoto worked as a systems engineer on classified defense projects and computer engineer for technology and financial information services companies. According to his daughter, Nakamoto was laid off twice in the early 1990s and turned libertarian, encouraging her to start her own business and "not be under the government's thumb." In the article's seemingly biggest piece of evidence, Goodman wrote that when she asked him about bitcoin during a brief in-person interview, Nakamoto seemed to confirm his identity as the bitcoin founder by stating: "I am no longer involved in that and I cannot discuss it. It's been turned over to other people. They are in charge of it now. I no longer have any connection."[34] (This quote was later confirmed by deputies at the Los Angeles County Sheriff's Department who were present at the time.)[37]

come on, the actual Satoshi Nakamoto is the legendary Satoshi Nakamoto
It's him. Too many "coincidences." The idea of keeping an open mind is not to have it so open your brain falls out. We've left the realm of possible here and are in the realm of probable.More like 50 to 500. Then you see what the problem is.YesWhat area do you live in so I can make sure to never drive there.There's doubt then fatal indecisiveness. We are far into the realm of probability here.
LolDuuude... aliens!politics is never about snapping your fingers and suddenly the whole country is in ideological agreement with you

politics is about thousands of hand grabbing the steering wheel of a ship and moving the giant boat slightly more left or slightly more right

so when that giant boat starts going slightly more in your direction, you indeed celebrate

you don't show your political naivete by saying that because the "real" ideological center is not as *you* determine it should be, you will be crossing your arms and tut tutting
exactly. i was like "is this somewhere upstate? near rochester or syracuse maybe?"

naah, it's a store in brooklyn

thank you for the appetizing sandwich OP, but you confuse a brother
Duuude...

-Oh who am kidding I can't keep up this charade. Ben Carson is a slightly creepy nutjob and the really scary thing is how many people in this country take him seriously.ThanksSimple economics means some people will pay more to guarantee a trip when everyone wants one. So the price is higher for you too or they take someone else because someone else is willing to pay what you won't.

Unless you are saying Uber is sleazy and declaring surges when there is no surge.it's a state of mind
As a New Yorker, posting this TIL is more like an opportunity to crap on Texas's lawn, so...
Don't mess with Texas?
why the hell did you invite Florida to this party?i'm not a conspiracy theorist, and i'm not paranoid, but i wouldn't be surprised if an epidemic of mysterious origin takes care of that "problem" some time in the future
the new game is grammar

/u/irishprime has secured a spot in the utopiadome

/u/mr_evil_msc has been demoted to the epidemic zone
shhh... don't feed the trollentendreYeah the problem isn't ignorance, or distrust. We all have a healthy level of distrust. And we all are ignorant of something.

The problem is *prideful* ignorance: "I don't know something and I will actively make sure to keep things that way". And a pathological level of distrust that is unhealthy locks these people in the eternal damnation of stupidity. Not the empty insult "stupidity," the objectively factual determination that these people are simply dumb.

I mean we all don't know something. The best we can do is keep an open mind to the possibility we can be wrong. It's when you close your mind with "I know everything I don't trust you and go away with your evidence" have you become a genuinely, objectively dumb stupid person.It's ok to doubt somebody and distrust them. But then you have to do the homework yourself to support your belief. But they don't do that. Their belief remains, untouched and unquestioned, with absolutely nothing to support it.

Well, that's not really the case: they have their own "trusted sources": angry voices on the radio, other crackpots on Internet forums, their cousin Ned, whatever. 

What makes that a better more trustworthy source than scientific methods and rigidly researched academic history?There's a natural and normal amount of distrust.

Then there is a delusional and self destructive level of distrust.

It's a common argument against this sort of prideful ignorance and pathological distrust.Yeah its a genuine til. If you're not from Texas it's news. I tried to make a dumb joke about it and my comment is currently -9. Dear texans: I actually don't want to crap on your lawn.the problem with libertarianism is irresponsibility. not that libertarians are irresponsible, but that irresponsible people ruin libertarianism, making it not work. there is a direct correlation between freedom and responsibility. a country of responsible people is a free country with little need for government. a country of irresponsible people pretty much needs an intrusive bloated authoritarian government to keep society working

so as long as we have people who think freedom means freedom FROM responsibility, rather than what freedom actually is: freedom AND responsibility, then we will have govt that is heavier than people like

the next time you see someone litter, you've just met the reason why we need government
that's a different topic

the lone, self-embellishing douchebag is easy to distrust. like brian williams

but you can't really distrust the weight of 99% of historians in all the serious universities in the world. which is what you have to do to doubt the moon landing or the holocaust

there's a natural and normal amount of distrust

then there is a delusional and self destructive level of distrust
The wisest man in the world knows for an absolute fact that he doesn't know everything.

The dumbest fool in the world knows for an absolute fact that he knows everything.
as a new yorker i thought it was bravado
yes, what you say is True for complex topics and complex statements about those topics

like economics

someone deeply studying economics can find exceptions to simple and facile things most of us say about economic concepts

but if you're talking about simple flat statements of simple fact: the holocaust happened, or that we landed on the moon, then there's not much deep study and there's not much complexity *in the simple statement of fact itself*

so to believe the holocaust didn't happen for example, is not to go against simple herd mentality, which indeed can be wrong, but it is to go against 99.99% of sober historians and academics from all of the serious universities in the free world

yes, most atheists are ignorant of religious texts

but knowledge of the litany of details in the written experiences of some ancient desert tribes really doesn't prove or disprove the central disagreement between atheists and believers
right, but distrusting one lone douchebag is different than distrusting thousands of academics in agreement
get them young enough, link the lie to their pride and their identity, and repeat it over and over, and you can lead millions to willful slaughter on the wave of your hand

interesting

there's a psychological study there: devise a metric for a certain kind of psychic pain, and test different political leanings for the level of "pain" they experience when exposed to ideas outside their own

this would explain the inability of some to reconsider beliefs, and perhaps be the underlying psychological predictor for what someone's political leanings will be
you're describing a failure of character. a low character will consider themselves very highly, beyond a level of simple confidence, into a realm of fatal hubris. arrogance, blind pride
 You think there's no value in talking to someone who was actually at the historical event?rejection of ignorance is not also a form of ignorance

9/11 truthers' thinking is based on "evidence" that has been discredited. it's not that people can't dispute your "evidence" it's that they already have and you haven't looked for it. and they get tired of dealing with such willful ignorance and all you have left is your echo chamber of fellow crackpots

but i'll engage in some intellectual charity since you asked for it:

go ahead, give me one bit of "evidence" that you think the sane world hasn't examined yet

(i said one bit, please do not vomit your entire screed, i'm not dealing with madness)

i'll debunk it right here
yes, someone can question certain events in what is called collectively the holocaust, that's fair

but are they just going "no, i don't believe that" and then fold their arms in prideful ignorance?

or do they actually do the research and investigate for themselves that aspect they don't believe?

most of them just reject itare you talking about the injection of african americans with syphilis?
it's not just a quirk, in many ways it is the root of much if not most evil in the world
the motivation of someone bearing witness to a horror that subjugated them in ways that completely stripped them of their basic humanity and dignity, so that it should never happen again

is completely different than the motivation of a buzzed douchebag telling some bullshit that makes him look awesome and only impresses equally stupid chicks

if you're "agnostic" on basic truths of the reality you live in you're still pretty dumbthat's a good point, but on some extremely basic questions, like the moon landing or the holocaust happening, there really isn't much difference between a "skeptic" (the term used in the context of that one fact as if it conveys some sort of respectability) and a denier
lolthen they have to show their work. do the historical research and prove it

they can't just cover their ears and say "no" when those who document the holocaust show their verified facts looked at by many different academics

are you talking about the alamo?

sorry new yorker here, have no idea what this refers tobut it's without a shred of intellectual honesty, whether due to their cognitive feebleness, or their unwillingness to consider facts which destroy their entire argument, and only pick and choose what supports their position, a sort of extreme obsessive stubbornness that is a character flaw

the whole "airplane fuel can't melt steel beams" bullshit for example: talk to any materials scientist about what happens to steel at the temperatures that were burning that day, and steel deforms and loses it's mechanical strength. that should end the conversation, as you say, but they SELECTIVELY ignore that and immediately change the topic to the next shakey leg in their willfully ignorant bullshit

prideful ignoranceknowledge of the litany of details about the lives of ancient desert tribes doesn't support, or refute, any position on the central question that atheists and believers differ on
and they aren't providing any verified researched facts of their own. they just go "nuh uh" and cross their arms when presented with the multiply verified facts by serious academics. willful ignorancei hope your approach is in the minority

it's almost as if exposing kids to these horrors immunizes society from it ever happening again

but if your attitude prevails, something like the holocaust can happen again, because people don't know and will have forgotten
how does reading a long litany of details about ancient desert tribes prove or disprove the central question beleivers and atheists disagree on?
interesting. i have much to learn, i'll look it up

edit: found it:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Come_and_take_it
yup

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/False_balance

&gt;Other examples of False balance in reporting on science issues include the topics of man-made vs. natural climate change, the relation between Thiomersal and autism[5] and evolution vs. intelligent design.[6] For instance, although the scientific community attributes a component of climate change of the last 50\u2013100 years, particularly global warming, to the effects of the industrial revolution,[7][8][9][10] there are a small number of scientists who dispute this conclusion.[11][12][13] Giving equal voice to scientists on both sides makes it seem like there is a serious disagreement within the scientific community, when in fact there is an overwhelming scientific consensus favoring anthropogenic global warming.

&gt;False balance can sometimes originate from similar motives as sensationalism, where producers and editors may feel that a story portrayed as a contentious debate will be more commercially successful than a more accurate account of the issue. However, unlike most other media biases, False balance may actually stem from an attempt to avoid bias; producers and editors may confuse treating competing views fairly\u2014i.e., in proportion to their actual merits and significance\u2014with treating them equally, giving them equal time to present their views even when those views may be known beforehand to be based on False information.[14]and i'm getting downvoted. a shame about the denial out there
you have to make a coherent argument in support of your position

"here, go read this" is not an argument, it's avoidance

i'm asking for one piece, one simple piece of evidence you think has not been discredited

go ahead and type it here

i'm waiting

i think i'll be waiting for a long time
yup

and it's exactly why science is the foundation of modern civilization
you're not stealing anything, it's not mine
i'd want my kid to be there for the flat earth theorist

so they can learn about this very topic we are discussing: prideful ignorance, the danger of people who hold onto willfully ignorant pseudonarratives in spite of all evidence to the contrary

it would be a wonderful learning experience for my kid, the existence of these kinds of people, and this kind of danger that exists out there for their own unexamined beliefs

you missed the whole point of my comment: the only way to truth and reality is to have your beliefs constantly challenged. question everything. ask "why" about every assumed fact

it is those who never want their beliefs challenged that are the problem
there are libertarians that are freedom loving and responsible

such a person should open their eyes and look around them at weep at their betrayal by all the irresponsible immature douchebags calling themselves libertarians, and thus proving the ideology incompatible with human nature

this is getting messy
Your parents are visiting. Stop. They will arrive 1400 Thursday. Stop. Please buy the macaroni. Stop. No, STOP!
everyone reading this is thinking what the trauma surgeon chief thoughtyeah but the fighting comes later&gt; He read that some of the substances were volatile, so decided to wear a welders mask whilst cooking his drugs - however he was wearing a singlet top, shorts and flip flops.

druggie logic&gt; Blew my fucking mind.

didn't blow hisThey tried to make me go to rehab, I said, "no, no, no"
no, the problem is they haven't gone cold yet
yeah but how metal is it (heh) to get your iron from a rusty nail in an apple?
it's called hypocrisy

like most "strong beliefs" (abortion, treatment of gays) the belief goes away when someone is seriously troubled compromised or threatened by a situation that breaking the belief will relieve

you'd think the experience would open their eyes but many go right back to preaching ignorance

many people don't have real morality, just shallow easy judgment and "do as i say not as i do" hypocrisy
no, this is frogger ball

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SiPCmKvgDQo

(attempted by at least one person in real life after seeing this movie, resulting in their death and this scene being deleted)

the scene is from a 1993 football movie starring James Caan, Halle Berry, Omar Epps:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Program_(1993_film)

&gt;The film originally included a scene in which Kane reads aloud comically "It says here that I'm good under pressure," while holding a Sports Illustrated college football preview issue with him on the front cover. He then lies down the middle of a road on the yellow line as cars barely pass him at highway speeds. Several team members who are at first trying to stop Kane decide that it is a test of their bravery and team unity and join him. Influenced by the film, several teenagers imitated this scene and were either killed or suffered injuries. This resulted in the scene being removed from the film after its release.[1] A brief clip of the scene in question showing team members lying in the street had already been aired repeatedly in the television commercials for the film and therefore captured on VCRs. Later versions of the trailer had the offending clip removed.

&gt;The only known home video release with this scene intact is the Hong Kong laserdisc published by Taishan International. This version of the film is three minutes longer than the theatrical cut and clocks in at a 115-minute run time.science is nothing but "this is the best explanation we have for what we have observed" and the True scientific method welcomes all challenges to all scientific theories at any time from any direction

but we're humans

there is human tendency to doubt any challenge to well-established thinking

in some ways it is psychologically normal as a lot of challenges can be crackpot stuff and we don't have the time to wade through every challenge and so the immediate response is to dismiss it

only after repeated challenges with validity, and yet still rejection, can you say that we are talking about dogma

but it does exist

an example: australian scientists barry marshall and robin warren

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Robin_Warren

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Barry_Marshall

when they proposed that helicobactor pylori causes ulcers in the 1980s, going against well-established belief that peptic ulcers were caused by noninfectious reasons, they were met with scorn, ridicule, and rejection at first by the scientific community. many doctors rejected the concept for years

they were eventually vindicated, and received the nobel prizes in medicine. but there was a period where dogma reigned, and valid new discovery was dismissed

there always is a period of healthy skepticism. but when healthy skepticism lags and becomes inertia, for some, it's now unhealthy skepticism, dogma

this is really a commentary on the fact that even scientists are human, the notion of science itself is separate. because to science's credit, unlike religion and ideologies, any dogma can go away quickly and get uprooted extremely fast. in fact, since they won the nobel, it shows that science appreciates and celebrates successful challenges to longstanding well entrenched beliefs

&gt; His music transformed a B-level sci-fi film. 

*steps back, ducks, covers head, looks left and right for quickly incoming enraged star wars fans*
like showing high schoolers before prom night traumatic pictures of the results of drinking and driving, i think it should be a law to show antivaxxers pictures of medical conditions that were common before vaccines
it was a very well done space opera with a new kind of tone

honestly, you're confusing the original with all the imitators that came after

there's a reason why we all know "star wars" and barely anyone knows, "krull" for instance

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Krull_(film)

and yes, there's "flash gordon", etc. but a movie like that isn't the same tone

i saw a comment by a kid who just watched "aliens" the other day that it was a rip off of some video game that came out decades later

of course, "aliens" was the original tone that was ripped off a thousand times in movies and video games later. but to someone raised in that genre, "aliens" feels like just another riff on the same tired old tone

people have a problem with hindsight. that facts we have now, that the "star wars" tone is effective and works the way it does, is something everyone knows, or knew

"star wars" was truly groundbreaking and new in a big way. it was not a b grade movie. it was THE archetypical space opera of a serious tone, not a goofy or playful one

"those who can't do, teach" is the classic put down

the more accurate statement is "those who do can't explain what they do, so someone else must teach"

recently discussed on /r/science

/r/science/comments/3qpaw9/a_new_study_finds_feeling_like_youre_an_expert/

**"Feeling like you're an expert can make you closed-minded"**yeah it's pretty amazing that no one thought that imitation might make this scene extremely dangerous

but that's hindsight, and i'm sure scripts are vetted for scenes like this nowadays
Whenever people make fake allegations of rape or molestation because they're irresponsible turds who don't want to face consequences like the shitbag in the video, they cast doubt on real accusations of rape and molestation.

Like crimes that are motivated by racism or religious bigotry can carry extra charges as hate crimes, I think False accusations like these should carry extra charges. Oftentimes the fake accuser gets away with no punishment.

We have to send a strong signal as a society that False accusations are no joke and should not be taken lightly.Accusations of molestation during an incident completely caught on camera.

Lying douchebags are so very smart.Yeah but you're talking about the Carl Sagans of the world, the guys who explain what you do to everyone else. In many ways all the fame, funding, support, and respect for what you do is derived from the efforts of people you just disrespected.
There's people out there with odd, sometimes disturbing opinions on rape and molestation. I triggered some sort of negative reaction in them with my comment. Who knows.Ah a jediIt is.

And no one remembers it.Autocorrect, you so funny.They all are this same kid. It's only a matter of time.It's actually more fantasy space opera than sci fi but there were thousands of serious sci fi movies before. Sci fi was used for camp but very serious themes were explored for decades in many genres, especially tv with the twilight zone, star trek, etc.

Heck one of the first movies ever made was a serious sci fi space film:

https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/A_Trip_to_the_Moon


But to someone raised on so much sci fi and games that rips off the aliens tone and mood, it feels like just another clone. So the original groundbreaking classic can seem meh to someone who has seen it time and again in other derivative forms. unlike someone who saw it in the original mind blowing breakout cinema like nothing else before.

It's kind of tragic for the kid, something sad about all of us, and something very special for those of us who saw the original in its time.
the problem is so many did imitate it and so many would continue imitating it

so if the studio didn't immediately delete the scene, there would be lawsuits

people would blame the movie

i agree with you spirit but reality dictates otherwise


&gt;it made it into something that was highly marketable instead of being thought of as just for nerds

i stopped reading there. that's ridiculous. maybe you can say that about jules verne, but sci fi has been mainstream or aiming for mainstream since the very invention of film. yes, subcultures exist, but the mainstream angle has always been on the radar

here's another example:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Metropolis_(1927_film)

pretty much female c3po, also deemed a god at one point
you nailed it

thank youfookin casuals
ed wood does not approveand when it finally all melts and runs together, you get something bizarre and wonderful like this:

https://youtu.be/AIXUgtNC4Kc?t=1m47s
Oh ice pirates was awesome. But it was purposefully camp, not serious like star warsLol

I played the boardgamehttps://youtu.be/bZ_3eIn-0SoWOLVERINES!!!How do you fight copycat apps that rip off your code?-safeway

-safeway

-safeway

-safeway

-safeway

-safeway

-home depot... yeaah boyyy!
it was negative for awhile

the fickle hivemind of reddit
exactly!they're not really stupid as in low iq, they're stupid as in a psychology disorder where they are addicted to adrenaline and/ or cannot experience fear
here, in new york, completely unknown

does it treat carpal tunnel syndrome or does it give you carpal tunnel syndrome?A nice stocking stuffer!

Hmmm...Why are we giving attention to this harpy douchebag?It's trolling. Real life trolling. They tailor their comments to provoke outrage. Because it feeds their fame / infamy (no difference).

And like online, the only way to win is to not feed the troll.Yes, that ecosystem is part of a media echo chamber for certain brain dead partisans.

Are we part of that echo chamber?

Ignore the crap.no she's not. it's pedestrian bullshit. there's plenty of equally talented trolls commenting on reddit in this sub. she got lucky with a big exposure and rode it all the way to the bank. let the shitbag fade away(snicker)yes. paid to troll. so wonderfulyup. they react. and help spread the virus. they are almost more of the problem then troll themselves

the troll doesn't exist without the trolled
yes, exactly. let the shitbag fade away. the only fitting reaction is nothing. rewarding the piece of shit with irrelevancy
She knows how to troll.

Stop being trolled.There's no coordination. Brain dead partisans simply attack and attack.Dude you're really freaking us out.

You're acting rather blase about happenings that would set major alarm bells off for most people.

It's either an entertaining gag on all of us or you have a fatal obliviousness.low res boobs?

so i tagged nsfw, but it seems like overkill
i agree, i think i'm overreacting

mods did i do good or did i overreact?
found here (at bottom)

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Wood_of_the_Self-Murderers:_The_Harpies_and_the_Suicides

&gt;The harpies in Dante's version feed from the leaves of oak trees which entomb suicides. At the time Canto XIII (or The Wood of Suicides) was written, suicide was considered by the church as at least equivalent to murder, and a contravention of the Commandment "Thou shalt not kill". Many theologians believed it to be a deeper sin than murder, as it constituted a rejection of God's gift of life.[4] Dante describes a tortured wood infested with harpies, where the act of suicide is punished by encasing the offender in a tree, thus denying eternal life and damning the soul to an eternity as a member of the restless living dead, and prey to the harpies.[5] Blake's painting shows Dante and Virgil walking through a haunted forest at a moment when Dante tears a leaf from a bleeding tree. He drops it in shock on hearing the disembodied words, "Wherefore tear'st me thus? Is there no touch of mercy in thy breast?".[1]when the chinese reach income parity with the usa, then the chinese will outsource to bangladesh

rinse, repeat

eventually there will be parity everywhere and manufacturing will return to the usa

either that or social upheaval in china/ a war with the usa will bring manufacturing back stateside in a hurry

some of his art is pretty great:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gustave_Dor%C3%A9

somewhat creepy, more awesome (BOTH NSFW):

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gustave_Dor%C3%A9#/media/File:Les_Oceanides_Les_Naiades_de_la_mer.jpg

https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/b/b6/Paul_Gustave_Dore_Andromeda.jpg


well, it was a sort of reboot

they need to continue doing that, edging out and pushing the bond mystique in new ways
dear social conservatives:

if you outlaw abortions girls will bleed out and die trying to abort in dangerous ways

if you outlaw condoms young girls will get pregnant and both boys and girls will get diseases

if you outlaw common fucking sense you only hurt your own children, you shallow judgmental morons

the bible speaks of the sin of pride:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Seven_deadly_sins#Pride

&gt;Pride (Latin, superbia), or hubris (Greek), is considered, on almost every list, the original and most serious of the seven deadly sins: the source of the others. It is identified as believing that one is essentially better than others, failing to acknowledge the accomplishments of others, and excessive admiration of the personal self (especially holding self out of proper position toward God); it also includes vainglory (Latin, vanagloria) which is unjustified boasting. Dante's definition of pride was "love of self perverted to hatred and contempt for one's neighbour". 

know thyself

you don't have morality. you have hypocrisy and a False sense of superiority

thank you,
the sane world
it also seems rather pointless

both spain and catalan roll up into the EU. the thing to do is strengthen the EU, make it more than just an economic bloc, but also a military and political one

so scotland, brittany, basque, etc... whatever, let them all be be free

let them all roll up to the eu directly rather than through london, paris, madrid, etc.

what's the fucking difference? the future of europe is closer union

just so much fucking drama over a minor redistricting
more like crimean secession was engineered by russia, and anyone not brain dead understands this reality

there is no argument. there is no controversy. there are no two sides

there's just the fucking obvious, and then the denial whine of thuggy russian nationalist propaganda

some of them are pretty awesome

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lin-Manuel_Miranda

this guy has contributed more to a resurgent interest in a great founding father of the usa and has more understanding and love for the founding principles of this country than 99% of "real americans"

take that, assholes like trump and other nativist xenophobic social retards

i wish we could kick them out of the country
he's new to me but pretty awesome!will do!

he reminds me of william blake and goyai like how we need to have protruding metal boob plates, rather than just binding the things and having a regular military breastplate, which makes actual military sense

heck, the myth of the amazons spoke of how they would cut off one of their boobs for better archery skills

but that doesn't make the peepees of 15 year old males hard
even better, they were probably real:

&gt;The trail of the Amazons nearly went cold after Herodotus. Until, that is, the early 1990s when a joint U.S.-Russian team of archaeologists made an extraordinary discovery while excavating 2,000-year-old burial mounds\u2014known as kurgans\u2014outside Pokrovka, a remote Russian outpost in the southern Ural Steppes near the Kazakhstan border. There, they found over 150 graves belonging to the Sauromatians and their descendants, the Sarmatians. Among the burials of \u201cordinary women,\u201d the researchers uncovered evidence of women who were anything but ordinary. There were graves of warrior women who had been buried with their weapons. One young female, bowlegged from constant riding, lay with an iron dagger on her left side and a quiver containing 40 bronze-tipped arrows on her right. The skeleton of another female still had a bent arrowhead embedded in the cavity. Nor was it merely the presence of wounds and daggers that amazed the archaeologists. On average, the weapon-bearing females measured 5 feet 6 inches, making them preternaturally tall for their time.

&gt;Finally, here was evidence of the women warriors that could have inspired the Amazon myths. In recent years, a combination of new archaeological finds and a reappraisal of older discoveries has confirmed that Pokrovka was no anomaly. Though clearly not a matriarchal society, the ancient nomadic peoples of the steppes lived within a social order that was far more flexible and fluid than the polis of their Athenian contemporaries.

&gt;To the Greeks, the Scythian women must have seemed like incredible aberrations, ghastly even. To us, their graves provide an insight into the lives of the world beyond the Adriatic. Strong, resourceful and brave, these warrior women offer another reason for girls \u201cto want to be girls\u201d without the need of a mythical Wonder Woman.
because the will of the Ukrainian people to not be ruled by a corrupt stooge of Moscow was orchestrated by CIA mind control /s

and your "thinking" (ie, state of being a propagandized moron) is why Russia loses and will continue to lose: they see everything as an imperial chess game, completely ignoring or discounting the will of the actual people in whatever land they stick their neo-imperial bullshit

the next Maidan square will happen in Moscow

you can't feed people's bellies with thuggy xenophobia and ultranationalist paranoia

but don't worry about me, i'm obviously a shill of london or washington dc, right?
thank you, interesting

my comment and yours actually made me research it:

https://www.reddit.com/r/todayilearned/comments/3s5e24/one_etymology_of_the_word_amazon_the_mythological/

this is saying the myth is from scythia (modern eastern ukraine and russian steppes), not libya
can't argue with that!i'm not really mad, this is just media, entertainment, it's not serious

i mean, it's like getting mad at nipples on the batsuit. whatever

it's just obviously unrealistic is my point

i know you're just joking, and i voted you up

but i actually resent comments like yours

that wonders of human creation like the works of goya, dore or blake are druggy

artists who use drugs are self-medicating for psychic problems, and some of those problems are perhaps part of their creative urges, an interesting commentary on the creative individual

but that's a secondary, tangential topic

no one uses drugs and becomes creative. plenty are creative without any need for drugs at all

and most importantly: drugs actually weaken and dampen creative spark and interests, and often kill great artists

only idiots and mediocre talents buy into that crap notion that taking drugs is some sort of creative boost. drugs kill creativity. great artists who take drugs are self-medicating their excess

Yes, such a topic justifies defiling a country's sovereignty /s

Hey there's a lot of Chinese in eastern russia. Maybe china will teach russia a lesson about "respecting minorities" someday. I wonder how the hypocritical thuggy russian propaganda will go when they get a piece of their own medicine.Yes he's 100% American obviously.

Except in the minds of know nothing nativist social retards is my point.

Ps: he was born in Manhattan not queens
software artist

i'm not joking
Programmer

No need for anything fancyi agree, this an engraving of tiny low res boobs, it is beyond harmless

but i am trying to stay in the good graces of the mods, not make a statement of belief
complex words evolve complex meanings

for example libertarianism started in europe and still means social issues there: no rules against prostitution, no rules against drug use, etc. but in america it got dominated by economic issues, the usual ayn rand crap. libertarianism in the usa has nothing to with anything except making plutocrats even more rich, usually as a result of policies that self-stated libertarians don't understand the end result of and how such policies play out in real life

socialism as well in the usa still connotes waiting in line for scratchy toilet paper, gulags, and trotsky. while in europe socialism has softened and just means strong social safety nets. so someone like bernie sanders means to evoke nordic attitudes like low cost higher education, free healthcare, and generous parental leave and daycare when he talks about socialism... but he says that word and red state (irony) america thinks senator mccarthy 1950s era red scare and john birch society hysteria and rosenberg spy ring fears

likewise feminism for someone like malala, considering where she is from, still has the righteous and correct meaning that it used to have purely in the west: equal rights. equal voting rights, equal treatment under the law, equal access to education, etc.

unfortunately in the west, where feminism has made the most progress, a new "feminism" has emerged that is mostly navel gazing tumblrinas screeching about horrible "crimes" that amount to nothing more than some bruised egos and may not even have a sexist slant

and then unfortunately tone deaf and historically ignorant types run with that meaning of "feminism" such that the meaning of the word is muddied now

feminism is still needed in the world

what i don't want to see is someone like malala make progress with feminism in parts of the world where women still have little rights, and then some troll in that part of the world cites some screechy western blog that calls itself "feminist" but is more about hating men in the most socially ignorant way. and the troll projects that bullshit in the society that still has limited rights for women and the troll goes "is this feminism? is this what malala wants?"

so we need two words i think

we need a *new* word for the *old* style feminism that much of the world still needs, and give up on what a few social rejects, male and female, have done to the word in the west, maligned it
yes all those russian troops and russian equipment sure show a lot of "support"freedom and responsibility are joined at the hip

a society of responsible people is a free society and has no need for a large government

a society of irresponsible people invites authoritarian overbearing govt because someone has to protect basic rights

freedom for some means "i am free to do whatever i want, damn the consequences"

which is an immature, childish temper tantrum understanding

True freedom, a mature person says: "i can do whatever i want, as long as i don't hurt anyone else"

that is True freedom and a free member of a free society

unfortunately those who whine about freedom the most are speeding 100 mph on the highway, drinking and driving, smoking inside the office, blasting their music at 3 AM, and letting their dog crap on your lawn. and when you confront them they whine "why are you against freedom?" (or, "freedumb")

they don't get it, and they do more damage to the notion of a free society then some comic book cartoon of a mean person in a black turtle neck and steel tipped boots in some govt office who wants to take away your rights and freedoms for shits and giggles

the threat to your rights and freedoms does not lie so much in overbearing govt (that is one source of it, just not all of it, maybe not even most of it) than it does in the idiots around you who don't understand responsibility, that you encounter every day
i know

and like russians talk about novorossiya, there is this:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Outer_Manchuria

currently china is pissing off filipinos and vietnamese by stealing from them tiny coral reefs no one ever lived on, and pissing off indians by stealing permanently frozen mountain tops china never had a presence on

and to do this, china claims bullshit lies, madeup historical claims. some asshole drew a fucking dotted line on a napkin in the 1940s: that's china's "claim" to the spratleys:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nine-dash_line

when outer machuria is actually thousands of square miles of rich fertile and resaource rich lands, that was actually owned by china 150 years ago. the chinese historical claim is 100% solid

but like russia, china only picks on weak neighbors

unfortunately for russia, it's economy is a petrostate disaster because putin thought codifying power with oligarchs was more important than diversifying the russian economy. and russia alienates the world by picking on weaker georgia and ukraine and dividing them to "protect minorities"

while china continues to rise in power

and someday china is going to "protect minorities" in siberia

while russia claims crimea, and carves fake countries out of eastern ukraine and ossetia and abkhazia

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/South_Ossetia

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Abkhazia

basically parts of georgia that russia vivisected from them because georgia dared insult russian pride

so someday i look forward to the new nations of tuva and sakha

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tuva

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sakha_Republic

"protected" by china from moscow. like douchebag moscow currently "protects" fake puppet states it carved out of weaker neighbors

russia: your tanks rust, your economy sinks. china only grows in power

it's only a matter of time

then china will avenge georgia and ukraine by doing to you what you did to them, you paranoid ultranationalist putin cocksucking mafia goons. you will deserve it. and the world won't give a fucking shit because of the way you behave now

by the end of this century is my guess

i agree with you but i'm not interested in making that my crusade. i will play it safe unless a mod gives me a go ahead to remove the tag. putting that tag on is less bothersome to me than getting on a mod's bad side
well said and agreed and i think you have the perfect term: "Woman Right's Advocate". unless someone can think of a shorter word
i've been banned from subs because of some fickle mods. they have unchecked capricious power and there is no appeals or arbitration

you fight them if it pisses you off so much: message them if i can remove the nsfw tag. go ahead. do it. it's so fucking important to you

don't recruit me to do your fighting. it's just not that important to me

currently best comment in this thread
exactly. there is no justification for ignoring the sovereignty of another country, all russian lies and half baked rationalizations to the contrary

i for one hope that sometime this century china does to russia's far east with the same "protecting minorities" bullshit

russia continues to weaken and china continues to grow in power. and china has actual valid historical claims:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Outer_Manchuria

i will laugh my ass off to hear russian ultranationalist trolls whine about all the same bullshit and all the same fake reasons to champion "freedom fighters"

and the world won't give a shit since russia does what the fuck it wants against all norms and standards against georgia and ukraine. georgia and ukraine will be avenged

you defeat one neo-imperialist douchebag with another neo-imperialist douchebag
don't forget:

http://www.cnn.com/2014/02/05/us/texas-affluenza-teen/index.html

we're not going to have a revolution soon, we're all well fed. but we're headed down that path. as things get worse, as we see the usa is not a meritocracy but a classist society, it's going to be like the russian revolution/ french revolution/ arab spring here in a few decades

let's hope enough people wake the fuck up and change some laws
second afghanistan:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Soviet%E2%80%93Afghan_Waryeah secular syria sounds great

except the reality is assad, a brutal mass murdering piece of shit that created this whole mess
i have

it's "the emperor's new clothes"

Today on CSI: Cairo

In the pyramids, discovering the last words spoken by a mummy based on how air vibrates in a closed room for 4,000 years, allows the team to bring peace to an ancient family conflict

starring Ted Danson

(The Who plays in the background)all the way down the page, this is gold:

http://www.google.com/search?tbm=isch&amp;q=starbucks+cthulhu
there are many chromosomal anomalies that result in anatomical changes, some relatively "common" ones:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Klinefelter_syndrome

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Turner_syndrome

i'm not sure you could say it is "like" downs

but we're talking about a different species here, i don't think it's been studied that much
Dude what did you do to autocorrect to make it hate you so?software "architect" is such a bullshit term


So fanny. I'm going to post this on twatter.It is a bullshit term.

You're a programmer. A very good one. So you work on high level concepts now. You still write code.

If you're not, you're a manager.

There's no "architect."That's awesome! Thank you for that. No idea that existed.How does someone with this level of "insight" ever wind up being a judge?

Retire this douchebag.Why are you downvoted? This is great stuff you posted.

I guess the current -7 is a meta commentary on this very topic.Bullshit. Just listening and going "uh huh" is useless.

The advice given in the link is good.He won't have an answer because a "real friend" "just listens" like a lump and actual concrete thoughts showing you actually care is "preaching"Exactly

I have no idea why /u/volomon is upvoted and op is downvoted.

If someone sits there like a lump going "uh huh" that's completely useless and no sign of caring or being a friend. Might as well talk to a wall.

If someone gives active caring feedback like op, it shows they actually care.

But that's "preaching"

Wtf?

Caring concerned genuine feedback is "preaching?"

Man, people are screwed up.You want people to sit there like a lump and that's "empathizing?" Why not talk to a pile of dirt?

The fact op responded with care and concern is proof of empathy.

Sitting there and going "uh huh" and giving no concrete thoughts is proof of someone not giving a shit about you, is proof of insensitivity and impersonal lack of feelings.

How do people get so screwed up and backwards about this?

Who the hell wants someone to sit there like an uncaring nonverbal lump?You're a poster child for psychological projection.yup

whenever we see cases like this, it's the tip of the iceberg, which is very unsettling
i'm just commenting, it was your post that was the beautiful statement

(look us, giving positivity back and forth LOL)you're like a poster child for the sort of mindless useless negativity that is the subject matter of the post

the meta and the irony here is off the chartsyes, there's a lot of people posting in this thread that need to stop

for example, if you don't like motivation, which is what /u/barkingt18 is posting (you understand that right?) then maybe you shouldn't be reading in a sub called /r/getmotivated

...and, ironically, responding with uselessly negative demotivation

i was reading about some woman who scoured the world for the perfect countertop granite

she found this amazingly veined deep purple stuff, and had it shipped to her home at great expense, then shaped into gorgeous countertops

at some party at her home years later this guy with a geology background looks at her countertops, looks at the women with dismay and concern, and leaves. he comes back sometime later with a geiger counter

the thing hummed like a wasp nest like this:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RPKIrcJf7VI

she had installed in her kitchen, as the surface on which she prepared her food, a highly fractionated and evolved granite melt, rich in pitchblende (uranium ore)
yes, just tell people they will fail and be criminal. nice guy /s
looks... so... cold...radon infused living
isd does not expand the consciousness. it shrinks the mind and makes it think mediocre things are awe inspiring

people write and draw while on lsd and think they are channeling god. and it's just nonsense words or scribbles when sober

what drugs are, for the creative type, is self-medication. the very same aspects of their mind that make them greatly creative often gives them great pain, and they need escape or mollification for that

morons see this and think it is the other way around

creatives often live life painfully, it's the heightened sensitivity, and need to deaden that. a temporary escape. unfortunately, that temporary escape often becomes permanent and destroys their lives if not just their careers, jobs, and relationships

morons think drugs make life more exciting and vivid, because their minds and their reality is dull and insipid

there is no mystique to drug use, that's pathetic
cancer

the radon is probably the worst

so lung cancer would probably be the most likely outcome

(although she could come out just fine, it's a probability thing)

get your home tested for radon. some people live over unfortunate geology
he's not being skeptical, he's being shallowly dismissivethat's not really a "fun" fact
yes, uranium/ pitchblende is extremely toxic

however, they usually polish granite countertops in such a way the countertop doesn't get in your food

pretty much all granite countertop is radioactive, and some varieties much more radioactive than others. but it's the radon that's the biggest deal

not anything to freak out about, but considering the kinds of things that frightens the average consumer, who doesn't usually calculate the odds, it would be interesting to note for them what just having granite countertops does to them in terms of a slight increase of cancer risk

it would be interesting to go into a few mcmansions and take a geiger counter to their countertops
you don't really see them so much as feel them

a slightly warm feeling all over

(not really... when glasses of water on your countertops are emitting blue cherenkov radiation you've got some next level problems)
It's devouring knowledgeRock lady, evil queen of the mineralswoah, TWO eighths? that's a lot more

We are animals as well as humans, they are not mutually exclusive. You seem to have an emotional reaction to doing something as "base" as eating flesh but this is emotion, not reason. Have a hamburger and relax.i get it, when losing an argument change the topic

you had a wide open argument about the morality of eating meat, now you steer it somewhere else

at least have the intellectual honesty to concede a point before changing it. otherwise you're telegraphing that it is completely unworthwhile to continue this thread

immature indeed
you could say that the distance between the people and the government is a good measure of how stable a country is
as a leftist, it's not my desire to prosecute racists, but i am not sure why anyone would want to defend them and cater to them and court them for votes, like a rightistpeople should be punished *verbally* for racist thoughts, absolutely

the thing with free speech is that it works both ways. nothing about free speech means that people will still like you, or that you are free of criticism for having toxic, ignorant thoughts

or that you still deserve respect

and to **not** prosecute racists *verbally* seems to indicate a person doesn't have a problem with them

speak up against racists if you disagree with them

but to hear a racist and your first instinct is "let them speak!" is... interestingand never forget: the greatest enemy of freedoms is not leftist bogeymen. it is the intolerant themselves
yes, you're an asshole. you're also in your rights. intolerant racist speech deserves no magic protections from assholes
exactly, well saidyou follow the law. racists deserve no extra consideration

and you really need to understand the threat to freedom is their intolerance

i don't understand bending over backwards underlining their rights when the threat to rights and freedoms is represented in their thoughts
tolerant people deserve my consideration. intolerant people deserve my disrespect... in the name of freedom and rights, since their intolerance is an affront on freedoms and rights

"consideration" is hardly the correct word here

the word you mean is *awareness* (the least possible)

and the article we are commenting under is hardly harassment. harassment is following someone around and hounding them. a billboard without any names linking the hate to a speaker does not remotely count as harassment
&gt;And so is yours.

how am i being intolerant?

disapproval of intolerance is the same as intolerance itself in your mind?

"i hate black people" in your mind is morally and logically equivalent to "i disapprove of you because you hate black people"?

that really makes sense to you?
verbal punishment, i clearly said. which is obviously nothing remotely like corporal punishment. you are being utterly dishonest if you want to equate those two meanings

and the rest of your post is also putting words in my mouth

if you wish to smear and lie about what i say, in vigorous defense of racists, i think that tells us all we need to know about you
&gt;For me as saudian ? Im an atheist

where are you posting from right now. this is a serious inquiry as to your current level of safety

i hope that you are outside saudi arabia or using a good proxy

if they trace a statement like that to you, they will kill you

you need to educate yourself as to the situation

http://www.smh.com.au/world/in-saudi-arabia-artist-ashraf-fayadh-sentenced-to-death-for-atheism-20151125-gl88x9.html
he can reply "i am not in saudi arbia"

i am not asking for his blood type, city of birth, and mother's maiden name

you are the one being an asshole here
i'm not trying frighten you, but if you use a saudi provider, they can find your ip out if they seek out that information

when you make a request to reddit, that request goes through equipment owned by saudi arabia. the information in that request includes your ip address, the destination ip address, your username, and the content of your post

again, i'm not trying to scare you: it requires them to care deeply about finding out who you are, the information is not automatic. someone has to sniff out this post of yours on reddit, ascertain that you must be found out, then connect your username with the post you made

since it takes some effort, you're probably ok, but it's a little dangerous

there's another protection:

look at the top left of your browser, the url. does it say https:? (emphasis on the s)

if it does, is it green (not yellow, or red, indicating compromised encryption)?

then it is a secure connection. then i will bet you are safe

this protects you against packet sniffing say, if you are using public wifi

it also protects against some types of government snooping, but even then, some government meddle with the certificates so it's not 100%, but pretty damn safe. some government do go this nuts to mess with certificates, like china, but i do not believe saudi is one such government

what i recommend is to use tor:

https://www.torproject.org/

you can look it up on google, find out more about it. it's onion routing: it bounces your request across a number of proxies, so it's basically impossible difficult to find you out (the nsa probably can do it by owning tor proxies, but other governments no). tor was invented by the us naval research lab to provide dissidents and spies unsnoopable internet access

another warning: some governments sniff keywords. such as "atheist" or "tor". if you are encrypted, (the green s) then you're most probably safe from that kind of deep packet inpection, but you might want to search tor, download tor, and install tor outside of saudi owned equipment. once installed, you should be ok in saudi, and you are posting and browsing beyond government prying eyes

please share this info with other saudis who might be exposed in such a way

good luck and thank you for posting with us here on reddit
yes, reddit apps in general use https, but the switch wasn't that long ago

so please make sure you are using the latest bacon reader version:

http://support.onelouder.com/hc/en-us/articles/203932390-I-ve-turned-on-Reddit-https-and-now-I-can-t-see-my-subscriptions-or-vote-

a place like china might mess with https but not saudi (yet)

the way saudi moves away from insane medieval bs is through people like you: people in the country, enough of you mattering. stay safeit's nothing. your risking far more than me. it's the least i can do. take care of yourself
look at the replies to my original comment

you're clearly in the wrong here

being wrong and an asshole is a quick way to failure in life
oh ok, so it's totally safe /swould you bet your life on what a fat guy in his underwear says on reddit?

because they kill people for being atheists in saudi arabia

but fat sweaty guy in his mom's basement says it's totally cool bro
Worst. Metaphor. Ever.And I'm the queen of england. Trolls say they are anything.

The point is to care about someone's safety. I'm so so sorry for doing that.

Hey at least you had the opportunity to act knowledgeable and authoritative, right? Is that missing in your life?because it most probably is
1. you're too young

2. your parents would not approve of pregnancy and perhaps horrid treatment may follow or exclusion

3. the dude has flaked

4. you have no money for yourself, nevermind a baby

5. you need to keep this job/ school, or your whole life will track downward

many women in this situation will go "you're going to get an abortion"

it's just going to happen. the risks are not the point

yes i know "necessity" and "need" don't make sense to you, and that's ok. the point is **someone** thinks of it as a need and you're not going to convince them otherwise before they try to abort. the power you have is to help make sure they survive it or not

you *need* to make peace with the fact some women in this position will seek an abortion. it doesn't matter if you approve or not, it matters that it is going to happen and that you realize that it is going to happen

i am sure you don't approve of heroin addiction. i am also sure you're intelligent enough to see that societal disapproval doesn't mean that people won't still become addicts. so should narcan be easy to get to save lives or hard to get simply because someone somewhere feels conflicted about the existence of addicts in the world?

same argument

the difference between a sane society and an insane one is the insane one has no problem with any amount of it's women bleeding to death on their bathroom floors simply because it will not accommodate a need (or, a "need" if it makes you feel more comfortable)
because as china rises and steals frozen mountains from india and coral atolls from the philippines based on trumped up historical claims, it will at some point notice a weakening fragile country to the north that actually did steal hundreds of square kilometers of resource rich land only 150 years ago:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Outer_Manchuria

hey china: don't actually invade

just claim russia is abusing chinese minorities and supply "freedom fighters" to carve out a puppet state you support (ukrainians and georgians know what i'm talking about)
this kills the dicaprioscar
they didn't tell the cops before shooting a cannonball through a house while the people were home

http://www.cnet.com/news/mythbusters-cannonball-busts-through-house/

&gt;Strangely, it missed the trash cans, tore through a cinder-block wall, bounced its merry way down a hillside, barreled 700 yards through a suburban California neighborhood, smashed through the front door of a house, bounced up the stairs of the house and, without knocking, penetrated a bedroom door where a man, woman, and child were sleeping.

&gt;They were only woken after the cannonball had passed through. There was a little rubble and dust.

&gt;Was it done? Of course not. The cannonball then bounced its way out through the wall of the house, crossed a road, smashed a few tiles that were carelessly lying around on the roof of another house and finally took a seat inside the Gill family's Toyota Sienna, which they had thoughtlessly parked in the driveway of their home.

&gt;A spokesman for the Alameda County Sheriff's Department--which is responsible for the bomb range--gave the Chronicle three apposite words for the incident: "Crazy, crazy, crazy."

Safety is not theoretical. They didn't take all precautions. They fucked up and they could have killed someone. You don't just go "oh well." That's not how real life works.You didn't read. It's "freedom fighters". China is only providing support. You understand the size of the chinese population in the far east?'Sht happens" is never the answer given in a major fuck up like this. Are you 12 years old?There's a large gap in there between that choice and some others.That answer doesn't work in real life.Much like voting, everyone complains about the results (who is elected, who is decided guilty/ innocent), when the real problem is the attitude of people like you: never vote, avoid jury duty.

You get the verdicts/ representatives you deserve.You evaluate the individual.

Bias according to race, religion or party affiliation doesn't actually help you in life because every single person is different. Flattening all people according to an arbitrary signifier doesn't hold True from one person to the next.

Cruz's bias is just like racism for this reason.the company shares blame

they encouraged the behavior. they should have provided a ride home

i'd consider a lawsuit if i was their family. seriously

naming a conference room after an employee they helped kill is just icing on the derangement cake

that company has a serious fucking problem
Anthropology explains behaviors in environmental context and if anything shows how similar we all are in terms of motivations. 

Bias takes shallow arbitrary signifiers and links them for ignorant reasons.

It's rather amusing to see you cite anthropology when the Cruz claim would be torn to shreds by any anthropologist.

Maybe spoiler:

The dicaprio "revenant" movie coming out is based on a real life survival story in which some Native Americans sewed up the mointain man's missing flesh from a horrid bear clawing with animal skin sewn in.yeah this company is toxic and enabling to the wrong kinds of people

management change and/ or lawsuit incoming, from any one of a whole series of incidents i bet
both are True. drunken morons will be drunken morons, but if you enable their behavior you share blame. ideally, provide rides home. you *know* people need to drive home and you *know* you are liquoring them up. so to do that and not think "so how are they getting home?" is the height of negligence

i don't know all the details. it was a hotel and maybe the company provided rooms and the morons decided to drive home anyway

they STILL should have barred people from leaving without transportation, people that they got drunk
all cultures are built on the foundation of human behaviors. these behaviors, motivations and intents, are universal

&gt;it is silly to say we can't draw any conclusions about a group of people just because not every single person in that group is completely the same.

it is ignorant and dangerous. "most black people this" and "most muslims that" has zero value for traits which are individual. if you go "mexicans are lazy" you can point to millions who are extremely hard working. if you go "mexicans are hard working" you can point to millions who are lazy. if you go "there is tendency for mexicans to behave like {X} (positive or negative)" how does that have any use for the mexican who doesn't behave like {X}?

so you don't make these braindead connections at all. it's called prejudice

arbitrarily linking behaviors and attributes when only an individual evaluation applies is simply useless and enables the worst kind of hate and ignorance
well you can mix system of a down and elton john

serj tankian himself was amused:

/r/videos/comments/24g4as/elton_john_meets_system_of_a_down_crocodile_chop/ch73g9n
Didn't stop the Russians either in other places. You just need appearances silly. Find a loud mouth with a greivance, real or contrived, then truck the fake "local" fighters there.

Won't happen soon, cpuld be a decade or two. But you need a strong economy or tanks rust. Meanwhile China keeps rising.

It's coming.Didn't stop the Russians either in other places. You just need appearances silly. Find a loud mouth with a greivance, real or contrived, then truck the fake "local" fighters there.

Won't happen soon, could be a decade or two. But you need a strong economy or tanks rust. Meanwhile China keeps rising.

It's coming.

Morality is a sliding scale. As long as you achieve your results with less crimes than someone else, you are seen as (and you really are) more moral and people gravitate to you.

Thing is, over time, someone tops you too.

In this way we achieve better and better civilization.

Progress is real. But it is built on the bones of increasingly horrible monsters the further you go back in time.

he hated windows

eventually, they hated him back

live in peace with windows

or RIP in piecesrussia is continuing to weaken economically

china is continuing to rise economically

they are very far away from it happening right now

but in the future, i look forward to some new "countries" like the jokes russia carved from ukraine and georgia

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sakha_Republic

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Irkutsk

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tuva

all future puppets of china

i think the usa and japan should ready themselves to secure sakhalin and kamchatka when china makes its move

it will be like the race to carve up the dying ottoman empire
progress isn't a straight line, it's more of a two steps forward one step back

&gt;People always think they are in an enlightened age and the past was full of horrible people. 

but this is actually True

the past is just more racism, more brutality, more slavery, etc.

and in the future, when they have even less atrocities and racism and religious extremism as we have today, they will see us as a more brutal time too. and they will be correct

&gt;The biggest wars of our time, with the most casualties and the biggest genocides weren't that long ago.

that's not True

including ww1 and wwii, we have been getting less violent and murderous

the wars in the centuries before wwi and wwii and the behavior within them makes the wars of the 20th century look mild

i am sure you don't approve of heroin addiction

i am also sure you're intelligent enough to see that societal disapproval doesn't mean that people won't still become addicts

so should narcan be easy to get to save lives or hard to get simply because someone somewhere feels conflicted about the existence of addicts in the world?

same argument

make peace with the fact some women in this position will seek an abortion. it doesn't matter if you approve or not, or if it is a genuine need or not. it only matters that it is going to happen and that you realize that it is going to happen

the point is someone thinks of it as a need, real or imagined, and you're not going to convince them otherwise before they try to abort

the only power you have is to help make sure they survive it or not
&gt;WW2 and WW1 are by far the most violent wars in human history.

and yet the death toll as a function of the percentage of the population is lower

we are getting more peaceful. this is objectively real, a fact, not just an opinion

you talk about what might happen. i am talking about what actually is happening: we are actually getting more civilized

it doesn't mean our fundamental changes. it's just that conflicts get decided in courtrooms rather than blood spilled, or worse, they amplify and spin out of control

do you understand what percentage means?

overlay total population over that

meaning as the centuries go on, the average person experiences less violence

we could have a war next year that is larger than both wwi and wwii combined

and yet we are still getting more peaceful on average

learn and understand:

https://www.ted.com/talks/steven_pinker_on_the_myth_of_violence?language=en

we are living in the most peaceful time ever in the entire history of humanity
As long as getting a gun is easier than getting a car in the usa, this is our status quo.

Which is obscenely insane according the standards of the USA's social and economic peers.

Get used to more news like this for years.

Because a vocal deranged minority in the USA somehow believes sane gun control is more evil than tens of thousands of pointless body bags.

And we won't defy them.

Time to defy them.

We sensible Americans are actually in the majority on the question of more gun control. But we're not as vocal.And so tens of thousands more will die for no reason save the idiocy of americans who don't fucking get it. No other social and economic peer has the problem we do.

What a tragedy of pigheaded blind morons on the topic of guns in the usa.you suffer from what is called historical myopia. you imagine things getting worse and worse exact5ly as they are getting better and better. because you have nostalgia for the past when the past was far more brutal, poor, violent and wretched than today

http://www.slate.com/articles/news_and_politics/foreigners/2014/12/the_world_is_not_falling_apart_the_trend_lines_reveal_an_increasingly_peaceful.html

everything is trending down

your False alarmism is a component of hysteria, fear, anxiety. not facts or reality

http://www.theguardian.com/science/head-quarters/2015/jan/16/declinism-is-the-world-actually-getting-worse

http://bigthink.com/the-evolution-of-enlightenment/the-world-is-getting-worse-and-other-lies

&gt; On the other hand, if you aren't willing to do any wrong thing (fight a war in self defense for survival knowing you have to kill enemy soldiers), you end up doing a far worse thing.

well said. better to get involved and make mistakes than stand on the sidelines and shallowly judge and tut tut those actually making the world better, for their comparatively minor mistakes. unfortunately that's 90% of reddit right there. but in their useless inaction, they are actually making the world far worse
exactly

nevermind violence of a more local/ domestic variety that obviously was far far worse the further back you go
you are arguing with yourself at this point

the simple truth is we are really getting less violent

your historical myopia isn't new. there are ancient quotes about how the world is getting more dangerous and the youth are different "today." we have nostalgia for the past and we forget how much worse it really was. it is a common human miscalculation/ psychological bias

exactly correct

meaning:

1. the west should embrace refugees. these are our future allies in the fight against religious extremism, and speak the language of the religion and the culture far better than any westerner

2. muslims must speak out vocally against religious extremism. admittedly, this places you in grave danger. however, you already are in grave danger. there no bigger victim of religious extremism than average muslims
True

but there has been plenty of pushback, mostly from people nominally of the christian heritage but now mostly secular, which can count as "christians" for the sake of this topic

much as the muslim world needs those who are not so religious as a buffer against this kind of insanity. they would be "muslims" as well. in cultural background

that graph is eurocentric and doesn't go back far enough

and are we including all of the low grade violence? the domestic/ local crap?

a pogrom or slave raid won't show up as a war. but we don't have to worry about those anymore. plenty of local ethnic cleansing efforts within an empire's borders, officially or informally organized, don't show up

nevermind that the courtroom has replaced most mob justice. people used to just murder each other for "justice" at a much higher rate

you're doing nothing but projecting your psychological bias. you agree we're doing well. but that fact doesn't matter to you, only your fears do
&gt; Ethnic riots and slavery still exist in the world, perhaps not in your corner but elsewhere they are alive and well.

right. at one time they spanned everywhere

then less

now much less, especially in regards to slavery

progress
the graph misrepresents reality

i don't know why we need to defend a half truth, and that is supposed to mean anything
you're not arguing from facts, just your psychology

&gt;I don't think we have accomplished anything out of the ordinary morally or philosophically, if anything we're further behind in a few areas than we have been at different points in our shared world history.

the actual facts indicate the opposite. you aren't substantiating your belief, just putting empty statements out there

perhaps because you can't validate your belief. so perhaps you need to change your belief to conform to the actual facts

facts:

http://www.slate.com/articles/news_and_politics/foreigners/2014/12/the_world_is_not_falling_apart_the_trend_lines_reveal_an_increasingly_peaceful.html

http://www.theguardian.com/science/head-quarters/2015/jan/16/declinism-is-the-world-actually-getting-worse

http://bigthink.com/the-evolution-of-enlightenment/the-world-is-getting-worse-and-other-lies
it's because you were raised modern urban/ suburban, and have no awareness of where your food came from until later, because food is industrial in scale nowadays

you might have been on the highway and saw some pig noses through the slats of a passing truck and suddenly had an emotional realization, and that was as close as you got to your food

it's a product of the times

rural areas and poorer areas and all of our past never had this kind of problem with eating meat, because, like OP, the food was out an about around the living quarters. you knew your food. so the relationship with your food was organic and natural. there was no disconnect and no reason or time to develop the emotional confusion of modern industrial times

if you want to work out your feelings, consider how i think about it (not saying my way is the best):

1. there is human morality, the realm of how we treat each other

2. then there is animal morality, which is the relationship between animals that has existed for billions of years

we, homo sapiens, overlap both realms

it is confusing to apply the standards of one realm to another

for example: social darwinism. to simply not treat another human being with decency, but like an animal, is disgusting

or animal cruelty: for a human to abuse an animal for no reason nor benefit save the human's psychological or emotional problems (although we do see some higher animals like orcas play with the dead and dying, and not even eat all of it, nonhuman cruelty)

there is confusion in the other direction: treating animals with the decency of another human being and ignore them as part of our diet, which they have been since before we were humans

feel that little sharp tooth back from your front incisors? those are your canines. evolved to rip flesh. this is what you are made to do

right now a fish is ripped in half still trying to breathe on a coral reef by a barracuda, a zebra is disemboweled still struggling by hyenas on the serengeti, a wolf chokes the life out of a deer by squeezing its throat in siberia

this is normal and natural. this is animal morality: survival of the swiftest, strongest, stealthiest. nothing more

it shouldn't bother you. to apply human morality is... carefully looking for the right word... maudlin. misplaced sentimentality to what is simply the way it is

we can't police the natural world. and we are part of it, our diets. as long as we treat other humans according to our social codes

as long as we kill the animal quickly and humanely and use it for food, we will continue doing what mother nature has made us to do for billions of years (although growing meat in vats might completely remove the question of "cruelty" for everyone, but this is completely artificial... which is more creepy?)

and this is correct and moral, according to the natural world, which we overlap, which is not the same as the morality surrounding our human relationships

we are animals as well as humans, they are not mutually exclusive and it is confusing. but go with reason, not emotion
as opposed to someone who just pulls statements from their ass without any citation whatsoever? i made statements. then i supported them

if you are unable to examine your beliefs you are not being intellectually honest, and this empty stubbornness will lead you to ignorance
fair enoughand as a percentage of human population, it's improvement

take into mind all of the massacres pogroms, slave raids, mob "justice," ethnic cleansing, genocide etc. in the past

the quantity, tempo, and severity is all going down

learn the facts. then speak. the quantity of carnage is going down across the span of human history, including the world wars

i am giving you the facts. you are denying them out of some ignorant stubborn intellectual dishonesty. you're going to have a hard life with that approachand previous wars and carnage from previous centuries?
but you're making the wrong argument at the wrong time to the wrong person

if abortion is illegal, some women and girls will still feel the need to abort, for whatever good or bad reason. they will attempt this outside of your approval or review. you aren't going to reach them with arguments before she tries it herself

then she may be dead bled to death on her bathroom floor

this was the status quo in the usa before roe v wade. hundreds of deaths every year in the usa due to abortion. after roe v wade this number dropped to dozens

that's the stakes here

do you want to prevent unnecessary death?

or do you want to win philosophical arguments with random people that don't prevent those unnecessary deaths?
not really

a lot of judgment is shallow and self-serving

people will frequently make larger moral transgressions in response to perceived smaller ones. "if he didn't step on my shoes i wouldn't have to shoot him the face." that's an extreme example but that kind of "logic" works for some people in many ways throughout their life, or even just through the course of a regular day, in small and large ways

it's emotional and psychological immaturity
i read the title too fast and registered it as "Pasteurized pork" and I was thoroughly confused.i said:

&gt;and yet the death toll as a function of the percentage of the population is lower

is that what you are talking about you blind dumb fuck?
&gt;We don't use that argument for any other area.

http://www.kentucky.com/living/health-and-medicine/article44599968.html

http://www.babysafe.ca.gov/

http://www.indystar.com/story/news/politics/2015/12/01/indiana-order-stands-charity-will-settle-syrian-family/76619100/

that's off the top of my head

we use it for lots of areas

it is actually a morally and logically sound argument to allow something many people disapprove of or is illegal, to save a life

your position, frankly, is not moral. you have not weighed the consequences of your policy and you seem to not understand or do not have a problem with people dying because of your position
so you have corrupt border guards

erdogan is a piece of shit, but we need more proof to indict official government policythis is the playbook russia operates on georgia and ukraine

they will be avenged when china plays the same playbook on russia

watch and see, then remember this little exchange
http://www.indexmundi.com/factbook/compare/china.russia/economy

these numbers are before the ukrainian adventure and sanctions, and the oil price implosion

good luck
i'd be happy with that fucking butcher assad dead and russia appointing some other stooge

a better option is partition of syria and iraq

but turkey won't let kurds have their own state

and no one wants ISIS given sovereign recognition

so there's no winning here, and no way out

the near term future is just a slow grind of death with no end game in sight

my personal guess is with oil money strangled, ISIS starts brutalizing the population in areas it controls (it's already doing that but we're talking starvation and more massacres)
i thought turkey kept tight control of those areas because of the kurds

it is possibly a military schism because of the fundamentally asymmetrical quality to the kinds of conflicts in the world today, i only see further increasing sophistication to stats like that in the future

smart bombs indeed

could be a military schism

could be erdogan

i'm asking for proof one way or another as to how high the stink goes

do you have proof?
we don't have border skirmishes and then wwiii becomes automatic

how and why turkey behaves will effect how when and if NATO is invoked
on both sides of the Mexican - US border there are corrupt officials of various levels and capacity that ensure the drugs still flow

it's called money. it sublimates all morality and reason

it doesn't mean we indict President Obama for the drug trade
so then you pick apart biased research

you don't oppose the existence of research
the 1995 oklahoma city bombing and the 2011 anders breivik massacre were followed with anti-muslim sentiment

that says a lot

and even if this is radical islam, blaming muslims is exactly what ISIS wants. you are being their willing tool

by taking out ignorant hate on innocent muslims, you isolate exclude and radicalize enough of not-so-nice muslims watching you to replace the attackers in religious extremist attacks and then some more

keep thinking the way you do, you play exactly into what ISIS designs with these attacks

do you know what muslims in the usa represent?

these are our allies in the fight against religious extremism, and speak the language of the religion and the culture far better than any westerner. muslims are the largest victim of religious extremism. to end radical islam we need nonradical muslims

why do you want to do your damnedest to make your allies defensive?

embrace muslims

islam is not our enemy

religious extremism is
yes, and as executive he ultimately bears all responsibility

but you realize heating up that blame game is russia's design, not a search for justice
so the answer is to do no research at all?
in their defense, russia's behavior has been pretty fucking disgusting, carving up its weak neighbors. i'm sorry, but fuck russia. turkey isn't much better but i'm not about to pile on top of erdogan at russia's behest


perhaps so

so we persecute muslims?

treat them as human beings, let them figure it out, and you've made a powerful ally in the fight against the cancer in their midst
the government funds many studies. there is no reason to fund or not, no matter what the studies have to say or not, about anything, as long as they are scientific. the merit is the only valid metric, not the topic

i feel you bro

https://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/3v8bcl/nbc_news_tentatively_identifies_the_san/cxl8drm?context=2

and look at those downvotes
that's True

we're talking about studies, period

not biased studies
hear, hear
exactly

it's amazing the pathological fear some have for scientific studies
congratulations on fueling the creation of more religious extremists with that sentiment
the accusations of bias exist before the studies even take place

look around this thread

the pathological fear is palpable of someone, anyone doing a scientific study

that's pretty telling
its the exclusion, the hate, the violence based on prejudice

it fuels the cycle

this is a new concept to you?

you don't beat your enemy by becoming him

if you want to know how ISIS thinks, just look at some of the frothing at the mouth hate some people have for others based on arbitrary signifiers. there are insane nutjob murderous muslims. there's also rational muslims. and everything in between. why lump them with the others. in fact, it is in the hands of rational muslims that the solution to the problem exists. why attack them?

Prideful ignorance

At the root of much if not most evil in the world.i agree with you except your last sentiment. in a situation like this police overreaction is not the problem
guns aren't like drug addiction

the kind of people that abuse gun responsibility aren't trying hard in life. denied an easy gun, they simply don't get one

smart criminals will still get guns no matter what, yes. but they aren't the kind to shoot up a street corner because a chick looked at him funny

https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/worldviews/wp/2013/02/01/british-gangs-use-flare-guns-now-because-they-cant-find-real-ones/
OP, get out of there as fast as you can. think of the money spent as good learning money to save you from wasting tons more later on a woman who obviously is so self absorbed nothing you do will ever matter
it's a study. if it is biased i have complete faith that you will find the bias

otherwise, why are you so scared of a fucking STUDY?

how can the government "abuse" you with a study?

good lord, you fucking psychotic nutbags

the second amendment speaks of a well-regulated (well-trained) militia

the current interpretation of the second amendment is a product of a dirty harry attitude from the last half of the last century and is not the actual content of the second amendment

and someone with that kind of concentration and effort is never going to shoot up a disco or movie threatre, so that's not a problem

the problem is how easy it is for low effort loony toons and hot heads. such low effort people when denied a gun, just don't get one

proof: all of our social and economic peers

&gt; Nowhere in my comment did I say anything approaching "guns are like drug addiction"

the point is there is no bizarre compelling need to get one, like a drug addiction.  in places where guns are more tightly controlled, there is no furtive desperate gun deals going down in the urban park, because there's no need

&gt;And to say that if criminals can't get a gun easily they will "just give up" is a claim based, as far as I can tell, solely on your intuition.

see the link i provided

&gt;If you have time, look up the etymology of the phrase "run amok". It comes from a primitive island culture

it's malay culture. indonesia, philippines, malaysia. you should tell the next filipino you meet that they are primitive, it's quite endearing of you

&gt;The tribe believed they were possessed by the Spirit called amok

(facepalm) it's a malay word for furious, anak ka nang puta

so i just stopped reading there because you're obviously full if shit, nevermind i don't know where the fuck you think you are going referring to the concept of running amok somehow means guns easy to get is somehow a good thing
why are you scared of a fucking study?

it's hysterical, psychotically fearful

it really says a lot that a fucking study raises so much fear and hysteria in certain people

do you see the subject matter we are commenting under? look at the top link. thank you

and why can't the CDC make any study it wants, with any conclusion it wants?

the fact certain people are so hysterical and fearful of just a fucking study says a lot

the only bias and political motivation here is yours, at just the fucking HINT of a study. amazing! forbidding absolutely any kind of study you won't like

that say a lot about your intellectual honesty and your character

psychotically fearful

the only abuse is people like you who won't let a study happen

the abuse is already real: you, people like you

blocking a fucking study!

you're so, so afraid, huh?
look up

see the top link to the story we are commenting under?

read it

thank you
we already have gun control laws

full of holes and weakly enforced

but gun control laws nonetheless

why isn't your head exploding right now from this realization?

because you don't understand the second amendment. you have a late 20th century reimaging of its meaning as your baseline, and it is wrong, and it will be thrown out as the junk it is

we will return to the True intent of our founding fathers that you and your loopy white knuckle paranoid kind have made perverse

what do you mean?
yes, yes. i too have a cold sweaty white knuckle paranoid fear over how a fucking study can rape my entire existence /s

man there are some seriously imbalanced people in this world

IT'S A FUCKING STUDY
&gt; full of holes and weakly enforced

so you have no problem if we plug those holes and start enforcing them properly, right?

because you're for responsible gun ownership, right?
it's not syed farook?"Is she with you?"

"I thought she was with you."

I belly laughed.
because you're being historically myopic. consider all the stuff going on in the background that doesn't get marquee billing
&gt; People, in a society in which the criminals are armed Gun control has proven very effective in other countries

thank you, yes

&gt;so the argument gun control need to be okay with the first time break down.

i didn't catch that, word missing maybe?
it's front page and has been so many hours

on /r/news there are many stories about it frontpaging the sub, including a few repeating the content of this storyit was the main story for many hours. the algorithm tracks votes versus time and stories shuffle up and downso then what are you arguing with me about?

do you agree or disagree that the world is getting less violent?

are you here to police my personality or are you interested in the actual topic?
bombs take time and concentration to make

the problem is easy guns for hot heads and loony toons

these are people who aren't trying hard in life. they shoot up street corners because a chick looked at them funny

they aren't going to build a bomb

and cruelty never works as a deterrent

you don't know your history or your human nature. it just makes people even more cruel
so you ARE here to police my personality

that's really awesome of you

can i borrow the car keys dad?

why don't you try going on a date?

i'm sorry, but i don't care and i'm not interested. this is off topic
unread

i'm not interested

get a girlfriend
&gt;No amount of regulation will affect criminals because they are CRIMINALS.

smart criminals aren't shooting up street corners. of course they will always get guns. and use them wisely

the point of gun control is to keep it out of the hands of the casual hot heads and loony toons who always do the most damage. and since they aren't trying hard in life, they simply don't get guns

proof: all of our social and economic peers

&gt;You don't have to own one, but don't go around actively trying to strip me of my right to own them because you're scared of them.

get a gun, it doesn't bother me. as long as you prove you know how to use one and you're responsible. why do you have a problem with that? remember "well-regulated (well-trained) militia"? it's in the fucking second amendment
is that from another thread? are you stalking me?

so you're not just lonely you're a stalking creep?

get life shitbag
*golfclap*Walla:

An Indian subcontinent term for someone who specializes in something

So a chaiwalla is a guy who makes you Chai tea

Source: American dude who pays attention in small talk conversations and office chit chatOP states they are the only Buddhist in an evangelical college and has thick skin from constant comments. I think OP might be more sensitive to the kind of bias you are referring to and would not be so automatic as you cynically allude.If you can help someone in jeopardy with a few words, even if a long shot, it's the right thing to do. And it's almost zero effort.Pfft, anyone can use the Smeagol defense. The Chewbacca defense takes some effort. And the Voldemort defense takes True legal skill.Assad is an Alawite, not a Shia (they're similar).

And Syria is way too fucked up for democracy right now and for awhile to come.If he's catholic clergy he know plenty of homosexuals and pedophiles.Relax and enjoy Christmas. If you chop down a tree and hang ornaments on it, don't worry! No nasty pagan culture was borrowed from for that cultural practice. Can you imagine the horror of admitting that happens? /sIf you have more customers than you can handle, you can double the size of your store. Or open another store 2 blocks away, maybe even more convenient for some of your customers.

It's not that odd of a strategy.

What's odd is a competitor not jumping in and claiming some of those locations first.
Is it just me or do I hear "Here's the thing" in conversation and online more nowadays? I'm not referring to the unidan situation.

It's an annoying transitional phrase getting overused.Here's the thing. Where is it? Here. What's the thing? It's here. Huh?

I'm still annoyed.Uggh.Good! brain training! /sGo to the Philippines. Lots of short (by US standards) professional basketball players.the existing telescopes should do outreach and bring schoolkids to the telescopes and have public tours

basically do everything so people see the telescopes BELONG to them, it is accessible to them, it is their property. which it genuinely is, that's not a trick

it is not an alien encroachment, that's the actual lie. but that False perception is at the basis of the complaint, and the way people perceive it, so that has to change. people feel trampled on and they want to lash out and assert their authority over their own land. and they will do it to make a point even if the effect is actually a negative

it would be nice if some hawaiian astronomers from the local area would get employed to coordinate and bring people by (there may be some already, i'm just not that aware of the situation)
the problem is women encounter a few guys who put the moves on, then when the woman declines, the guy instantly gets hostile and attacks them

this is a small amount of people but they do exist and they make it hard for people to be honest

with some people, when you are honest and straightforward with them, they lash out at you and unleash a bunch of crap that has nothing to do with you, it has to do with their own problems

so people wisely take their time with coming out with 100% honest words. because honest words spoken to the wrong douchebag means an attack
it may seem machiavellian but this decision is your time to shine

what we have here is a huge disconnect between the astronomers and the locals

you can bridge

time to put on your politician's hat

take the initiative and go talk to the astronomers. offer your services as outreach and go between. you may even get a salary. they may be slow to warm up to you and recognize your worth to them so in the meantime prove yourself: contact the media, "hawaiian astronmer" is all you need for them to quote you on the topic

seek out and engage loud voices against the telescope. some may be too hostile but a few will allow you to make a good point or two. do not reject their complaints, do not deflect them, do not ignore them. simple take every complaint they give, agree, and then just tie their point to the reality that they own the telescopes. only if you can, get involved in the awesome sicence. at first you have to validate their complaints about ownership of their own land. once they see you really are with them on that, only then can you build into the science direction and sell them on that. don't oversell upfront and lose them

get it on video. get it on youtube. people will watch. people will change their minds

you will be doing much good

good luck!
it's mostly about the liver, good liver function

the liver is the body's chemistry set

it makes chemicals we need, and it destroys chemicals that can harm us, whether from food or our own waste products

the liver can regenerate, everyone has a little bit of wolverine in them, but only to an extent, and only so many times

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Liver_regeneration

&gt;Interestingly, in most cases, liver function is only partially affected during liver regeneration. Whereas certain specialized functions such as drug metabolism decrease, many other primary functions such as albumin and bile acid production are not substantially affected.[1]

&gt;Two main type of models are used to study liver regeneration including surgical removal also referred to as partial hepatectomy (PHX) and chemical-induced liver damage. Whereas the mechanisms and kinetics of liver regeneration in these two models are different, many of the same signaling pathways stimulate liver regeneration in both pathways.[7]

...

&gt;The ability of liver to regenerate is central to liver homeostasis. Because liver is the major site of drug detoxification, it is exposed to many chemicals in the body which can induce cell death and injury. Liver can regenerate damaged tissue rapidly and thus prevents liver failure. Liver regeneration is also critical for patients of liver diseases where partial removal of liver due to fibrosis or tumor is a common therapy, which relies on ability of the remaining liver to regenerate back.


the power is not infinite. long time alcoholics have so much scar tissue it's amazing the liver still does anything. and sometimes it really does stop doing anything: congratulations, you have cirrhosis, you have mostly a lump of scars instead of a liver, and if you don't get a transplant you're dead

the more damage to the liver you do, the more you've permanently reduced it's capacity, the shorter your life, the weaker you are, the groggier you are, the more sleep you need, etc.

so live healthy. don't abuse your body. you can party, but not for long periods of time. and not to great excess

sometimes though via disease (like hepatitis) or lack of knowledge (too much acetaminophen by combining too many cough medicines) you can damage your liver even though you are otherwise healthy

but don't freak out, like i said, your liver can regenerate, as long you didn't give it a "critical" hit
just to nip the usual arguments in the bud:

yes men are on average stronger than women

but combat these days is not done by wresting and swordplay

furthermore, even in those specialized situations where physicality is important, there are plenty of women who actually have that requisite stamina, dexterity, and strength. why deny them? there's also plenty of men who fall behind the average woman in terms of fitness. why consider them?

it should be about the **individual**

so this is good news. if a woman can serve, wants to serve, and is good at it, power to her

and you should thank her for putting her ass on the line so you can stay at home in peace and complain on the internet
just to nip the usual arguments in the bud:

yes men are on average stronger than women

but combat these days is not done by wresting and swordplay

furthermore, even in those specialized situations where physicality is important, there are plenty of women who actually have that requisite stamina, dexterity, and strength. why deny them? there's also plenty of men who fall behind the average woman in terms of fitness. why consider them?

it should be about the **individual**

so this is good news. if a woman can serve, wants to serve, and is good at it, power to her

and you should thank her for putting her ass on the line so you can stay at home in peace and complain on the internet
here we go with the bullshit and the anecdotes

just to nip the usual arguments in the bud:

yes men are on average stronger than women. but combat these days is not done by wresting and swordplay

furthermore, even in those specialized situations where physicality is important, there are plenty of women who actually have that requisite stamina, dexterity, and strength. why deny them? there's also plenty of men who fall behind the average woman in terms of fitness. why consider them?

it should be about the **individual**

so this is good news. if a woman can serve, wants to serve, and is good at it, power to her

and you should thank her for putting her ass on the line so you can stay at home in peace and complain on the internet
&gt; it should be about the individual

this is now the third time i need to tell you that individual evaluation is the point, and hopefully you won't again respond with group evaluation, which carries no value or meaning in the context of individual physical fitness

do you accept skinny/ chubby weak guys just because they are male? do you reject amazons just because they are female?

then you must recognize your attitude towards your program is deficient and you need an attitude overhaul if you can't or won't see around to maximizing your fighting force
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gina_Carano

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ronda_Rousey

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Holly_Holm

this is where you reply "many men can beat these women..." and miss the obvious fucking point: plenty of women can make your cut. plenty of men cannot

you. evaluate. the. individual.

the stuff between the legs does not matter. the INDIVIDUAL does

does the concept register?&gt; Individual evaluations cannot be done at that level for initial recruitment. 

(facepalm)

so i stopped reading there. you can't just pull lies from your ass and continue to expect conversational consideration. and by lie i don't mean that statement explicitly, but the hidden lie that that is the only stage where the relevant evaluation takes place. you're not being intellectually honest. therefore the thread has ceased to be of any valueAnd the Samoans are huge.

Island dwarfism and island gigantism, works in homo sapiens as well as other animals (komodo dragon, dwarf hippo, etc.).i have no clue. someone may know. i'll bet you there is some role, processing some toxins. but how small or large i cannot sayapparently you've never been marriedi agree 100%. so you're not going to train the bottom half of the bell curve, the weak flabby men, and you're going to take amazons instead

that was the point of your post right?
how about i not listen to random trolls claiming to be joan of arc and instead listen to the decision just made by the pentagon. how does that sound to you?

seems to me their decision has slightly more value then some random douchebags with a bias and a feeble agenda
how about i not listen to random trolls claiming to be joan of arc and instead listen to the decision just made by the pentagon. how does that sound to you?

seems to me their decision has slightly more value then some random douchebags with a bias and a feeble agenda
it's a shame that worthy fighting women have to encounter your ignorant prejudice and hate. our country suffers for that. you're substandard thinking weakens our military

regardless, how about i not listen to random trolls and instead listen to the decision just made by the pentagon. how does that sound to you?

seems to me their decision has slightly more value then some random douchebags with a bias and a feeble agenda
you lack the understanding that it is individual performance which is the metric here in question

therefore, your entire contribution is worthless as it is not rational as you cannot or will not perceive the critical evaluation that is the issue: individual performance(facepalm)

yes, it's not possible to determine this at the recruiting stage

why do you think changing the fucking subject means you still have a point?
one idea down, 100 more ideas out there to engage

like something lower on the slope specifically for community outreach, a smaller telescope and an enthusiastic astronomerhow is bias and prejudice facts and reason?You're correct, there is no bias in my post.yes, you have crystallized the exact problem:

1. the scientific use is correct
2. the perceived benefactor of the scientific use is illegitimate

the disconnect beween 1 and 2 should not crush 1

it should crush 2

so the telescope should be built, but hawaiian people should run it
it mean spectators are useless and have no moral superiority despite many who do believe they can only watch and shallowly judge

moral authority only comes from involvement in the strugglehonestly that's why denmark is a less corrupt, happier, and richer country

people vote

all the people you meet arguing against voting: you're looking at the reason the usa has the corruption problems it has

you get the government you deserve. if you can't spend an hour or two every couple of years to vote, you lose the right to complain about anything. because you're the reason the problems exist
when i describe a mindlessly cynical slave type who makes no moves against their serious problems even when it requires only a little effort, it helps not to enter the thread as exactly such a loser
where's here?

no place has 100%i am in a comment thread on reddit. you will have to wait for the doctoral thesis
say 10% vote for a 3rd party candidate that doesn't win

that makes him influential, people pay attention to what he says, it effects the agenda of the party that wants to court his supporters

nevermind that much can be the deciding factor about who actually wins

your vote ALWAYS countsor brazil

i used to be for that, but i am aware in places that mandate voting there is a lot of joke candidates

you can't force people to care
say 10% vote for a 3rd party candidate that doesn't win

that makes him influential, people pay attention to what he says, it effects the agenda of the party that wants to court his supporters

nevermind that much can be the deciding factor about who actually wins

your vote ALWAYS counts
i am calling him a loser in life, who does not choose to change his lot in life, and allows those who corrupt his government and rob him get away with it

self-enforced slavery through weakness of character

there are always those who mean evil in this world. their existence is assured

what is utterly exasperating to me are those who bend over and choose to take it up the ass rather than fight for what is their's

and they are made that way with a few words of malicious intent, and their own mindlessly cynical despondency does the rest. the evil and cruel hand them the knife, and they stab themselves. cowards
he has no good points. he is not describing reality. he is projecting his own failed psychology on the world

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Learned_helplessness

&gt;Learned helplessness is behavior typical of an organism (human or animal) that has endured repeated painful or otherwise aversive stimuli which it was unable to escape or avoid. After such experience, the organism often fails to learn escape or avoidance in new situations where such behavior would be effective. In other words, the organism seems to have learned that it is helpless in aversive situations, that it has lost control, and so it gives up trying. Such an organism is said to have acquired learned helplessness.[1][2] Learned helplessness theory is the view that clinical depression and related mental illnesses may result from such real or perceived absence of control over the outcome of a situation.[3]

real **or perceived**

we're talking about voting. how fucking hard is that? the self-destruction is chosen by their own cowardly nature

you are not listening to someone describe reality. you are listening to some describe their own inner workings and through self-fulfilling prophecy making the world after their own failure and weakness. that we have to suffer for with them by their lack of fight for what is right

slaves

these weak cowards are more responsible for the success of the malicious in this world. they let the malicious win without a single resistance
yup

some of us try hard to change things

some sit around eat their fast food play their videogames then bend over and take it up the ass

our system is corrupt and they accept it with rationalizations that don't describe reality, just reveal their low weak character. disgusting and enraging
who is engaging in personal attacks hypocrite?

i am describing a mentality. this mentality exists in this world

do you deny that?

go ahead and deny it. make an argument

but if you shallowly judge me you lose all legitimacy because you can't even practice what you preach

you are so very smart huh?
the only problem with government is when it's agenda and the agenda of the people don't match. a good government in charge of an evil people is just as invalid as an evil government in charge of a good people

the value of democracy is that synchronizes the will of the people with the will of government. that is the only virtue of democracy, really

but this is why democracy is superior to other forms of government because it is inherently stable and constantly refreshes it's legitimacy. while other systems, the agenda of the ruling class and the people drift apart, legitimacy declines, until you have social breakdown and maybe revolution

so if the guy votes for evil, and enough people in the country are evil and agree, then that country deserves that evil government

however, who are you to judge what is evil and what is not?

all that matters is that the government and the people are on the same page. legitimacy. which leads to stability. which leads to everything GOOD in the world

you can't have a government that means good if the people don't want that. because it is unstable and it fails and you get even worse than "evil"



your comment is unread

i am interested in talking about the topic. i am not your date for the night
&gt; It's a lot easier to feel like your vote matters in a country with a population smaller than most states. There's also a lot less money involved which means less obfuscation and media manipulation. 

this is nothing but self-fulfilling prophecy. none of that robs you of your vote. i don't know you and i don't care about you but in this thread you made an argument not to vote, so i will take you to task for that
you can't empathize with someone you don't respect. we are in this trouble in this country because of these weak people. they need a kick in the ass, not an embrace. they need to get off their fucking lazy asses, empty their heads of their bullshit ideas and fucking vote! yup

the truth is reality is a tapestry made of a thousand threads

those who only isolate the western threads are simply betraying a bias, not an understanding of history or reality

you see people in /r/worldnews who have this mental block about talking about anything or anyone else to blame for the state of the middle east except the west. which is absurd. obviously middle easterners themselves deserve the blame and bear the responsibility for the state of their own lands. the west is but a bit player, a bumbling fool 

exactly, well saidyou're not talking about trading on wall street. you show up at a location and you vote. or you can do it by mail

you can do it early. you can do it late. it's so important and greatly impacts your life. there is no fucking excuse
exactly

hopefully the legions of morons on /r/worldnews that you see in every thread who endlessly blame the west are listening

the middle east's problems are not the fault of the west by cherry picking a handful of historical threads out of a tapestry of millions
The question is what are you doing to make it better.Because we don't vote.

If you don't vote you have no right to complain about government.

It is the way it is because too much of us don't vote for mindlessly cynical reasons.

We get the government we deserve. And low voter turn out makes our fate.

Vote America, or shut up. You deserve what you get if you don't vote.The Republicans don't care about abortion. They'd send their daughters to abort quietly in a heartbeat.

They trot out this perennial wedge issue every 4 years to galvanize a dependable voting bloc.

Then they push a plutocratic agenda that has nothing to do with abortion. The agenda just robs the useful fools who vote for them.But abortion is objectively not murder.

A glob of cells that might be a baby someday is not a human being.

The position that abortion is murder is objectively False.

You are entitled to your own opinion.

You aren't entitled to your own fake facts.Exactly.

In my book if you do not vote you lose all right to complain about anything in this country.

Your vote is your voice to effect change. If you don't use it then what the fuck do you expect?#1: VOTE!

If you do not vote you forfeit any right to complain about anything.American Exceptionalism:

We're exceptional at denying our problems.If they don't do it we return to the pre roe v wade world where hundreds of women and young girls died every year bleeding out on their bathroom floors.This is a logical fallacy.

There is a grey area. But the grey area does not negate the existence of the black and white area.

Example: you can't pinpoint the exact moment a child becomes an adult. However this does not mean childhood does not exist.

Likewise just because you can't pinpoint exactly when a glob of cells becomes a human life, you cannot deny the glob of cells is not human life.You're revealing an ethnocentric bias. You imagine the west has more potency than it actually has.

Anywhere you go in the world, the most important factor, by far, for why a place is the way it is is because of the people who actually live there.Completely False. 5 percent voting for a third candidate can swing an election. And people in power then pay attention to what the third party stands for to attract those voters.

Every vote counts in every election always.And sometimes the joke wins. In greece, iceland, somewhere else recently I think a comedian won...It has no brain, no capability of living. It is potential life. It is not yet life.If you dont vote you do. You were given the ability to control your future and you declined.Like a thousand other threads. The western threads are not even decisive.The citizens don't win because not enough of them vote. It really is that simple.

If everyone voted there would be massive changes in this country.If 5 % vote for a third party they can swing an election. Even if they dont the people in power will listen very carefully to this vital voting bloc to win their support in the future.

George Carlin was a comedian. He's simply wrong on this topic.You contradict yourself. Your job and extra efforts is to make it better.

And a glob of cells is not living. It is potential life. It has no thoughts, it cannot survive. It might live someday. That is all. This is objective fact.I didn't get past your first a paragraph. A glob of cells is a potential human. It is not yet a human. I am not sure how to deal with someone who cannot understand something so plainly obvious. 5 percent voting third party can swing an election.

Even if they dont now everyone pander to that 5 percent because their vote is important.

That's the power of voting. To not use that power is ignorant self destruction.You focus on the western influences and miss a thousand other influences which are much more decisive. Mainly the actual people who live in  the actual country.  They always matter the most. Every single thing the west and soviets did in the middle east the entire cold war is but a bumbling side show compared to what actual middle easterners did themselves in regards to the fate of their own lands.By not voting they marginalize themselves.

It sucks for you because of the losers who don't vote. If they voted it would suck less for you. Thank you for voting. Kindly kick the next mindlessly cynical moron in the ass who tells you they don't vote. They are the source of our problems.It's the rationale of self defeat and self fulfilling prophecy.  Things suck because of what they believe about their own influence. The problem is they drag us down with them with their mindless cynicism. You do realize I said blob of cells and not full term baby, right? You think you make a valid point by changing the topic?Every single place has been changed by every other place. The existence of influence doesn't mean all blame goes elsewhere. Some idiots actually believe that though.Yes and you get those other changes BY voting

You are correct we need those other things. So we need to vote for people that will make it happen!

It all comes down to voting. It is the essential lynch pin effort.I probably know just as much as you on the history of the topic, maybe more. The difference is I realize that the people who actually live in a given place are the most important factors for why a place is the way it is. This is True of any place. It doesn't mean the west is blameless. It means the west is a second rate influence.Likewise there was no real content difference from your first to second comment.

So my assertion stands unchallenged and correct because you can't think of a reason why it is wrong.

But it is usually a sign of good character to concede someone has made a good point to you when they do it.Do you have a reason why I am wrong? I am describing facts and reality to you. Go ahead and reject that but you're just shooting the messenger.Politicians are puppets of the people. If you are referring to the influence of money you elect people to change our horrible legalized corruption laws by showing and voting and getting them into power. The vote is everything.Say the usa turns into a neo imperial douchebag country like Russia and invades canada in 2025.

And you can show that the american demagogue responsible for this rose to power following the events of 9/11.

Would you then say that Osama bin Laden is 100% responsible for the usa invading canada because he did 9/11?

If you can understand why this sounds so absurd, then you can understand why your attitude on western influence in the middle east is equally absurd.

You cherry pick a line of cause and effect and ignore thousands of other causes and effects.You shouldn't believe it you should know it. Is objective fact. If everyone voted there would be an earthquake of change in this country.the only problem with government is when it's agenda and the agenda of the people don't match. a good government in charge of an evil people is just as invalid as an evil government in charge of a good people

you are comparing the state of the people's intelligence with an idealized utopia of informed voters. that's ok. but a different topic

in reality we are comparing the state of people's satisfaction with their government and the number of them who participate in its formation. they shouldn't be disappointed when their government doesn't represent their interests when they don't express their interests by voting

yes, people are elected on lies and broken promises. ideally enough vote to throw out the bum in anger. in reality people get disillusioned and don't vote. so the bum is unpunished. that's the problem

the value of democracy is that it synchronizes the will of the people with the will of government. that is the only virtue of democracy, really

but this is why democracy is superior to other forms of government because it is inherently stable and constantly refreshes it's legitimacy. while other systems, the agenda of the ruling class and the people drift apart, legitimacy declines, until you have social breakdown and maybe revolution

i don't care about your point of the idealized society of perfectly informed voters. i care about the reality of the disconnect between what the people actually want, and what they actually get, because they simply don't vote. because that is an illegitimate government and an unstable society

i don't care if the government sucks, i care that it is legitimate

so if the guy votes for evil, and enough people in the country are evil and agree, then that country deserves that evil government

however, who are you to judge what is evil and what is not? a lot of what people mean when say "informed voter" is "indoctrinated into my agenda". so your point is debateable even. who objective decides what is best for a country? i say the people do, ultimately, whatever the fuck they want, even if it is objectively bad for them.it is what they want that matters, and that the composition of their government is a faithful expression of that will. which you only get by voting

all that matters is that the government and the people are on the same page. legitimacy. which leads to stability. which leads to everything ACTUALLY GOOD in the world

you can't have a government that means good, let's say according to your perfect "informed" agenda. if the people don't want that. because it is unstable and it fails and you get even worse than "evil", you get actual instability and that is the real evil

yes. any fucking bullshit you say "and this is what the west did and why everything sucks there"

1. the cia intervention in iran in the 1950s. 
2. the sykes picot agreement. 
3. giving osama bin laden stinger missiles in the 1980s. 
4. the bush's moronic intervention in iraq

etc.

every single one of those things are distant seconds to the real reason why the middle east is the way it is. none of what the west does matters as much as what the people in the middle east themselves actually want for their society

the usa nuked, NUKED japan. is japan a hellhole of sectarian hate now and they blame all troubles on the west? no they cleaned right up and became a rich stable society. because the japanese know that the japanese are responsible for the state of japan
or you are pridefully ignorant and don't want to challenge your beliefs with a valid defense of them. your intellectual dishonesty is noted and shows the flimsiness of your thinkingpeople self-disenfranchise with disillusionment

then they don't complain when the illegitimate government they helped create by not voting actually takes step to actively disenfranchise them

you should fucking care if your government is actively denying you your rights. that people DON'T CARE means, as i said, you get the government you deserve

when the government makes it harder for you to vote, you should be fucking enraged

instead it's more fast food and videogames

and so the usa declines further

if the people don't care, the country is going to shit

if the people care, they vote, and the government improves

that is the only problem here: people don't care, don't vote, and then act surprised when their government sucks. it's your own damn fault, you who do not vote

now get off your fucking lazy asses, vote, and stop dragging us who do care down with you

we are an influence, yes. but not the primary deciding factor. middle easterners are the primary deciding factor

the sectarian fighting you allude to is the actual reason why the middle east is broken. then these sects REQUEST INTERVENTION. we are to blame for what they request us to do? we have their own agenda, yes. but we don't set the actual agenda, middle easterners do

and the reason for the sectarian hate goes back centuries, not just wwii
now you are making a good definition of the topic

i would agree that if a case can be made that a baby is viable, such as the entire third trimester, that baby should not be killed, that is murder

the first trimester is all blob though. and if you say it is killing a life in the first trimester you are a liar who doesn't understand facts

the second trimester is the sketchy grey area

but what you see is partisans talking about third trimester abortions to justify preventing first trimester abortions. that's dishonest and unrespectable
&gt; If 5 % vote for a third party they can swing an election. Even if they dont the people in power will listen very carefully to this vital voting bloc to win their support in the future.

that's not an opinion. that's real
so stop responding

what you really have is an inability, not lack of desire, to respond. because i made a valid point. but you lack the character to simply say "thank you for making a good point" like an intellectually honest person
thank you

it's True:

pro-life voters are just cattle herded to the polls with predictable manipulations to enrage them to elect people who don't give a fucking shit about them and will never make the change they want. instead the professional prostitute known as a congressperson simply serves the plutocrats who bankroll their campaigns. which often means robbing the idiots who voted for them

useful fools

occasionally the scripted republican demagoguery enrages one of the more unhinged "pro-lifers" to shoot someone like just a few days ago

no sense of responsibility for that though by republicans, of course
&gt; If I kill a bacterium I am killing a life. 

so washing your hands is murder? are you a radical Jain?

you keep moving the goalposts. you can't make a valid point if you keep changing the topic. it reveals the flimsiness of your thinking

the point is HUMAN life. which means a viable entity capable of surviving on its own

not a fucking blob that SOMEDAY may be a human
True

but they will reap the anger of that third party if someone else does listen to them

it's all about caring and voting
no

too easy to manipulate and hack

we shouldn't even use voting machines

everything should be pen and pencil. the most technophilic society and the most primitive one should vote the same way

you can still hack an election that uses paper and pencil, but you need an army of conspirators

with electronic, you need just one well placed hacker

also, if there are 10 ways to hack a paper vote, there are 100 ways to hack a mechanical vote, and 1,000 ways to hack an electronic one

more complexity means more attack vectors

so there is no need for the extra complexity. it makes people not trust their vote. which feeds a sense a vote might be fake. which effects legitimacy and stability


can it live outside the mother?

does it have any thoughts or feelings?

no

it has differentiating cells which might someday turn into a brain that forms feelings thoughts and emotions. but not yet

it's not a human being, it is not anything worthy of considering human life. it is *potential* human life
the first trimester is blob. abortion is legal and nothing is killing

the third trimester is viable. abortion should be illegal and it is killing

somewhere in the second is the grey

and it gets really tricky when you talk about advances in medicine and what new technology makes possible

but the real probem is when "pro-life" douchebags use the concept of aborting a baby in the ninth month to say aborting a fucking pile of snot in the first month is the same thing. lying bullshit&gt; That is not a criteria for being alive or being human.

i stopped reading there

on what authority do you claim this?

the real argument then is what counts as human life

i say you have to talk about something with thoughts and feelings and capable of biological integrity: survival. eating, breathing

you think ejecting a small speck of snot carries the same moral weight as murdering a grown person

objectively False and laughable


well yeah, europeans also get shafted like americans, but not to the same extent. just look at the election finance laws for some fucking enragement if you are american

but obviously the euros are currently doing far better than the usa on turnout and integrity and lower corruption

because the euros have *some* problems doesn't mean they are exactly as bad as the usa
then show me where i am wrong. if you don't do that, you have no case. you have to make your argument. you can't just claim it

middle easterners are the primary reason why the middle east is the way it is

do you agree or disagree?
you're playing word games and avoiding the concept that defines the topic

the point is defining what is something considered worthy of calling it killing, to destroy it. a fucking blob that might someday become a human, destroying it, is not killing

why is a blob of cells still differentiating into various organs, why is destroying that the moral equivalent of murdering a fully formed human being? explain to me
and yet you keep responding. you can't even maintain integrity between your words and actions. no honesty, no character, no integrity

make an argument on the topic. or shut upwhat the hell are you talking about? "borderline non-existent disease"?

we're talking about the problems with the us govt's corruption and lack of integrity
i am merely making an objective observation of your behavior: the contrast between what you say "i'm not going to argue with you" and what you do: argue with me. no integrity. so this is an objective characterization, not an empty insult, like a quip about autism 

if you don't want to argue with someone what you usually want to do is not reply to them. is that a difficult concept for you?
i just picked my nose and flung the snot on my monitor. there are human cells in that snot

OH MY GOD I'M A KILLER

you need to understand the concept in question here. which i think you are actively avoiding. you just lack the intellectual honesty to concede a simple point
so stop responding

changing the topic is just a low character way of avoiding conceding the point

so you're welcome for the education today on the topic. i would suggest next time having some more character and honesty
source please?

(nevermind that even if we were #1 it doesn't mean we should trying to do better)ah, stalking. you sink yet lower

if we're done here on the real actual topic at hand, then there is no further point to this thread

no response or a response of just more useless crap, i will understand that you lack the character and honesty to concede a simple point and i will move on
good, if you agree there's no argumentbit player != no role

it's pretty funny to call someone dumb when you can't understand simple word meaning

and with that socially retarded insult, i'm out
1. Tarantino is a film geek

2. Tarantino is a great filmmaker

These are separate topics (it is important to note this, as they really are separate. I'm certain for Tarantino one informs the other, but it does not follow for the audience).

I like Tarantino's great films. But, and I'm probably going to be voted down and I'm sorry to anyone who cares deeply about this but I don't think I am alone:

I don't care about these ritualistic acts of devotion.

I want to see great films. These tweaks in presentation are without meaning to me.
i think that corruption is always a problem. i think low voter turnout leads to illegitimate government and then instability. i think these are serious problems. if you wish to make light of these problems or act like they aren't serious, i don't have much to say to you, as i find your position dangerous and irresponsible

whatever statistical wiggles you identify amongst the most successful countries in the world does not really make your point or disprove mine. i can equally point to philippines or cameroon or bangladesh to support mine

but thank you for sourcing your assertion
because of math:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Duverger's_law

when the founding fathers built our system they weren't trying to confine us to two parties, but that's what their system enables

if a third party appears it is cannibalized (like perot) or it grows powerful enough to cannibalize the weakest of the other two (like the whigs)

just because of how the math works out. it's not by design or conspiracy or influence or power

we would need a very radical overhaul to get viable third and fourth parties in the usa

as for beholden to plutocrats that is also a hard change but much easier. just pass comprehensive campaign finance laws (i didn't say easy, i said easier)it's chicken or egg

we have to vote a lot more. that will cause an earthquake in the system. then we have to punish those who don't follow through

a sanders presidency for example would take us closer. we can actually achieve this if enough vote (small chance, but real chance)

it is difficult, but it is within reach. it would take massive voter turnout and sustained attention

and that's the whole point. if enough people don't vote and don't care, we get shit. which is what we have because not enough vote or care
LOLsanders

warren

others

candidates that want campaign finance reform do exist

they will encounter resistance. so you get incremental change with sustained interest from the public. that's the trick

since we're all getting impoverished by plutocrat agendas, maybe this will be the key to the sustained interest
fair enough, i respect your opinion

to me, the movie content alone is what matters. not these tweaks in presentation outside of the content of the film
i respect that

enjoy the film (literally!)
you're never going to snap your fingers and everything is fixed. considering some of the problems other countries have we're doing ok. i'm not airhead optimistic but i'm not going to be a pessimist either. when some people give into negativity, they help the bad guys win. all we can do is keep trying. keep trying my friend!
iran isn't a democracy

the philippines hands out cash to people to vote a certain way

the topics are definitely related as no one wants corruption and if people voted this sentiment more then we would get better anticorruption laws
the mullahs pick the candidates in iran. that's not democracy

and if the philippine parties paying people to vote a certain way the voter turn out is artificial, and an aspect of corruption, not desire to vote
&gt;This is why you are the consumer and not the artist. 

and what are you?so why aren't all states low crime paradises because of all the guns?

oh that's right, because high gun ownership is no protection, it's the actual threat
perhaps because you're "too dull to grasp it"
don't you guys have an insane suicide rate?but... but... if you arm everyone it's safer /s
as an american i apologize for this distinctly american derangement about guns

obviously easy access to guns just leads to more senseless death. that's it. not more safety. it's beyond obvious to anyone rational on the topic

but it's like arguing with antivaxxers or creationists at this point. they have their delusional quasireligious faith based appreciation of guns. and then there is the rest of us who can think clearly

it is actually only a very (very) vocal minority at this point. but as we have yet more senseless deaths the larger quieter majority will speak up and we will finally have some sensible gun control in the usa
you're being sarcastic right? isolated?plot, mood, character development, music, lighting...

this makes a film

not gimmicks outside the screen
They are part of the filmIt's like the emperors new clothes around hereCome to beautiful greenland. Experience the bracing cold and endless nights that make you question existence.LOLNader helped cost gore the election. Bad example for your argument. Nader completely validates that every single vote counts.ExactlyWe're not safe and we're not free. The threat to my freedom to live is too many easy guns.Are you high?Likewise I upvoted you because even though I disagree with your point, a steak served on a vintage hubcap sounds like a fantastic idea.An infant has thoughts and emotions and an infant can breathe and eat on its own.If you want to talk to yourself without any input from other people and reality you don't even need to go on the internet.Hiw do you stop corruption anywhere? Enforcement. How do you enforce removal of politicians who don't follow through and follow another interest, corruption? You vote. What other power do the people have? The courts and laws. How do you get robust courts and laws? You vote for candidates that enact them. I understand your point but all I am thinking is how wonderful it must be to have that sort of much smaller problem than the kind of problems we have in the usa which would probably make your head explode.Which don't mean shit since it is easy to get guns outside those jurisdictions. We need nationwide serious gun control and enforcement.then everyone has a different experience, and no one is controlling that experience. therefore, it's not a part of the film

if dogs bark in the alley behind the theatre 20 minutes into the film, that's part of the experience? if tarantino notes how a critic reacted to that 50 years ago and he wants to recreate dogs barking in the alley behind the theatre at the 20 minute mark, is that really about the experience of watching a movie? or is it some maudlin, cloying extraneous nostalgia that is interesting and kooky, but not part of filmmaking or film watching?

if it's not in the film, it's not part of the movie, it's not part of the experience. but i suppose you mean "experience" in the kooky nostalgia sort of way which is a sort of emperors new clothes thing i can only shrug about


now that i can understandwhat major point? you're changing the topic. are you talking about dna? my snot has human dna. picking my nose is murder?

the topic is what is considered human life vs what is potential human life

i am going to eat a hamburger. my stomach will digest that and incorporate it into my cells. so a hamburger is human life in a few hours. so if i throw the hamburger away it is murder?

*potential* human life vs actual human life. to eject a blob is not killing a human. it is destroying something which may become a human at some point

do you understand the actual topic here?
my snot has human cells in it which have a complete 100% copy of my dna

but it needs something else to be human. namely all the other cells arranged properly with breathing and eating and thinking to function as a complete human

likewise, a blob of cells *in the process of becoming* a fully functional human being is not yet an actual human being

a complete set of car parts in a warehouse is not a car. it is potentially a car. someone has to go in and assemble the parts. then it is a car. but until that person puts those parts together, you can not logically look at a pile of parts and go "this is a car"it failed miserably because of the jurisdictions outside that don't control guns. what is the point of strong gun control in chicago when you can drive 15 minutes to another county and get a gun easy? you need nationwide control

educate yourself:

http://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2013/01/29/us/where-50000-guns-in-chicago-came-from.html?_r=0

japan, australia, uk, germany, france, etc.: control guns, insane gun violence and death goes down
the point being it alarms you and you vote and do something about it. or at least most danes

some americans like me care as much as you. but in the usa, most would rather continue playing fallout 4 and shoveling cheetos into their mouths

but i'm glad we serve as a cautionary tale to keep you properly worried of the alternative should you not care
yay global warming!

global warming is a greenlander plot to make greenland actually green
you mean polar bear and narwhal population. there is only sparse vegetation on greenland, a few low grasses and flowers, no trees. calling it "greenland" is some sort of viking joke

i guess there's muskox. those are some hardy hardy animals

Pot is a recreational drug. Nothing like firearms. When guns are better controlled criminal masterminds still get them, yes. But criminal masterminds are using guns wisely, not shooting up street corners because a chick looked at them funny. The kind of person who does that isn't trying very hard in life so if guns are hard to get they simply don't get them. Proof: uk, Australia japan, france, germany, etc.Are you avoiding my point about the pile of car parts because that finally made an impression on you and you get it but you're too daft to admit it?

The point here is about what is deserving of rights and protections as  human life. A blob of cells in the process of becoming a fully formed human sometime later is not a human life for this purpose. This purpose is the actual topic of discussion here.A child has thoughts, feelings. A child breathes, eats and functions as a autonomous biological entity.

You dance around the central difference between coherent life worthy of protection and potential life which destroying has no moral implications thereof because it does not function as a viable entity.

By avoiding the obvious and dancing around on the periphery I have to question your intellectual honesty or your ability to understand the actual topic.

And it is not my opinion that a glob of cells cannot function as a coherent independent entity. That is a fact.You have not addressed the actual topic of viable autonomous life vs life still in the process of assembling. Can you do that? If not, my original statement before your alterations is correct and you have simply given another example of avoiding what you don't want admit.i visited the largest geothermal plant in the world, in the philippines on leyte

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Malitbog_Geothermal_Power_Station

http://mw2.google.com/mw-panoramio/photos/medium/33069106.jpg

it's kind of like a james bond lair. guys in camo standing around with m4s (NPA, jokingly called "nice people's army" apparently are still around) and there are these huge metal structures in the middle of the jungle mountains, all alone

they are shrouded in constant rain and fog and mist because that is how the plants work: steam billowing out of the ground drives turbines that create electricity that is used as faraway as manila. there is this constant low rushing roar of the steam and turbines at work. there's also these weirdly electric blue mountain streams, minerals coming out of suspension from superheated water deep in the earth. wouldn't want to drink that

talking to the locals, before the geothermal plants people would go up and bathe in the hot springs or cook eggs in the water

here's some pictures:

http://www.google.com/search?q=leyte+geothermal+plant&amp;tbm=isch

so to make volcanic geothermal work on sicily, all you need to do is pipe sea water into the earth at the right spot, and harness the steam that comes out to drive turbines. a natural steam engine

nearby in lake danao are these freshwater mussels, a foot long. i don't know why people don't farm them. maybe they taste bad, but locals were selling them on the roadside

http://worldenoughandtimeblog.com/2014/11/04/lake-danao/

someone enterprising: go to lake danao, get some enormous freshwater mussels, farm them, start a new food sensation

**edit**: pictures, and musselsall i could find was this but i am certain i remember larger

http://leyteperyodiko.com/fresh-water-mussel-menu-at-lake-danao/oh no absolutely, i am vastly oversimplifiying the process

there is also the problem that, like fracking, you can create earthquakes

http://www.scientificamerican.com/article/geothermal-drilling-earthquakes/interesting. i didn't think of that but it makes sense
good then i'll have the final word:

you are not being logical nor coherent. a human life has thoughts, feelings, emotions, and is autonomous. if you want to call some blob without any of those things equal in deserving of protection as real human life, you are without meaning or value on this topic because those things are obviously different

refusing to admit and accept the difference is being pridefully ignorant

woah that's awesome

apparently iceland is the absolute king of geothermal energy  in the world in terms of number of plants and harvested energy
here in the usa we have morons who believe that
the place i visited on leyte, it's natural ground water, they don't pipe it in

i'm certain there's salt created down there but the problem is you are talking about superheated water from deep in the earth with volcanic rock, so some of the elements are very toxic metals. it's not just sea water salt

it's the perfect movie because it's half romantic movie for the girls, then half disaster movie for the boys
i saw one of the LOTR in the philippines

legolas would come on screen and the girls would start going WOOO...

and then it would cut to gandalf before the girls peaked wooing

so the impression was the women were wooing at gandalf

so the guys would start laughing right after

this surprisingly happened half a dozen times at least

also, in the philippines they play the national anthem before the movie starts and everyone stands up for that. that was weird
that makes sense. there's probably all sorts of other nasties like chromium, cadmium, etc.i don't know, the unintentional humor made the experience enjoyable. probably in a different wayyou sound hungry. time for lunch. martini cocktail, shaken, not stirred?I actually knew a guy who told me about his experience stringing electric poles in mindanao. They had guards but Abu sayaf or milf or whomever would still go up to them and say things like: "tomorrow we're coming back and shooting all of you."There are movies aimed at men and movies aimed at women, for stereotypical reasons, yes. But it works. Titanic nicely dovetails both.TIL! What's funny is those lyrics were written by Francis Scott Key aboard a British ship in 1812 as you damn lobsterbacks blew Baltimore to smithereens. So I hope you listen to it 500 more times until you rip your ears off :-)SadIs it mandatory in argentina?Shhh

Don't make him angryGot it!you're a liar. anyone can run in the usa, no restrictions except age. and if for example the leadership of the republicans does not support trump, which they might not, it will tear the republican party to shreds and they will surely lose in 2016. meanwhile, trump will still be running for president as a third party and getting votes, which he has hinted at

but in iran, you are appointed by the fucking grumpy old men who think they have a monopoly on the word of god. no one else can run. if you try to run, you get arrested and punished, severely

you understand the fucking difference right?
use the /s sarcasm indicator. otherwise people take you seriously. because internetthey have thugs in every country genius

difference is in the usa the thugs have easy guns. so the usa has far far more pointless deaths. in other countries they just have knives. there's no such thing as a mass casualty drive by knife throwing or 6 year old girl being killed by a stray throwing knife from across a park

proof:

https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/worldviews/wp/2013/02/01/british-gangs-use-flare-guns-now-because-they-cant-find-real-ones/

talking to you people is like talking to an antivaxxer or a creationist or a 9/11 truther. you have this insane avoidance of simple basic logic and facts

our social and economic peers control guns and have far lower senseless death rates

and so will we

we will route around the insane damage people like yourself who can't think about gun control sanely represent, and we will get good gun control in the usa
i really don't fucking care if people make their own guns. as long as they register and license it like RESPONSIBLE gun owners. if they do not, then arrest the dangerous fucks

think whatever you want wackjob. people are sick of the senseless deaths
every once in a while i'll make a sarcastic comment, and i'm suddenly at -10

this is the effect:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Poe's_lawpeople also make meth at home

the existence of fringe dangerous nutjobs doesn't change the attitude of society

go for it dude, start making your own guns. power to you. i am not sure why i should give a fuck about weird nutjobs making guns. you're nothing but a future police blotter entry to me

and thank you for making society more dangerous because of your psychological problems, asshole
the existence of a limitation is not the same as a much worse limitation

you're not being intellectually honest

furthermore, russia controls opposition through trumped up mafia like tactics, bankrupting people for marching, just flat out killing them, etc. there is no coherent opposition in russia on purpose

neither iran nor russia are democracies
there is no reason for you to make guns at home unless you're an asshole

please, educate silly me as to valid reasons for making a gun at homeThe name of North korea is officially the democratic peoples republic.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Elections_in_North_Korea

They hold "elections". By your standards north Korea is an "illiberal" democracy. Fucking bullshit. It's just not a democracy, period.

I'm not saying iran or russia is as bad as the norks.

But the sham wink wink nudge nudge of authoritarian countries like Iran or russia towards the idea of democracy is a fucking joke. Just because a country makes a bullshit demonstration of going through the motions doesn't mean anything. The power is clearly not in the hands of the people like a real democracy. It's staged potemkin village style "democracy".

Iran and russia are not democracies, period.
You're like this guy:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/David_Hahn

Have fun dude. Try to grow a conscience if one of your creations kills someone. Although a grasp of morality doesn't really have much to do with your efforts.

You're a dangerous deluded kook. I feel sorry for the people who live near you. You are a threat.what do you do with your creations?

do you destroy them or sell them?

if you sell them, who do you sell them to?

who is aware of what you are doing and what is the security level on your workshop?
ok, good, not an actually dangerous kook. just a kook

btw, the existence of making your own guns is no argument against gun laws

making bombs and guns is work

the kind of casual hot head or mentally unstable individual who causes mass shootings will not or cannot devote the energy and time to make a weapon

but in the usa, where guns are easy to get by these individuals because the control laws are weak and full of holes, we have nothing but mass carnage 365/24/7

be glad you live in australia where guns are kept from the kind of person who would kill easily because a woman looked at him funny. they're just not trying very hard in life. so they kill easy. and also if denied a gun, they simply don't get one

this is an australian with a good attitude to guns:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7OZIOE6aMBk
all involved should be identified and charged

as media they know better or should know better
Intellectual property law should last a few years, no more.

But in our sick society it keeps getting extended.pharmaceuticals get away with around 7 years. if they can make billions doing that, there's no reason for a copyright for books, films, etc. last longer than that either
&gt; If tarantino recreates the dogs barking at the 20 minute mark surely that's part of the film too? 

then he's not making a movie

he's making a play
http://www.fda.gov/Drugs/DevelopmentApprovalProcess/ucm079031.htm#How%20long%20is%20exclusivity%20granted%20for?

&gt;3. How long is exclusivity granted for?

&gt;It depends on what type of exclusivity is granted.

&gt;Orphan Drug (ODE) - 7 years

&gt;New Chemical (NCE)- 5 years

&gt;"Other" Exclusivity - 3 years for a "change" if criteria are met

&gt;Pediatric Exclusivity (PED) - 6 months added to existing Patents/Exclusivity

&gt;Patent Challenge \u2013 (PC) \u2013 180 days (this exclusivity is for ANDAs only)

and the drug industry makes billions

there is no fucking earthly reason besides abject greed for media intellectual property to last decades

sometimes people want to use ancient media and the company sues the person even though the exposure actually increases the exposure value and revenue of the forgotten media. so it's stupid self-defeating greed

intellectual property law needs a complete overhual

until then, i encourage people to ignore or sabotage intellectual property rights whenever and wherever possible. on principle
&gt; If you relied on IP protection to provide an income for you and your family to live on, you would think differently.

if a carpenter builds me a deck. and me, my children, and my grandchildren, must pay that carpenter, and his children, and his grandchildren, a dime every fucking time i walk across it that's fucking moronic. the system is indefensible

"people depend upon the income" is a fucking bullshit excuse. get a fucking job like the rest of us. there is no magic passage in the bible or word from god that says the grandchildren of someone who wrote a song gets an income. that's completely absurd and will be ignored or sabotaged until it is abolished
the ip system has been broken and extended to absurdity by corruption and greed. if you are not aware of how abusive it now is you are not paying attentionDo I care? Stop defending a broken and abusive system.And all of the streets in Monopoly are from Atlantic City, New Jersey, which is full of casinos.

It's perfect. I don't know why it's never been done before.Successful religions don't become successful by letting women do what they want with their bodies.

Successful religions become successful by shaming, bullying, coercing and otherwise staging the woman's social environment such that becoming a baby factory is her only approved option.Compared to our social and economic peers we do go around shooting each other at a much higher rate.

Easy guns in the USA is no protection. It's the threat.This is amongst the stupidest shit I have ever read.

I mean how can a group of nominally adult human beings sit around and talk about this and take it seriously?There are people who have seen more mind-numbing violence than it would seem humanly possible to withstand and would never raise their hand against another person.

And there are coddled outwardly sweet people from stable wonderful backgrounds who will resort to murder to solve conflicts.

It's about the individual. Everyone is different. Everyone makes their own choices. You are responsible for what YOU do.

You're trafficking in lame excuse making.

Seeing violence gives you a pass to hurt people?Do you have a point? Or you just want to demonstrate that you have a social disorder to strangers.I understand where he is coming from.

Whatever the reason for someone getting violent, criminality or mental health, they are still a threat to society either way.

Mental health issue should mean they go to a hospital instead of a jail (or at least it should in a well functioning society).

However the primary purpose of either place is to remove the person from general society as they represent a threat to other people(yes, rehab and treatment as well).

But you can't get away with violence in general society, no matter what the reason.Which is much better than the USA.

You have a better chance of avoiding or surviving being stabbed than shot.

And there is no such thing as a drive by mass casualty knife throwing incident or a six year old girl killed by a stray throwing knife from across the park.Drugs are not weapons. There is no such thing as addiction to guns or going into withdrawal if you don't have a gun. A casual hot head or loony toon denied a gun simply doesn't get one. A criminal mastermind will still get a gun. And use it wisely, not shoot up a street corner because a woman looked at him funny.As if that somehow makes all the innocents killed by all the tragedies go away. A level of pointless insane carnage that Europe has nowhere near the same rate of.I apologize.

I did not realize you owned this reddit thread.Why do you think cherry picking stiled views changes basic facts?

The basic fact is the USA has a much higher murder rate than its social and economic fears due to guns.Your first sentence and your second sentence have something to do with each other. Let's see if you can figure out what it is.You ruin reddit threads for the sake of your personal social problems. We deserve to be engaged fairly. Beating up strangers, even if just socially, shows you have a problem. You do not have the right to do what you do.

Not that I think I'm going to change your behavior here and now. But you should at some point in your life grow the fuck up.Part of the way of solving mental health problems, gang problems, drug problems etc. Is to get easy guns out of the hands of people in these problems.

Guns make the problems far worse.

If you actually care about gangs, drug addiction, mental health, etc. you would be arguing for better gun control.We have a right to have a safe society.

Yes many can be treated. It depends upon their condition.

But if someone doesn't take their meds, gets extreme in their violence, has high recidivism etc. then it is nice to talk about treating them and maybe we can in the future but in the meantime they need to be out society. Ideally a hospital not a jail.Again more stilted cherry picking to deny basic facts.

Switzerland has high gun ownership rate for example but has extremely tight regulations on ammo, training, safe storage that I WOULD FUCKING LOVE in the USA.

So if your point is that you want Swiss gun ownership rules in the USA then I endorse your post enthusistically.

But I suspect you just want these out of context talking points to go out there and prevent critical thinking on the subject.

Easy guns in the USA is an huge problem and we need to control guns better.
If you're trying to argue that guns aren't much more lethal than knives then you have truly reached delusion and derangement.Sorry, you're just a garden variety troll.Those are both actual real problems in their own right.Well you need to tell the pentagon. If they can arm troops with sabres instead of guns they will save a ton of money (assuming saving money is a goal of the pentagon).

I don't really know what to do with a person who argues guns aren't more lethal than knives. It's like talking to an antivaxxer or a creationist.Oh yes, I'm clearly the drama queen here.Thus is very personal for you.

Your problem is this is a public reddit thread and we aren't your buddies.

Although we might actually care if you lead with adult behavior rather than insults attacks and lame temper tantrums.a knife is more deadly in certain specialized situations than a gun

hell, a spoon is more deadly than a gun in the right crazy circumstance

but the ACTUAL TOPIC here is general use, civil society, in which a gun is obviously way more lethal

i'm certain you are intelligent enough to understand this. so you're just trolling me/ have your head so far up the propaganda's ass you can't think straight/ you know guns are more deadly and you are actually maliciously arguing otherwise out of lame demagoguery


the criminal mastermind will always get a gun. he's not our problem. he uses his gun wisely and carefully

the problem with easy guns is the loony toon or the hot head. they aren't trying hard in life or are unable to try hard in life. thus, when guns are harder to get, they simply don't get them

proof:

https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/worldviews/wp/2013/02/01/british-gangs-use-flare-guns-now-because-they-cant-find-real-ones/

meanwhile a drug is a psychopharmacological addictive substance

it hacks your basic reward cycle in the brain and removes every single motivation in your life and replaces it with just one motivation that you will abandon all relationships, all jobs to pursue

as far as i know, a hunk of gun metal does not have this biochemical effect
well said

it's kind of a tragedy that the will to power is often motivated by amongst the basest of human inclinations. such that those who tend to get power do not really represent us
&gt;  I own 2 guns, but I support higher regulation.

so then we have no argument. well met and thank you for that. but apparently i'm not the only one making assumptionsOther countries have problems with poverty, gangs, drugs, mental health, etc.

Part of the way of solving mental health problems, gang problems, drug problems etc. is to get easy guns out of the hands of people in these problems. That's one of the ways our social and economic peers do it.

Guns make these problems far worse.

If you actually care about gangs, drug addiction, mental health, etc. you would be arguing for better gun control.

Plus I don't know why you say americans don't go around murdering at a higher rate than our peers. It's simple fact we do. Because of easy guns.
No right is unlimited. Reasonable restrictions to keep guns out of the hands of loony toons and hot heads does not negate the second amendment. And as the insane carnage continues, the outrage to do so will make it happen.the restrictions have laughable loop holes and arent enforced. we will close the loopholes, enforce it strongly and make more common sense regulations

nevermind the fact your head isn't exploding because as you say we already do have regulations on the second amendment and you aren't screaming like a maniac about it

all rights have restrictions

the first amendment doesn't mean you can threaten someone's life for example



religious courts should decide what to eat on Eid al-Fitr or what house decorations are good for Christmas

they have no reason to be in a position to decide anything more serious
Our actual percentage is higher. We have a much higher murder **rate** than our social and economic peers. The cause of death due to guns is the part that makes it so. Please learn your facts.Our **homicide** rates is much higher than our social and economic peers. All due to cause of death by shooting. Please learn your facts.Our social and economic peers also have poverty, gangs, drugs, etc.

If you want to solve those problems you make guns harder to get because easy guns makes those problems worse.Yes, it will take a while to drain the swamp. But because the right thing to do is hard to do is not a reason not to do it.If you really care about solving gangs, poverty, drugs etc. you control guns better because easy guns makes those problems much worse.Watch and see. The majority of Americans already want better gun control. It is a loud vocal minority of deranged people who can't think clearly on the topic holding us back. That will change.Fascination with violence is a human trait not an American one.It's scary you think that idea has any basis in reality. Hot heads and loony toons use guns because they are easy to get. Criminal masterminds will always get guns and use them wisely. not shoot up street corners.Or homicide rate is off the carts compared to our peers. Because of guns.Your knowledge of history and other cultures is severely limited.

Nevermind that even if you were correct that is no reason to allow senseless real world death.We allow senseless deaths by making guns too easy to get for any hot head and loony toon. Unlike our peers.Lkke switzerland. High gun ownership. But strong regulations on ammo, storage, training, numbers you can own, how you get them, etc.It's extremely high and many times higher than our peers. 30k deaths a year means nothing to you?That can be debated. at least we're mostly on the same page.

Most Americans are like us. Liberals like me don't want to get rid of guns. And most gun owners have no problem with good regulation.

It's just this loud shrill group of jackasses who think any regulation equals authoritarian fascism that need to stop having hysterical temper tantrums and think.no you don't understand dude. everything bad in the world has to be explained as the usa's doing, no one else does anything wrong or malicious, then it makes sense to me /s
http://www.statcan.gc.ca/pub/85-002-x/2014001/article/11925-eng.htm#a4

we can do a lot better. and we will with better gun controlthis is what happens when you control guns and don't control guns:

http://www.statcan.gc.ca/pub/85-002-x/2014001/article/11925-eng.htm#a4

you generally do not need them in civil society. they are not protection. they are the danger

if you are responsible, jump through the hoops, get a gun. but they should not be easy to get for any hot head or loony toon. i do not trust guns to be in the hands of many mouth breathing morons. it is a threat to my freedom. to live. and i will do something about it

this is what happens when you control guns/ not control guns:

http://www.statcan.gc.ca/pub/85-002-x/2014001/article/11925-eng.htm#a4

it doesn't prevent all tragedies. it just cuts the number way down because hot heads and loony toons find it harder to get a gunWhy are they going after abortion?

Every 4 years they trot out abortion to fire up a dependable base. This base, suitably enraged, votes Republican. The Republicans, who would happily send their daughters to get an abortion quietly without a second thought, do nothing about abortion and instead fulfill a plutocratic agenda which basically robs the abortion fanatics.

Useful fools. Easily manipulate them to vote. Do nothing for them.

Until one of them like last week gets so enraged they murder. But the Republicans apparently don't feel much shame or responsiblity about the lying demagoguery that motivated the insane idiot.

Evil and stupidity. Organized together.it seems like the local electric company has spoken
appreciate what you have in life

living near a beautiful park is not a torture method

coming from the other side of the same state, we have some amazing views too, and i also have grown slightly jaded over them

but it's just looking a gift horse in the mouth

i thought "why would a woman look better with a hairy back"

then i tried reading more slowly and paying attention
born in CT, moving to rochester

hello reverse of me!two sentence version: what's best and worst about rochester?
thanks man

&gt; a great bar scene that isn't crowded and shitty like Buffalo

seems like i also have to be aware of the regional rivalry!

why did that ferry to toronto fail? that seemed awesome. going to toronto easily would have been great. now it's a long driveLOL

and they have the shitty wings. you have the plates

sorry, i mean they invented it. it's their delicacy. rochester's claim to fame delicacy will kill you yes, but it's much more

wings in new england, good question. as you can tell i'm not the guy to ask about wings

but if you're a foodie in general go to new haven, best pizza and burgers (both have a claim to fame to being invented there)

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Louis%27_Lunch

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/New_Haven-style_pizza

up in new hampsha where you're going it's all about chowda and lobtsa. boston and maine accents will be your bane at first. but when you can tell where someone is from by their accent, you know you've gained local status. the regionalism is even stronger there than western ny

also you're supposed to eat apple pie with a side of chedda

do not question that!
why do rochesterians eat garbage plates?

these are questions for the universe

but i will tell you this:

&gt;To Foreigners, a Yankee is an American.

&gt;To Americans, a Yankee is a Northerner.

&gt;To Northerners, a Yankee is an Easterner.

&gt;To Easterners, a Yankee is a New Englander.

&gt;To New Englanders, a Yankee is a Vermonter.

&gt;And in Vermont, a Yankee is somebody who eats apple pie with cheddar for breakfast.
you mean the socialist policies that our capitalist economic peers follow and spend a fraction of us on healthcare and have healthier outcomes?

social darwinism and plutocracy is not a political ideology, it's evil and stupid self-destruction
accurate

if its not on the audio track or the screen, it is, by definition, not part of a movie

you're talking about an experience that, while interesting and quirky, is just "emperor's new clothes" kooky hype and distraction

enjoy it. but don't imagine you have any superiority or anything more genuine. you just have a weird aesthetics cult
thank you!

that's the worst

what about the best?
what should really bother you is how easy it is to do that to a people

the right demagogue and a suitably motivated populace, and you can do the same anywhere, with any people

chinese, indians, russians, africans, europeans, americans... any society

what we see in the middle east today is the focus of billions of dollars in saudi oil money used to fund wahhabi madrassas that preach poison. the result is a steady stream of jihadists and suicide bombers

all it takes is a few economic hits, knock a society down. and the anger will build. and someone will use it, shape the hate, and focus it
It's the all caps at the end that let's you know you're dealing with a sane and stable person that we should trust with a deadly weapon.A gun is a sober responsiblity. And it's obvious many many people can't handle that, including many attracted to gun ownership for the wrong reasons. And against the backdrop of the constant litany of death in this country due to so many easy guns, it's disgusting and shameful.

Thus country will change. It needs to. We will make it. I'm sick of these manchildren making a joke of an extremely serious and heartbreaking madness.seriously. well said

it's just a fucking gun, not a religion you wackjobs
i do have a say

we already have regulations (weak, poorly enforced, full of holes)

the existence of regulations already: why isn't this making your head explode?
does that give him extra time?

it should. he's making real law enforcement's job harder by making people wonder if they are interacting with a real cop

they should send this guy away for a long, long time
http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=ammosexual

Our economic peers spend a fraction what we spend on healthcare. Their extra taxes are smaller than our premiums. We pay rent seeking parasites that add nothing of value to the system. Our healthcare system is cronyism, it's not capitalism. Why are you defending being robbed?Could... should x10.

The existence of guys like this makes people paranoid and resist being pulled over. He makes real law enforcement more difficult. They should throw the book at him.that's a basic flaw of people with low character and weak minds:

prideful ignorance

not just being ignorant, which we all are in some way about something. but to not know something *and actively pronounce pride in rejecting that fact*

1. accept new data and change beliefs
2. reject new data and retain beliefs

too many people choose number 2 in this world

how they choose number 2 is an exercise in denial, conspiracy theories, lying to themselves and others, etc.
i was more confused:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/German_Palatinesseriously

"israel is at fault for me hating my brother"

it's an ignorant blame game
sectarian hate is the fault of no one but the sects who hate each other, and long predated israel

the sketchy stretch of a blame game like yours only prolongs and Falsely justifies the actual source of the problem
two years ago a guy was rescued in such a predicament: trapped in air bumble deep under the ocean

he survived 100 feet underwater for 3 days

but he was only rescued completely by accident, the divers thought they were just recovering bodies

then a hand reached out to them. it was all caught on the divers camera as it happened

absolutely crazy:

http://abcnews.go.com/blogs/headlines/2013/12/cook-survives-3-days-in-air-pocket-of-sunken-ship-off-nigerian-coast/

&gt;The survivor - Harrison Okene, the ship's cook - had been in the bathroom onboard the tug just before 5 a.m., when a massive rogue swell capsized the ship. As it sank, Okene scrambled into a cabin and found an air pocket - just a few feet of precious air.

&gt;He stayed there for more than 60 hours in utter darkness and in fear of sharks until the dive team found him. He prayed and drank six sodas.

&gt;"The diver saw a hand in the passageway and assumed it was another body," Walker told ABC News today. "When the diver reached up to grab the hand, the hand grabbed the diver."

i think technology limitations of the wwii era and the size of the ships would have made a dive rescue impossible or extremely unlikely. and you can't drill in because you just drown them

hearbreaking

**edit**: found the video

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Vzhi5a0M3jM
it really was

/r/creepy + /r/upliftingnews

i appreciated the diver's utter surprise and shock, completely honest

you're in darkness, one hundred feet under the ocean, in an upside down boat, surrounded by dead bodies and junk...

and a fucking hand reaches out to you

i don't think that diver came back to the surface with a full bladder/ bowel
He had to have made his peace with death. He obviously looked shellshocked being rescued on that video, but I think the shellshock was more then sensory, also existential.

I would have been just waiting to die at that point, and then rescued like some sort of daydream fantasy like that? The doomed in such situations probably all have these fantasies of rescue, that the brain tells you is impossible. And then for it to actually happen?

That guy was practically pulled from the realm of the dead. He knows it.two thoughts:

1. it's not like just dipping down and going up. it would probably be an entire breath just to navigate to the "surface" (now the bottom) of the vessel... *then* you need to go up 100 feet

2. they don't tell the details of his rescue, although one picture looks like 5 guys hanging out in a decompression chamber. coming up from 100 feet you have a good probability of dying form the bends if you don't rise slowly and decompress slowly in a chamber (with no time to acclimatize to the pressure change, gases coming out of solution in your blood, like opening a can of soda, and block and mangle the vasculature in your organs and brain)
Don't try to pretend you don't benefit.If we had a police dept or fire service that worked like american healthcare people would be screaming bloody murder. 

Instead they scream bloody murder about the universal single payer solution that would save them money... somehow magically costing them more. Because they believe lies. Because they have been suitably brainwashed by the financial parasites that do nothing but add paperwork and extract profit.

The choice is not between capitalism and socialism. The choice is between cronyism and social safety nets.Yes.

As if that stops anyone from making shallow judgments. Most people's opinions are logucally contradictory to their other views and so just self-serving.interesting

although the music made me think I was watching Alfred Hitchcock's "Vertigo"

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4WAxDlUOw-w
And what are they going to do? Not put out a fire of you didn't pay a previous bill?

Healthcare will treat regardless of ability to pay. It's not a business, it's a service. And if you approach it like a service it actually saves a lot of money like our economic peers.

But we're held hostage in the usa by plutocrats robbing us and ideological morons arguing for their impoverishment because they like paying high premiums rather than a tax bill that would actually be much lower than the premiums. Proof: every one of our fucking clear headed economic peers.
Or maybe they are just full of sectarian hate period. What are the jews but just another middle eastern sect.

The simple point is that jealousy and hate of jews or anyone else doesn't get you anywhere. The Jews are not to blame for your own hate. That's on you.

Blaming your hate on someone else is just a self destructive psychology that gets you nothing but ruin. And it's totally your fault.

The usa nuked NUKED the Japanese.

Are the Japanese wallowing in hate of the usa and scheming to attack it any way possible fir decades while being mired in endless blame and recrimination?

The state of the middle east is not Israel, the usa, Sykes picot, or any other lame excuse. It is 100% the fault of middle easterners.

And until they agree with that, and improve themselves like the Japanese, ratherr than endlessly attack from a position of weakness, they reap nothing but misery. All of it completely their fault.

Your opinion is nothing but a piece of self serving psychology that explains why that part of the world is so screwed up.Yes you've missed it. Which is the problem. The middle east chooses to fight rather than build. They are completely at fault.Pretty sick and stupid.

And not even possible in an area where you start a forest fire or set the neighbors house on fire.

Some people hate taxes so much they would rather paradoxically pay more money than the taxes would be on a broken system, like healthcare. They can argue for cost cutting. But they'd rather avoid a bill that isn't going away.

The very definition of blind self defeating idiocy.

Used by plutocrats to rob all of us.

The evil and the stupid, costing us all money.Predatory nonsense. People actually think this is capitalism (it isnt).

And they think the CHEAPER social safety net that should cover this. In healthcare, is the same as censorship, gulags, lines for scratchy toilet paper, and dissent punished with prison communism.

Where do these fucking brainwashed idiots come from? Why can't they fucking think?

The plutocrats and cronies laugh all the way to the bank. Useful fools, happy to be robbed. Because of hysterical propaganda they never fucking think about.we're not talking about your opinion, we're talking about facts

it is your opinion you want to spend $10,000 with a $2,000 deductible instead of $5,000 with no deductibles? and i'm supposed to respect that? no, you're going to respect common fucking sense and choose the cheaper option *with better health outcomes*, because your opinion hurts my pocketbook, and it hurts your pocketbook even if you're too ignorant to see that

am i pulling these numbers out of my ass? every single one of our economic peers spends half or less what we pay and have better health outcomes because they have universal payer. why can't we have that? because you blather moronically about hugo chavez when that doesn't have a single fucking thing to do with denmark, or the uk, or canada, or germany, or france?

you are entitled to your own opinion. you aren't entitled to your own alternative reality facts that are ignorant and hurt my finances

finally: 

#socialism = communism, usa

#socialism = social safety nets, europe

different. fucking. topic

you're confused over a fucking word definition

they call the vagina the fanny in the uk. are you going to let them spank you in the fanny in london?

do you see the fucking problem? you do understand words have different fucking meanings in different countries right? you're going to stick with the american definition when talking about european reality?

you really fucking think it makes sense or we have to respect your words on the topic when you vomit mental diarrhea about hugo chavez when we're talking about canada and europe? do you realize how fucking stupid that is?

yes you do

band together and demand fair treatment

this is called a *union*

it has been vilified by conservatives who are doing their best to destroy them since reagan. so they can pay us peanuts or even apparently less. and there are apparently morons in the usa who are not plutocrats who agree with it

because union guys make more than them?

rather than insist on being paid more, in their ignorant twisted hate they'd rather tear someone else down

people can be pitted against each other in hate so that everyone makes less so the guy at the top can vacuum up even more billions

and some fuckers actually go along with it

how about people get paid to learn basic skills?

there's always some learning on any job

a probationary period where you're paid a little less

but *nothing* seems abusive, slavery

is there a guarantee you get a job after slaving (it's not working) for weeks without pay?
it happened recently and the guy was rescued. he was trapped in air bubble deep under the ocean and he survived 100 feet underwater for 3 days

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Vzhi5a0M3jM

look at his face

he had to have made his peace with death. he obviously looked shellshocked being rescued on that video, but i think the shellshock was more then sensory, also existential

i would have been just waiting to die at that point, and then rescued like some sort of daydream fantasy like that? the doomed in such situations probably all have these fantasies of rescue, that the brain tells you is impossible. and then for it to actually happen?

that guy was practically pulled from the realm of the dead. he knows it

and he was only rescued completely by accident, the divers thought they were just recovering bodies

then a hand reached out to them!

http://abcnews.go.com/blogs/headlines/2013/12/cook-survives-3-days-in-air-pocket-of-sunken-ship-off-nigerian-coast/

&gt;The survivor - Harrison Okene, the ship's cook - had been in the bathroom onboard the tug just before 5 a.m., when a massive rogue swell capsized the ship. As it sank, Okene scrambled into a cabin and found an air pocket - just a few feet of precious air.

&gt;He stayed there for more than 60 hours in utter darkness and in fear of sharks until the dive team found him. He prayed and drank six sodas.

&gt;"The diver saw a hand in the passageway and assumed it was another body," Walker told ABC News today. "When the diver reached up to grab the hand, the hand grabbed the diver."

i think technology limitations of the wwii era and the size of the ships would have made a dive rescue impossible or extremely unlikely. and you can't drill in because you just drown them

hearbreaking
"any sufficiently advanced technology is indistinguishable from magic something something"

-someone smart and coolit costs the bacteria energy to resist the antibiotic, energy that could be used in reproduction otherwise

so the resistant bacteria only wins when the antibiotic is used

when the antibiotic is not used, regular bacteria, who spend the energy breeding instead of fighting the antibiotic that isn't there, outcompete the antibiotic resistant bacteria and replace it

so theoretically the gene for antibiotic resistance should fade away

however nature is large, complicated, and complex. bacteria exchange genes across all sorts of varieties and environments. so the resistance will always be out there in some form of reserve, on the periphery, waiting to spring back into prominence if the antibiotic is used again

it's an arms race, forever. we find new weapons, they find new defenses. rinse, repeat, endlessly

brilliant

although i didn't need to see devito's ass
downvoted because it is ethnocentric and condescending to see the west as the cause of everything

the primary cause of a problem in any part of the world is the people who actually live there. all other influences are secondarykids messing around with each other doesn't make them vulnerable to exploitation by older adults, that's False

and i don't see how getting married is a solution to the supposed problem

who are they marrying? another 15 year old? how is that helping?

the real solution to protecting kids is a society is laws and norms

not marriage
it's also racist: "that brown person can't have his own motivations, thoughts, and ideology. he can only emptily reflect what some westerner did to him"

why is a place, any place, the way it is?

a thousand reasons, a tapestry. to pick a few strands, the western ones, and say "everything bad is because of these strands" is simply ignorance of anything nonwestern. nevermind the fact that the people who live in a place, any place, always bear the majority of the blame for why their country is the way it is. to frame their actions as a reaction to the west is again, condescending, as if all of their motivations can only come reactively to the west

if you're talking about a place far from the west, and the only thing you know about it is what the west did there, you're ignorant on the topic and your opinion is useless



that historical context and their current circumstances, again, is almost completely their fault

the usa nuked, NUKED japan. is japan going "waah, now all we can do is hate america forever and murder each other"?

a country and a people are responsible for what a country and a people do. period

anything else is a cherry picking blame game that justifies bad actions that continue the problem
so they signed a treaty that changed significantly in meaning, such that it Noneifies them being a signatory?

i don't think you're honestly representing what occurred

treaties aren't magic gotchas. japan can say "this is not what we signed" and go on fishing for whales without any conflictcenturies of colonialism? so in your vast historical awareness you blame the ottomans and the turks for the state of middle east primarily, right? does the actual historical facts of who primarily colonized the middle east fit your "the west is responsible for everything" narrative?
exactly. it's so braindead. it reflects a lack of awareness. to cherry pick western actions and that's apparently the only thing that ever happened in the middle east. at best, the west is a sideshow in the middle east
Except for the part where everything that happens in that brown guy's country can only be done by a white man. What the brown guy thinks and does doesn't mean anything. And whenever he does anything, it's only a reaction to something a white guy did.

That's the actual racism here.The west did play a role. I am not saying the west played no role. I am saying the role it played was minor. The major role was played by middle easterners themselves. In their own lands. Motivated by their own ideas.What's the difference between rational self interest and irrational self interest?Well said. If you're brown they don't think of you as a person with your own thoughts and motivations. They think of you as a reaction to something they did. It's racism.What about the Pakistani influence? The Indian influence? The Iranian influence? The Chinese influence?

And finally, and most importantly because it is what actually matters the most, what about what the people who live there actually believe and think?

Or is it, in your mind, that because they are brown, they are not people with their own history, their own ideas. That they can only be empty reflections of what some Westerner did to them?I don't know.

I don't believe in western values.

I believe in human values.

I just think, in this thread, blaming everything on the west is just racist and stupid. And, in the end, holds us back from where we are going, which is universal standards of human rights the world over.
Voting for trump is rational only if he delivers on what he promises. otherwise it is the same as using a trashcan to hide from a nuclear explosion.That doesn't make sense.

Why lie about scientific study? Just go catch whales. Either they are bound by the treaty or they are not.Yes but intelligence exists and has value. A perspective that is genuinely less knowledgeable is not automatically afforded the same respect as a knowledgeable one.The motivation is good and honest but they ARE dumb if they think trump will deliver what they want.No one doubts his motivation.

They doubt his promises.There are "oh that's a nice empty platitude" and there are "that's a giant stinking turd of a whopping lie."then the qualifier has no meaning

it's ok that the specialist term and the common term have different meaning, i get that

but it's not ok if the specialist term signifies nothing. either everything is rational or it isn't

if everything is you don't need the word. if everything isn't rational then there still exists irrational self interest within the domain of economics
doesn't seem to be working

honesty is more important than "saving face" bullshitto anyone. if you are being so patronizing and condescending as to say that east asians prefer being lied to as long as it is done nicely that's pretty insulting because politicians never react to, notice, or care about loud angry sustained public perception /s
again with the insulting patronization of east asia

this is a treaty with non east asian countries, not a domestic situation

if you say we are able to comprehend the concept of saving face (nevermind your insult that east asians prefer this to honesty) then you can say they can comprehend the value of forthright honesty when dealing with the west the wider world

nevermind the actual truth that honesty is always superior, even in east asia
yes, i agree, you live in a bubble:

http://www.abc.net.au/news/2014-03-31/ijc-japan-whaling-southern-ocean-scientific-research/5357416

you want to push the patronizing lie that cute airhead east asians only care about saving face

even as their public face is publicly mangled on the diplomatic stage

you go from comment to comment changing your premise, meaning your point is without merit
why are you so racist to east asians? your entire premise is that east asians are airheads who can only stomach placid liesit's entirely possible to have ignorant perceptions of your own kind

you speak more for your own personal psychological weaknesses than that of your nation

people value honesty over saving face. everywhere
who said it? i forgetthank youthere are economic players in their same situation who would not trust trump

so the value judgment of irrational/ rational still comes into play, regardless of domain

if musk spent $100,000 a day on rockets versus $0 a day on rockets he will still be financially ok, it makes no difference

but if joe blow is led by trump he will not see the economic improvement he seeks. versus paul or sanders (so i'm ignoring ideology and simply looking at policy coherence) where he will see economic improvement

are you saying economics genuinely does not care if a player is truly rational or only thinks they are being rational? then the word indeed has no value as a signifier

a sober appraisal of economic policies of someone like sanders or paul versus trump reveals policy differences that have real economic strength, versus a facile lip service to fantasy like with trump

given the same information, the "rational" choice can be a lie one tells oneself, or a genuine appraisal of a politician's veracity. since the realm of choices can be quite varied, how can you say they are all rational, even in an economic context, and derive any meaning from the word?
fi you believe trump's facile turd of a fantasy life lies, rather than clap and smile politely at all the usual empty platitudes, that's not the same thing
how about every single one of them?

some of them have actual well thought out policy platforms, like sanders and paul (so i am ignoring ideology and just focusing on economic coherence)

some of them give lip service, but they certainly would try to do something, anything, no matter how misled, to get people more jobs, because in strict self-interest, that helps them

then there is trump who just has a facile stinking turd of a fantasy life of lies
russia is pursuing a drone nuclear sub

http://www.straitstimes.com/world/europe/russian-tv-accidentally-leaked-design-of-drone-nuclear-sub

no human onboard, carrying a nuclear missile. fuck!

no AI yet, but we're getting there, skynet


fair enough

but it begins to seem there is enough wiggle room to mean nothing at all
the richest, healthiest, happiest, and freest countries in the world follow sanders social safety nets prescription

what you're describing is a state of people being so propagandized they'd rather elect a plutocrat and continued to be robbed by crony capital

i am not going to say your depiction of working class America is 100% accurate, but i will say anyone who believes as you describe is so ignorant they'd prefer to be robbed than be richer and happier
when someone is full on confirmed murderous out of control asshole like in this video, it is paramount to stop them by any and all means

anything short of a complete response is irresponsible and further endangering the public by allowing this person to continue

if the cops were hesitant and did not completely stop this guy when they could after it is obvious he intended death, and then he killed someone by running them over or shooting them, then people like you would be here on reddit in your esteemed intelligent and wise judgment, and your cheetos stained t shirt in your mom's basement, complaining that the cops aren't doing their job
in finland, if a guy is nearly mowing down pedestrians and driving against traffic and firing his gun out the window, you will get an armed finnish response

it is in fact irresponsible to not respond with overwhelming deadly force when confronted with someone like this

no response means this guy kills someone innocent

are you saying that in finland if this guy was driving around like this that finnish society wouldn't have a problem with this guy shooting people and running them over?
I'M GOING TO FUCKING SMASH MY CAR AND HIT PEDESTRIANS AND MURDER COPS AND...

oh wait, need my hazard lights on
no

he did file into an orderly queue at the intersection, responding with ~~murderous gunfire~~ glaring and tut tutting if any cop should dare break line waiting protocol

official LEO policy is if someone represents a clear mortal threat, you don't shoot the kneecaps or knock him in the head, you unload your clip center mass until he stops moving

this is not to avoid testimony, this is to prevent the suspect from harming anyone

show me anywhere official LEO policy that says what you're saying

if some LEO actually believes what you say they believe, that cop is a shitbag and needs to be fired

furthermore, you yourself are a shitbag for painting all LEO according the supposed evil of somebody's friend you knew whose cousin heard blah blah blah and other such anecdotal bullshit

i'm not saying bad cops don't exist

i'm saying you are wrong for saying all cops behave as the worst


he clearly doesn't care about harming anyone else

he also clearly doesn't care about harming himself

so the hazard lights, a polite warning of slight danger, combined with the extreme danger he is delivering... wtf?so it's everywhere and common? so show us one link. just one to these supposed forums

i'm not denying that such dirtbag cops exist. i'm denying anyone is so stupid and malicious they would actually go around saying this is good policy. and furthermore, the vast majority of cops are not so evil and stupid




can i ask you an honest question?

you seem responsible and level headed

why does it seem so many gun owners want irresponsible and insane gun laws?

the idea that people want to take away all guns is ludicrous

equally ludicrous is the idea that controlling guns properly would prevent someone like you from getting a gun

easy guns hurts everyone. including *actual* responsible gun owners like you (rather than empty talking point "responsible gun owners")I know.

But that ruins the joke.Those are very interesting links. Again, I ask you where it says "shoot to kill to prevent a lawsuit."

I don't doubt that some people think like this. I doubt that it is common policy openly endorsed. It's more like a dark thought in the back of your mind, not full on standard operating procedure.

Especially since the actual rationale in your links above does not work in a world of body cameras.So if a guy shows up at the hospital with no money and a broken arm, what's your policy?thank you

i still think we need functional restrictions on guns, like as much as we impose for owning a car. it doesn't stop car ownershipnot really

two plus two is not five

it isn't as starkly black and white as this issue, there are grey areas. but even with the existence of grey areas there are still positions which are still black and white
there never will be competition. healthcare is a service everyone gets regardless of ability to pay, as YOU just said

and the system you agree with:

?I think that the best solution is to have a universal system that everyone pays into, however it needs to be implemented in a way that forces private insurance to be either competitive or absorbed as a function of the government, although I am against the latter. 

that's the ACA

which doesn't control costs. why do you want to feed a crony capitalist parasite that adds nothing and take money?

the issue is not that us evil lubruls are forcing you to pay health insurance that is too expensive. the issue is that people who don't understand the topic life yourself are forcing all of us to spend more than double at least what we need to spend to have high quality healthcare. proof: every single one of our economic peers who have better healthcare and much much cheaper coverage, because they have universal. that's a fact. what does it mean to you?
the point of the second amendment is the creation of "well-regulated" (meaning, in today's speak, well-functioning) militias

it is in line with the purpose of the second amendment to make sure that people know how to use their guns well and are proficient with them. not restricting guns is how you achieve that in the 1700s

but a guy who buys a handgun and throws it in his bedside table and forgets about it today is not what the founding fathers intended as a proficient militia member who is using his gun to hunt and protect, freely using their right uninfringed. this is a bad militia member

it is entirely within the actual meaning of the second amendment to insist that owning a gun means you are proficient with a gun

mandatory gun range training. cleaning, safety, marksmanship, etc. i can't see gun range businesses complaining about such a law!
it has to be federal. state level control doesn't work. too easy to buy in some state that doesn't give a bleep

canada controls its guns well and mexico has a huge gun violence problem... where all the guns are bought in the usa. 

well said. but that's just political mechanics. i think we both agree on the fact we need *some* better gun control. not gun confiscation, which is unfortunately the hysteria whenever anything modest is tried
lolyes, absolutely, the political mechanics are paramount

well met friend! thank you for your speaking with me

Fair enoughBravo, well saidAs robotics advances the surplus labor of large populations becomes redundant and then one year an "unexplained" epidemic takes out 90% of the population, the rich spared.

"Problem" solved.more guns on campus just means more carnage, not more safety
that's not racist. it's poking fun at a nation. "chinese product" implies something produced in that nation, not by chinese people

if a bunch of chinese americans produced something in the usa it would be called an american product, not a chinese product
if you believe that 9/11 was not caused by airplanes, yes, you cannot have a legitimate conversation. because on that topic you are, objectively, a moron, undeserving of respect

truth is not a popularity contest. every opinion does not deserve to have its hand held and loved like a small child. if you ignore evidence and embrace crackpot ignorance, you are only proving you are cognitively impaired. low intelligence. an idiot. dumb

i'm not that smart. i don't know much. but i am absolutely certain of this

actually if the usa became a thug neoimperial power like you believe it to be, like russia treats ukraine, and invaded canada in 2030 (and it would be easy, because airhead ivory tower pampered and coddled canadians such as yourself don't believe in a military)... it would all be osama bin laden's fault

see he did 9/11

and according to the way you think blame and accountability works in this world, such as with blaming all problems in the middle east due to some american idiocy, then absolutely every single bad thing that happens in america since 2001 for 100 years is directly the fault of osama bin laden. because 9/11 attack

does that sound fucking stupid?

congratulations, now you know what you sound like when you blame all the madness in the middle east on the usa
you inverted the meaning of my post

i was alluding to the ABSENCE of an american threat. that if the usa were as thuggy as you believe it to be, say, like russia, then the usa would be happily vivisecting it's neighbors, like russia with ukraine and georgia. and since you are so happy to weaken canada, then it is cakewalk, if the usa were the thug you say it is, to support quebec and alberta "freedom fighters" and just fucking take whatever territory we wanted from canada, fuck you and what you think about like that. you're not going to fight back

this is the True thuggy russian style attitude you think the usa has. but obviously doesn't, as canada is unthreatened

we AREN'T thugs, in fact, we protect canada. you're nestled in a cozy little corner of the world, oblivious and ignorant to the kind of threats that exist in it, and you deliver these naive clueless attitudes about how the world should work. but doesn't

you're just a sheltered fool, and your thinking and judgments are nothing more than a fruitless exercise in ivory tower thinking

you are akin to a spoiled little princess living in a mansion, looking down her nose at the gardener and driver because they are stinky and do ugly things, when those ugly things support the spoiled child's existence

that's you and your mentality, and it is quite worthless and clueless

sheltered pampered gullible. detached from real world problems. you know nothing of what lurks in the world, and you possess a simpleton's "morality" that functions on a series of imagined and simplistic impressions of human nature that only works in suburban subdivisions in peaceful rich countries
yeah but it's not *organic*"not faring well" is not the same as cruel treatment

the rich douchebag's argument is that prison is a much lower standard then he is accustomed. that argument is clearly invalid

so for you to invoke the concept of cruel treatment means that there's just enough fools out there confused enough to buy these bullshit affluenza arguments

the criminal deserves punishment. they don't deserve cruelty. punishment itself is not cruelty, and certainly is not cruelty just because someone's life has been pampered until the moment of their incarceration
It would actually help for you to attack something I actually said. You seem to be arguing about the Iraq war for some retarded reason, which was of course an extremely stupid war.

Not that you tried to understand my position on a completely different topic before attacking me as if I have anything to do with your bullshit assumptions and prejudices, nor as if that's the actual fucking topic here.

Your inability to understand what someone has actually said and what the actual topic is speaks volumes about your cognitive and social abilities and why you have such a feeble grasp on morality and the wider world.
More like troll**ed**Yeah guns are messy. They also might not work painlessly and quickly.

And why make the poor sap who has to clean you up deal with that?

Use chemicals that knock you out and finish you off when you're not aware. No mess.

**EDIT**: don't use a poisonous gas, you can hurt the EMTs or coroner that have to deal with you. also some nongaseous poisons can hurt other people. i think if you use potassium cyanide the decomp can release hydrogen cyanide gas. there's probably other chemical mixtures which are bad for the poor saps that have to deal with you, so plan ahead and don't hurt someone elseMod parent up.

Stop shooting yourselves.

Somebody has to clean that up and see that mess. Why make some poor sap deal with that?

It's not even guaranteed to be quick and painless.

Use chemicals. Knocks you out and you go when you're not aware.

And no mess.Somewhat related:

Aortic dissection

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Aortic_dissection

Extremely painful while you bleed out quick enough to almost guarantee death. But you'll probably try to do something about it, you won't know what it is for certain. You almost certainly won't make it.

Treat your blood pressure!Thank you, good point: nothing that can hurt the EMT or coroner.

Although I don't know why the fuck someone would use chlorine gas. That sounds painful.

Wouldnt your lungs dissolve and you'd be aware of an inability to get air? So you'd be drowning slowly while your lungs painfully turn to mush. Unless I misunderstand how death by chlorine works.ammonia and bleach is

chlorine gas

maybe some chloramine

maybe some chlorine monoxide

if other chemicals like alcohol, formaldehyde, acetic acid...

you could get phosgene

nasty!

phosgene smells like moldy hay and cyanide smells like almonds so any strong smells like that GTFO
yes there is

among other products like chloramine, hydrazine, chlorine monoxide, etc.

none of which sound like a painless death
"Flailing their way into the workforce to torment the able"?

No. Just no.

They want to work and they should work. Work is self-esteem. No work is lack of purpose and the mind allowed to unspool. There's the answer. That's the way to do it folks. No mess. No danger to others. Painless. Quick.you are correct it depends upon the relative balance of ammonia and bleach. you will get more chlorine gas or less depending upon the relative proportions (as well as hydrazine, etc.)

i don't think anyone mixing ammonia and bleach in the home have great attention to strict molar concentrationsi am

e e

cummings
you

are?
someone suggested massive insulin overdose: completely harmless to others and you just go to sleep

that's not easy to get, but somewhat easier than many more exotic choices

come to think of it... why don't they just use this for capital punishment? there's always some story about the drug cocktail not working or the drugs being hard to get
nice try ocelot"I think there's a huge difference." {a bunch of details that don't make any substantive difference to the point at hand}
he's just still pissed about that whole 1980s afghanistan thing
right

let's just you know, completely fucking ignore the people who actually live in those places and what they want

it's not a vast cia operation in ukraine and georgia. syria did not start a revolution because cia mind control

georgians and ukrainians want europe more than moscow

syrians hate assad

those are the truths that make a difference

it's actually kind of a revealing weakness, people who believe as your comment suggests: to think it's all geopolitical intrigue between competing powers, and completely fucking ignoring the people on the ground and living in the places under contention. it's a recipe for losing
the people revolted. that seems slightly more relevant to the will of the people than a vote

you also have to understand yanukovych broke promises. so even if they cleanly voted for him, they decided to yank him after he turned out to be a corrupt stooge for putin

&gt; but it also wouldn't have happened without US supporting these people, with actual money.

yes. a glass bottle with gasoline and a rag in it runs $2,000 each. and reinforced garbage can lid costs at least $3,000

there's no way people can be angry at broken promises and revolt unless paid $5,000/ week each

/s
he's saying america got cuba to fuck you. have some self respect cuba, don't be screwing every fool america tells you to screw!
russia is leading the west in troll army manpoweryup

russia is acting muscular militarily because it's all it has left

unfortunately tanks rust and without a strong economy that military will slip behind

putin has also fostered petrooligarch corruption, stifled the free press, and bullied political opposition

such that the country has nothing but conspiratard propaganda, north korea style cult of personality, and a one trick economy. economically weak, politically immature, and brainwashed masses

the long term outlook for russia is quite poor, no matter how much they thug on small neighbors like ukraine and georgia out of a sense of insulted pride, or project "power" by propping up a mass murdering piece of shit like assad
yes. the cia provided filet mignon and shrimp scampi at $100 a head each night. without which ukrainians would embrace putin's corrupt goon, of course

it's not possible for ukrainians to be angry at a corrupt putin goon selling their country out?

that without massive cia cash infusions they would embrace and love the guy selling their future?

my sarcasm makes perfect sense. you don't understand it because you don't understand ukraine. if you don't understand how angry ukrainians were and how rightfully they were angry, considering what yankmydick was doing to ukraine, then stop commenting on a topic you don't know anything about
that's a very good point

i think if the dose is massive enough you can't screw up, but the average person doesn't really understand dosing, concentration, delivery method, etc.

so you have a good point i don't have a good answer for

i'm certain there's some chemical out there that would make it easy. then access is the problem

however, a bullet to the head is always messy. and it can also fail to do the job
you "knowledge" of the topic seems to be russian propaganda

you've systematically marginalized and dismissed genuine ukrainian desire not to have anything to do with moscow

like georgians, who also paid the price with a militarily divided country to "protect minorities"

the problem here is simple: russia. it's simpleminded nationalist pride is hurt, and it lashes out with violence. nothing justifies russian actions in ukraine. nothing. it's thuggery, pure and simple. it is the root of the fucking problem

which has led to russia's pariah treatment and will lead to much worse for russia

the ukrainian people don't want anything to do with russia, and after russia's immature thuggy behavior, they want even less

and they will get less, as russia sinks and continues sinking
well there's doctor kevorkian's method: potassium chloride

anyone can get that, they make it as a salt substitute you can buy in any grocery store

it's also pretty easy to make something deadly: just dissolve as much of that shit as you can in some water 

to administer you need an IV though. the bag, tube, and needle are harder to get, but not impossible. medical supply stores? rip off from the hospital? if you're considering suicide that's hardly a crime you will worry about

but i don't know what it feels like. i know it stops the heart. that doesn't sound painless or quick

maybe combined with something that puts you to sleep first

but then someone has to administer the lethal needle to you, you can't do it alone. and that implicates that person for murder in many locations (unfairly)

you're right, suicide is hard
i thought the chlorine was released first, then made chloramine with an abundance of ammonia

so an abundance of bleach should favor chlorine gas

interesting, thank you
now you're changing the topic

"russia" refers to the actions of the russian nation

of course in truth there is the russian government and the russian people, different things, and of course ukrainians don't have anything against the people, only putin's thugocracy. which, again, is what i was referring to in my comment, and you know it. so you change the topic, pretty lame

grasping at straws with the topic change, you didn't answer my point. so therefore i must have made a point

you're welcome then for the education about the reality in ukraine, glad to help you understand more outside of your propaganda bubble
&gt; So did a lot of puppets we installed in other nations.

"America did something wrong. Therefore every single crime in the world is excused."the danish intervened in the thirty years war, a conflict which claimed millions of lives. there were many combatants but we will place all blame on denmark. also, that war forever altered the course of european history. therefore, denmark is directly and solely responsible for everything bad that has happened since in europe, such as the rise of hitler

...that paragraph is moronic

but that's the same "logic" and "morality" in your comment

gw bush is an idiot and the iraq war is a mistake. but to blame everything on that one thread in a tapestry of thousands of threads makes you look like a simpleton


he promised to embrace the eu. then he turned around and did not. he broke a promise and was lucky to escape with his life to the country that was paying him

and i am sorry that you think understanding means believing in and repeating russian propagandaor "of mice and men"

the cat will probably like lennie though
cthulhu approvesdanegafol?

is that another term for the danegeld?
if you pick a time and location secluded enough, that time window is good enough

a final note: sound of mind, unsound of body, suicide ok

unsound of mind, sound of body, suicide not ok

so it's ok to kill yourself if you have end stage huntington's. it's not ok to kill yourself if you're depressedi know but this thread started getting rather macabre and i started to wonder what frame of mind i was talking to and exactly about what

no depression is worth suicide. it's worth treatment
/r/unexpectedjihad
thank you, you've educated me today
han imperialists will sometime this century take back what was stolen from them in their century of humiliation

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Outer_Manchuria

and russia, having absolutely no friends because of their neoimperialist thuggery today, and a broken economy, and a rusting military, and a fragile immature body politic, won't be able to do anything about it

russia is a nuclear power you say?

oh, don't worry: china won't invade, no war will be declared

local freedom fighters will revolt (the area already has huge chinese minorities) and china will simply provide "humanitarian" aid to local chinese "repressed minorities" for "having their human rights violated by russia"

russia will complain the "local" revolutionaries have the latest chinese military tech and will claim some are in fact chinese army, with video proof

china won't care about the complaints. the world won't care about the complaints

the irony will be delicious. china is just as much a neoimperial thug as russia. right now it focuses on frozen indian mountains and sunken filipino coral atolls. it will soon notice vast siberian riches await it's attention, no historical contrived lies needed either: actual valid historical ownership is real. and china grows in economic and military power while russia sinks

georgians and ukrainians, you will be avenged

china will do to russia what russia has done to you
It's the melamineIf you told me a few years ago Russia would be murdering it's own Slavic brothers in Ukraine because its feelings were hurt, I would have laughed too.

It's coming. Russia weakens some more. China stengthens some more... boom, "freedom fighters" and "protecting minorities"

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ethnic_Chinese_in_Russia
not me but:

i once went into a public bathroom and my nose was immediately assaulted by this horrible hot unwashed junk smell

homeless dude had his dick stuck up the hand dryer
I'M ASKING FOR A FRIEND, BROSo maybe if you marketed this "all natural" vaccination technique as "organic" and "traditional homeopathic eastern medicine" the antivaxxer morons will finally get their kids vaccinated.sure, now

russia's economy continues to decline. china's continues to rise

give it a decade or two

no better foil to a neoimperial bully than another neoimperial bully

you could say the same about russian minorities outside russia's borders

that doesn't stop moscow, since ethnographic truth isn't the point

it's just the need for a lame excuse to thug on weaker neighbors that anger russian pride

russia isn't weak now. but it is weakening. and china continues to rise

china wants to right historical humiliation and get more resources

the actual details you elucidate doesn't matter to that one bit
YupThis is what climate change is like.

Not just a little warmer weather, but more violent weather.Tell us why you believe thatYes they are being careful amd sober. But more violent weather is always what they science predicted.god punishing us for gays is made up crap

morons believing faux news propaganda and voting for politicians paid by corporations means no political change to fight global warming. the connection is real
the pope and the catholic church is doing good, the pope talks a lot about taking care of the earth

but the hardcore baptist bible belt is still mostly mired in ignorant denial on the topic
It's awesome you have such a open minded approach and sad you have to deal with such closed minded fools like myself. Must be so hard for you.

Make sure to get two jobs to pay for someone sitting on their ass drinking whiskey.I'd be happy to be proven wrong. Show me what the religious protestants of the South are doing about global warming. A link would suffice. Thank you."I choose not to care about this horrible thing because other horrible things exist"Whooosh. Right over your head.

I'm saying a bad thing is not ok because someone else did something bad.

You do understand basic fucking morality right?the sarcasm mark is for remarks that could be serious, not for comments that any moron can figure out are not serious


there are economics professors who can't balance their checkbook. there are political science operatives as charismatic as a brick

smarts are limited to domains. playing 12 games of chess in your head or manipulating complex topological shapes doesn't mean you know how to talk to a girl

whatever arbitrary signifier you use to consider yourself intelligent, i can assure you, you have social intelligence deficits
You are correct as long as there are enough people that accept it.

You're willing to be a slave because you're cynical?People aren't smart. Easy to dupe.I like apples on cold days.

I like oranges in hot weather.

Woah... I've just compared apples and oranges.

You're right dude.treason is something like being a traitor, like guy fawkes. usually involving a conflict, enemies, external or internal, a power struggle for the govt

but operation snow white is just douchebags sabotaging their own govt for their own gain

but your outrage is still appropriate, as any normal organization that did this would be treated like the mafia. and that's really what scientology is: a thugging, slave holding mafia, that makes believe it's a religion
Good.

That place deserves to fall, it is an immoral hell hole.

A society should earn as much as its values allow for, not because it can dig money out of the ground.
the best you can do is steer people in the right direction

you can't snap your fingers and suddenly everyone matches your values identically

so when they steer towards you you applaud

when they drift away from you you boo

what you don't fucking do is boo, even as they slowly improve. that's just socially retarded
anger and hate tends to find targets closer to you than further away than you

thus, movements and people that function on anger and hate tend to destroy themselves and their own communities, more than their "enemies," real or imagined or slandered as


The spotting came first. Discretion was tried. That was wise.

He would have been pilloried here if he embarrasses the woman. Sexist, control freak, insensitive, etc.

THEN came the insane behavior.

You want to punish him for something no one knew. Hindsight is awesome isn't it?He thought he would try discretion.

If he embarrassed her you would hear people call him an insensitive control freak.

THEN we find out she is insane. You're pretty awesome with your hindsight judgment.when a country has no rights for women and one rich man can have many wives, then one rich douchebag can have dozens of children

a secondary effect of one rich man, many wives:

you deprive the poor men of wives and a family. which is one reason why areas with conservative religious dominance are so violent. you create a surplus of young men with no future. when a man can't put his energy into growing a family, he is available for putting his energy into violence
What is so important you'd risk a major head trauma to your baby? Even leaving them home alone is better than this.honest question, not a schmuck:

what do the large hasidic and orthodox communities speak?

is it yiddish or hebrew? i suspect both, but surely one has to dominate
sorry, america. thanks TILthis isn't about the developing world. the people watching this moron, from the same country as her, are also shocked at her behavior

this is about the poor choices of one bad mother
haredi i assume is ultraorthodox?

thanks for educating me!oy vey!

thanks, TIL
if you don't have rights, what are you?

it's an immoral part of the world

oh of course they will say they are moral, but stuff like this shows they are truly not

and cultural relativists will downvote me for judging a nonwestern culture

no, you're wrong: this kind of shit goes against HUMAN rights, it doesn't go against WESTERN rights

and we should speak out as HUMANS, not as just westerners. we should not hold our tongues for fear of being called hypocrites

the west has plenty of problems and does plenty of crimes. but that doesn't mean we cannot criticize this barbaric treatment



it's immoral

i'm pretty sick of people saying morality is from religion

religion, if it does anything, provides excuses for immoral acts

all you need for morality is normal psychology and normal socialization. "putting yourself in someone else's shoes" is pretty much the bedrock of all moral behavior. do unto others as you would have done to you: that's morality. that's understandable by elementary school kids. no religion needed

japan was barely touched by islam, judaism, or christianity. is japan a barbaric place of no morality? of course not

morality is not from religion

if religion does anything, it excuses and condones and even encourages immorality
your link says rape is illegal

so maybe if you can't find a link supporting your belief, maybe your belief is wrong, and someone lied to you

japan has plenty of problems with equality between the sexes. no country is perfect

but obviously women in japan have more rights than most muslim countries

and in muslim countries, they depend upon the quran to support their inequal treatment, its not just culture. that makes religion the problem, the source of immorality
i'm not talking about blue jeans and rock music. we're talking about bedrock, fundamental human rights questions

which is objective

i am not criticizing these places because of irrelevant and subjective fluff cultural differences

and i am glad you look to buddhist text for guidance. but you're already building on a moral framework you possess that religion did not create, just your basic normal psychology and and basic normal socialization created your morality

so you too will edit out and reject buddhist teachings that are immoral, meaning YOU are the source of morality, not buddhism

in fact just last night i was watching 60 minutes. the country's highest buddhist authority basically says "yes, i'm an extremist (the interviewer asked if his comments on rohingya were extremist and he embraced the term), the dalai lama is an empty political figure, and rohingya muslims are pieces of shit (seriously, they didn't translate his words because it was too full of expletives) that should be kicked out of the country"

http://www.cbsnews.com/news/new-burma-aung-san-suu-kyi-60-minutes/

go to 8:10

buddhist monks are the biggest inciters of violence

it's in the middle of the video, watch and see for yourself buddhism's highest authority in myanmar be proud of his violent religious bigotry

and as a "moral" authority in his religion, people will listen to him. example #352,7821,921 of how religion creates immorality and defiles basic human morality

hindu religious figures as well in india supports and condones horrible treatment of women

religion is the problem. religion creates immorality. to escape religion is to become a more moral person
i wasn't being antagonistic. i said your belief was wrong, and i'm glad you find it to be wrong

there's no hate nor animosity, i didn't call you any names. i never judged you

and i agree with you about the hivemind hate on reddit and the ease with which judgment happens

but a criticism: if you are honestly asking a question you honestly don't know, don't lead with a preexisting belief

you didn't say

"what does japan say about equal treatment of women?"

you said

&gt;But isn't rape basically legal in japan though if you're over the age of 13?

you're asking a **loaded question**

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Loaded_question

&gt;A loaded question or complex question fallacy is a question that contains a controversial or unjustified assumption (e.g., a presumption of guilt).[1]

&gt;Aside from being an informal fallacy depending on usage, such questions may be used as a rhetorical tool: the question attempts to limit direct replies to be those that serve the questioner's agenda.[2] The traditional example is the question "Have you stopped beating your wife?" Whether the respondent answers yes or no, they will admit to having a wife and having beaten her at some time in the past. Thus, these facts are presupposed by the question, and in this case an entrapment, because it narrows the respondent to a single answer, and the fallacy of many questions has been committed.[2] 

ask the honest neutral question. don't flavor your question with the preformed belief

then maybe you won't find so much hivemind hate


seriously, if you accidentally wind up doing the right thing only because you fear pain, you're not a moral person, you're just a creature avoiding electric shocks who wound up on the right side of the cage only because of the shock

nevermind the fact that this doesn't always lead you to an actual moral position

an actual moral position is arrived at by a thinking human being seeking to do good: an attraction to something better, not a mindless avoidance of pain


and every culture in the world has done worse or the same

the actual point, despite your subject change because you perhaps don't understand the subject, is that {christian/muslim/ jewish} places are no better morally than {unchristian/ unmuslim/ unjewish} places

meaning the existence of the religion in a given location does not give the people there more moral behavior

but if you don't like japan as my example, then say korea. or say china. both places have more influence by traditional abrahamic religions than japan, which is why i didn't use them

but of course both places are not majority influenced by those religions, so those places can also be used as examples of what i am talking about
yes, as you say, religion is simply an **empty** organizing principle: it can be used for good, or bad. the problem is the center always tends to rot in any power structure, and it attracts and promotes the most bankrupt and callow who gravitate there. the actual good and moral wind up shoved to the periphery, even persecuted. this is the fate of all power structures

what religion does well is group people into structures larger than simple tribe and family. even larger than nation. in this way it has grown as a historical force in the world. and this is the only reason it is notable: an organizing principle with an assume authority that had historic effects

but it is still, in essence, an empty power structure. think about that

all of the great buddhist, christian, muslim, etc. writings that you have found are a reflection of the **individual writers** of that text

they attribute their wisdom to their religion. you attribute their wisdom to their religion

their wisdom is a testament to themselves

if you read francis of assisi

if you read ibn arabi

if you read hakuin ekaku

you are not receiving great christian, great muslim, or great buddhist thought

you are receiving great francis of assisi, great ibn arabi, or great hakuin ekaku thought

honor the moral individuals. do not honor their empty power structures. structures that promote men (always mostly men) far baser than the great thinkers. structures that have done more evil in the world than the good you think those empty power structures possess. they don't. the thinker does

it is the central lie, the conceit, that binds them, and you, to the corrupt structure that destroys in the end all that you admire in great thought. lose that lieYour comnent is called condescension and patronization. Anyone from any country understands it's unsafe. Your comment is basically saying poor people are stupid and it is an insulting comment. If they do it they are forced to by circumstance. They don't accept it and they would love safer transportation.&gt;Safe/unsafe is a relative measure, not absolute

it's absolute, genius

if you fall off a ladder in teguchigalpa or tucson, you're going to break your leg either way
men's magazines are full of scantily clad females

women's magazines are full of scantily clad females

(albeit for different purposes: competition research)

the female form always was and always will be interesting, and no one gives a fuck about naked men. we're functional and boring, like a rusty hammer. women are beautiful and tantalizing, like a vase of flowers

nothing sexist about it. just one of the basic asymmetries of life
don't eat people

don't rape children

treat women equally

treat races equally

etc.

really not complicated stuff, no matter how much of the world is full of assholes and morons who don't get it
the guy on the rusty teetering ladder feels just as unsure and unsafe in dhaka as he does in denver

but if him standing on it means the difference between eating or not in dhaka, he'll tolerate the lack of safety more. not because of "culture", you feckless idiot, but because of economic desperation and lack of choices

same with the helmetless mopeds carrying whole families in ridiculous trafficyou are in the first grade. you don't like people hitting you

at some point the crying child next to you will alert you to the possibility that maybe there are other minds out there that feel the same about being hit as well. and you lower your hand

suddenly "you don't like people hitting you" becomes "you don't like people hitting you **and no one else does either**"

welcome to objective, simple morality
like this:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Theory_of_mind

&gt;Theory of Mind (often abbreviated ToM) is the ability to attribute mental states \u2014 beliefs, intents, desires, pretending, knowledge, etc. \u2014 to oneself and others and to understand that others have beliefs, desires, intentions, and perspectives that are different from one's own.[1] Deficits can occur in people with autism spectrum disorders, schizophrenia, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder,[2] as well as neurotoxicity due to alcohol abuse.[3] Although philosophical approaches to this exist, the theory of mind as such is distinct from the philosophy of mind.

&gt;Theory of mind is a theory insofar as the mind is not directly observable.[1] The presumption that others have a mind is termed a theory of mind because each human can only intuit the existence of their own mind through introspection, and no one has direct access to the mind of another. It is typically assumed that others have minds by analogy with one's own, and this assumption is based on the reciprocal, social interaction, as observed in joint attention,[4] the functional use of language,[5] and the understanding of others' emotions and actions.[6] Having a theory of mind allows one to attribute thoughts, desires, and intentions to others, to predict or explain their actions, and to posit their intentions. As originally defined, it enables one to understand that mental states can be the cause of\u2014and thus be used to explain and predict\u2014the behavior of others.[1] Being able to attribute mental states to others and understanding them as causes of behavior implies, in part, that one must be able to conceive of the mind as a "generator of representations".[7][8] If a person does not have a complete theory of mind it may be a sign of cognitive or developmental impairment.

it's a basic function of normal psychological and social development to understand the existence of other people out there who think as you do. you attribute to them feelings and thoughts that you have as well. you realize hurting someone else makes them feel like you feel if you are hurt. so you don't hurt them. ebcause you want something from them

failure to make this realization points to a psychological deficit or horrible social treatment
because that's the central spark from which all of morality springs

aka, the golden rule: treat others as you would want to be treated

the only way to realize that is to have a theory of mind. if everyone else did not have a mind like yours, they would not require the same treatment you desire. but they do. so you must... if you are moral

meanwhile, immorality or amorality is simply social disorder or psychological deficit. someone with a mental imbalance or a sociopath for example


i realize you have a mind like mine

therefore, i realize you want to be treated like i want to be treated

understand?

there's no hand waving. that simple realization is the basis of all human morality

perhaps you are one of the people with a deficit. are you on the autism spectrum? asperger's maybe?

because this is not complicated here
you're changing the topic. we're talking about actually unsafe conditions. this thread is over, it's stupid

there's lots of books out there. there's also a lot of philosophies. just because you dress a whore up in a nice dress doesn't change the fact she's still a whore. dressing immoral or amoral crap in the garbs of academia doesn't mean it's miraculously not crap

i don't really care what you think you've read that gives basically immoral and amoral shit some sort of respectability. it doesn't. as a matter of simple logic and reason

if you, or those really awesome authors you cite don't understand the golden rule, then yeah: you, and them, have some sort of social or psychological deficit

so gather round in your ivory tower and circle jerk with some others with social deficits, and think it means something grand. i'm sorry to say you don't have much if you don't have morality, and you never will. it's the foundation of human society and civilization. without it, all falls

including the foundations of this:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ivory_tower

hermetically sealed and irrelevant

i'm sorry i distracted you out of your ivory tower window. dismiss me and get back to your irrelevancies with your other aspies

if you don't understand the golden rule, there's nothing to talk about or respect. a conversation requires an understanding of certain fundamentals. without which no fruitful exchange can occur, and no discussion is worthwhile

i understand you pity me. that's a given when dealing with a resident of an ivory tower. however i also understand that your pity and your assumed sense of authority and superiority is merely an indoctrination into your particular ivory tower, not any actually valid education about facts or reality

you're just a symptom of an academic whim, a trend. give it a few years or decades and it's just some dusty skulls without any relevance or interest, like all the other cliques and fashionable ideas that have come and gone before

get back to your self-reinforcement with your other ivory tower types and ignore me, i'm sorry this thread has distracted you from the circle jerkbut there's no need for all the old testament pollution that only teaches depravity and violence

go ahead: learn from christ. and learn from buddha. why tie yourself to one book as if it were a sports team?
The Saudis pay for generous perks.

Not basic human rights like healthcare, moron.
&gt;and ISIS probably starts to think that they'd do a better job of running the region than the Sauds. 

Ans they'd probably find a lot of support. Chilling.

The Muslim world is so screwed up.
he's more mammon than mormonsexism is doing something that unfairly treats another based on their sex

but i am saying

&gt;men's magazines are full of scantily clad females

&gt;women's magazines are full of scantily clad females

who is hurt by this?

and how do you even police this if in some demented mentality you think this hurts someone?

you fight sexism by demanding equal pay, demanding an end to harassment in the work place, demanding a justice system that is effective on rape

you don't fight sexism by fighting basic human biology

men are generally stronger and larger

women give birth and nurse

is this fundamental biological inequality sexist? it is unequal


&gt;saying we can be sexist because of nature doesn't really excuse sexism

maybe if that's anything remotely like what i said your comment would be more useful

i am saying fundamental differences because of nature aren't by definition sexist

sexism is *specifically* poor treatment of an individual because of their gender

&gt;Not every bad thing can be policed. Some things require personal responsibility.

which reveals your flaw. because what is in men's and women's magazines doesn't hurt anyone. so it is not sexist

define to me how a person is hurt by scantily clad females in a magazine. the female form is simply more interesting to look at than the male form. not because i said so. but because magazines say so, because they are full of this. they know what sells

and what sells reveals something about our basic biological nature that is interesting

it doesn't hurt anyone. so it is not sexist


you simply don't understand what sexism means


in my experience too

however to say you don't know what sexism is is objectively True based on your statements in your comments, however simple or not the judgment may be

you believe sexism to encompass phenomena that has nothing to do with bad treatment of someone due to their gender

and in my experience, when you hit a nerve, people start throwing insults
Mrs. Butterworth got creepiness.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=z45ys7oJuCA
it's not cultural, it's biological

amongst social animals the sexual receptivity of the female is always of importance, and cues are always being sought. females manipulate the cues, thus the interest in women's magazines, and men of course are just interested in the cues themselves

if you're going to define a baseline biological aspect of reality as sexist, you've watered down the definition of the word such that important fights against rape, harassment, unequal pay, etc. are no longer getting the attention they deserve from you, and you are (simply) tilting at windmills fruitlessly

you should care about real fights and real causes, not fighting biology
that's an argument against your stated position, not mine

you don't win an argument by misstating someone's position. i said phenomena you call sexist is actually biological. nothing i said remotely resembles the comment i am replying to
they don't exploit female sexuality, they reflect an underlying reality about interest in the female form. which stems directly from biological imperatives: is the female sexually receptive

nothing you will ever say or do will stop making people, men and women, inordinately interested in what a female is trying to communicate by how she presents herself. because the passing on of their genes depends upon it. it is not just an empty biological need that can be dismissed with the wave of a hand, it is one of the most fundamental and driving forces of our existence. because if someone doesn't have this driving force, their genes will cease to exist. so the world is only populated by, and only ever will be populated by, men and women interested in these cues

go ahead and fight that. but that's not a fight against sexism. it's tilting at windmills without the possibility of any effect
!thank yousome people have poor upbringingmarmmon/r/mildlyinterestingWhat a fitting end to your life's pursuits. You're about to become a permanent addition to this archaeological find. Who knows? In a thousand years, even you may be worth something.It's easy to divide by 2, 3, and 4 (and 6, but 6 is not as useful)

I'm not saying I know that is why, but it seems useful for many life pursuits, like cooking, construction, etc."No, you," fails to be a persuasive argument past elementary school. You have to substantiate the claim or it's empty.

In fact, considering it's stuck here under a discussion of theory of mind, it's rather ironic

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Psychological_projection

A thief thinks everyone is a thief.
these people who believe in santa claus, as you say, are the only ones keeping civilization workingnice comment, well said

2 things:

1. that sufi woman's comment i ascribe to her greatness, not the greatness of any religion

2. religion is merely an organizing principle. a power structure. all structures always rot. it winds up inevitably doing more harm them good, even persecuting those expressing the highest stated virtues of a religion, while attracting the most callow and corrupt to the center. this is the fate of all power structures, including religion

there's no need for you to state a belief in a religion like some petty sports team

if you seek religious wisdom, feel free to sample christ, muhammad, and buddha. revel in their greatness. why artificially restrain yourself to one flavor like a silly sports team fan?

the greatness of very wise thinkers has nothing at all to do with some broken power structure, supposedly in their name, that you only suffer for being a part of
it has many interesting effects, including on cellular aging

but, and correct me if i am wrong, i believe just eating the stuff does not result in efficacy. yes, resveratrol has benefits, but it has to be in the cell machinery at the right place and time, and just eating it places it very far away from usefulness

that doesn't mean they can't alter it chemically so it tends to be transported to where it is needed, and tends to stick around longer. i look forward to that

but for now it seems to be like coenzyme q-10: important to proper cellular function, but oral supplementation has basically no effect (don't tell the vitamin stores)

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Coenzyme_Q10

http://www.mayoclinicproceedings.org/article/S0025-6196(14)00799-X/abstract

&gt;Conclusion

&gt;The results of this meta-analysis of available randomized controlled trials do not suggest any significant benefit of CoQ10 supplementation in improving statin-induced myopathy. Larger, well-designed trials are necessary to confirm the findings from this meta-analysis.thank you, informative&gt; how someone else may deliver their thoughts to you if you don't see a contradiction between your arguments and point of view that they are defending? 

i'm sorry, i'm not stoned enough for this conversation

there doesn't seem to be any meaning in your comment, just getting lost in simple connections
The caption says "(in rear)"

This method of food delivery, there's no tasteDivine wind. Hurricane wiped out the fleet. Imagine how much history there hinges on a fortuitous weather pattern and timing.Your problem is you care about people that think about you this way. Fuck them. Cut them off if it just means pain. Go ahead and be alone. Embrace it. Like yourself... or learn to like yourself. THEN you will meet more genuine people, it's not forever. But it starts with you liking you. No one can like someone who doesn't like themselves. Achieve that first. Can't build a house without a good foundation.Don't kill yourself just disappear. Take a flight to Malaysia or Sweden, get off the plane, see how far you get with the money you have. Then whatever happens after that, so be it. If it's dumpster diving or a new life. Whatever. It's all good. Certainly better than dead.Do you the slightest familiarity with world history? We've never been more richer or more peaceful. Progress is real.Thank you. Exactly.

Desperation makes someone less desireable. So stop being desperate.That's nature. The topic is civilization. You can't make a coherent point by changing the subject.You don't win arguments by changing the topic. Nature. Civilization. Pick one. You're incoherent and pontless.if you don't like yourself it's not possible for anyone else to like you.

That's ironclad advice.
what he did is cruel, but not anywhere remotely near 10 years in jail worthy. if the victim is ok with it, he could get off with a sincere apology and some probation

sleeping with someone who used to consider you a parental figure is extremely fucked up

is it really that hard for you to figure out why?

nevermind the question about what age the sexual contact actually startedmy life is tormented

i deserve a pass on rape

/s
it's unlawful restraint

for one night

dude's not being locked in a sex dungeon for months

and there's no component of violence

unlawful confinement has a wide range of possible implications, your attitude is only appropriate for the more extreme forms of it

the law would give hitchcock probation and a fine

http://www.criminaldefenselawyer.com/crime-penalties/federal/Unlawful-Restraint.htm

&gt;Unlawful Restraint Penalties

&gt;States often differentiate between felony and misdemeanor unlawful restraint crimes. Felony offenses involve the possibility of a year or more in prison. Felony charges usually apply when the circumstances surrounding the unlawful restraint exposed the victim to harm or substantial risk of injury, or involved violence or the threat of violence. Misdemeanor unlawful restraint usually does not have an element of physical risk to the victim or any use of violence. However, state laws on unlawful restraint differ significantly, as do the potential punishments involved.

&gt;Incarceration. For a misdemeanor conviction of unlawful restraint, a jail sentence of less than a year is possible, while felony convictions may impose potential prison terms of 15 years or more. In some situations, such as where the unlawful detention victim was a child, a sentence of life in prison is possible.

&gt;Fines. Misdemeanor convictions of unlawful restraint typically involve fines of $1,000 or less, while felony fines can exceed $5,000 or more.

&gt;Probation. Probation as a sentence for unlawful restraint is possible, but often only with misdemeanor charges where the convicted person has not committed previous crimes. However, even felony unlawful restraint charges may result in a probation sentence in some situations. Probation usually lasts at least 6 months, though one-year or longer probation sentences are common. Someone sentenced to probation must regularly meet with a probation officer and comply with specific orders imposed by the court, such as passing regular drug tests and not committing more crimes. If a person violates the terms of probation, a court may impose a jail or prison sentence, more fines, or renew the probation term for a longer period.
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mia_Farrow

&gt;Relationship with Woody Allen

&gt;In 1979, Farrow began a relationship with film director Woody Allen.[68][69] During their relationship, Farrow starred in 13[70] of Allen's films, and several of her relatives also made appearances.[69] **Their relationship ended when Allen began a romantic relationship with Soon-Yi, the 21-year-old adopted daughter of Farrow.**[71]you're playing stupid games

mia adopted the kid with some other guy, then soon after, ever since she was a little girl, this was the man who was in the bedroom with mommy

what the fuck would you call such a man?

good clarification on the nature of the crime, thank you

but still what you consider the appropriate punishment to be is laughably extreme. he would get probationthe fucking guy sleeping with your fucking mother since you are a little girl is not your future boyfriend

if you don't understand why that crosses some pretty serious psychological boundaries, you don't know what the fuck you are talking about

i can tell you like playing these little games dancing around the fucking obvious. it doesn't change the fucking obvious. you're only deluding yourself
you act like the surface face put on a sick situation is the actual reality of the situation
i don't know anything. but i'm not a gullible idiot either. given the rough edges of what we do know, something obviously very sick went on in the creation of this relationship

in a perfect world you don't have sex with the late teenage/ young adult who slept with your mother most of your life, and certainly served as the older male of the household when you were a little girl, a parental authority figure, a stepdad

that's fucking sick. you can't wave away the base facts here and pretend they don't matter

&gt;But at the end of the day it's no ones business but their own. 

it's ALWAYS society's business when something sick happens

that dude beats his wife

"But at the end of the day it's no ones business but their own. "

that woman starves her children

"But at the end of the day it's no ones business but their own. "

uh huh
excuse me, she was adopted in 1978 around age 5-7

and then mia started a relationship with woody allen in  1979

so please, educate silly me what you call the guy who goes into mommy's bedroom at night since you were a little girl to the time he starts fucking you

thanks
there's False alarmism in the world

there's also False complacency

there will come a time midcentury when every single politician's entire digital footprint from early age can be reviewed by some spook, and that info can be passed on, legally or illegally, for purposes of control: blackmail, sabotage, etc.

think about that

that's the problem here. think of the power these laws place in the hands of some NSA assholes and whomever they are corrupted by
the problem is cities

before cities, yeah, our water sources were fine when we were in small bands

but when cities sprung up with agriculture, we started drinking a lot downstream from or from the well underneath where we crapped, for thousands of years. modern sanitation didn't really arrive until a couple hundred years ago

so diseases like cholera and typhoid were normal, and regularly killed tens of thousands

one solution was alcohol. something like beer didn't really mean getting drunk to our ancestors, it meant: 1. calories and nutrition, and 2. safe drinkable liquid

but yeah, now that we have safe, tested, chlorinated municipal water supplies, buying bottled water is stupid. i'd like to think only immigrants from places where water is still not safe do it out of familiarity. anyone else doing it is wasting their money
nobody knows what barack obama fapped to at age 13

nobody knows the name of donald trump's secret high school crush

nobody knows hillary clinton's website trolling from her college years

no. everything i mentioned does not already occur
sometimes i grumble about carrying that wrapper or cup with me until i find a garbage can

then i think "i'm not doing this for anyone else, i'm doing it for myself"

it's about what kind of person i think i am... then i bend down and pick up someone else's trash

people who just throw their shit without thinking are functioning on a different level. a lower level
i used to be so polite before i moved to the city

now if some group is slowly walking 4x1 across the sidewalk i can barely hold in my rage to bodycheck grandma
massholes...Bet what? That we don't know the digital footprint of people who grew up before there were digital footprints? Sure, I'll take your money.but there's people who go "the USA has some so it's not fair to to deny anyone else"

except for the whole medieval theocracy thing

i don't really trust any country with nukes, but i certainly double distrust a country that is run by grumpy old men who believe they have a monopoly on the word of god

cultural relativists will downvote me for judging a nonwestern culture

no, you're wrong: this kind of shit goes against HUMAN rights, it doesn't go against WESTERN rights

and we should speak out as HUMANS, not as just westerners. we should not hold our tongues for fear of being called hypocrites

the west has plenty of problems and does plenty of crimes. but that doesn't mean we cannot criticize this barbaric retarded bullshit and call it what it is

this is not about fucking blue jeans and rock music. this is defiling basic fundmental human rights, and people need to speak the fuck up, and not become meek spineless turds because some shallow minded asshole tut tuts and goes "the west did something wrong, so it can't criticize anything." no, you can fucking criticize this disgusting revolting crap, and you should

there is NO defense for this. none. no moral or logical reason for this cruelty is possible


"it's not too bad, so barbaric cruelty is fine"
welcome to the internet

look around you and familiarize yourself with the arguments you hear all the time

then speak
as an american agreed and well said

as a matter of values and ideology, there is no greater enemy on the planet to the usa than saudi arabia

why they are considered our allies is nothing but a matter of disgusting corruption
everyone is entitled to their own opinion. no one is entitled to their own facts. the argument i cited is indeed frequently heard. that's not a straw man. you also need to familiarize yourself with what the logical fallacies you cite actually are. you can't just burp the words "straw man" and expect anyone to take you seriously if you don't even know what that means
the problem is religious fundamentalism, not islam

i would support screening any immigrant of any religion for extremist views

i would also support classifying current residents promoting violence to impose religious beliefs, including christians and social conservatives, as terrorists
i'm just glad you posted because there's morons in this thread that says no one makes your idiotic argument

as for a response to your idiocy: the point is to reduce nuclear arms, right?

so you stand against iran getting them, and you stand for the usa getting rid of them

you don't stand for iran getting them, because you don't like the usa has them

do you understand how stupid that sounds?
any religion can be perverted to violence. it's just an organizing principle. the religious texts can be used to justify anything

even jainism

buddhism for example is ostensibly a peaceful religion

except i just saw this this weekend:

http://www.cbsnews.com/news/new-burma-aung-san-suu-kyi-60-minutes/

go to 8:10

the country's highest buddhist authority basically says "yes, i'm an extremist (the interviewer asked if his comments on rohingya were extremist and he embraced the term), the dalai lama is an empty political figure and has no religious authority, and rohingya muslims are pieces of shit (seriously, they didn't translate his words because it was too full of expletives) that should be kicked out of the country"

buddhist monks are the biggest inciters of violence here. buddhism's highest authority in myanmar be proud of his violent religious bigotry

it makes zero sense to stand against a religion

it makes 100% sense to stand against violent religious fundamentalism, of ANY religion
anyone. a kindergartener. all you need to understand is not to do something that you don't want done to you, the golden rule. all morality springs from that

we're not talking tricky edge cases with low stakes, like clothing fashion or proper etiquette

we're talking about violent physical abuse for simple harmless human expressions

there are grey areas in the world

but there are also black and white areas

violent corporal punishment for holding hands is clearly well outside any logically coherent sense of morality
any religion can be warped into violence

the problem is clearly violent religious extremism, of any kind. not a particular religion
did you even fucking read what i just posted about buddhism in myanmar?

ANY religion can be warped into violence. ALL religions have this problem. the solution is to stand against violent religious fundamentalism, period. all of it

a particular religious flavor of any kind of violence doesn't matter
the underlying violent text of islam is the same fucking text as in christianty and judaism. it's ALL violent ancient hocus pocus crap

so you stand against ALL religious violence. standing against a religion is stupid and without merit, intelligence, or effect. standing against violent religious fundamentalism, all of it, of whatever religious flavor, is the only logically coherent approach

the BUDDHIST AUTHORITY says it is ok to kill

that is violent **religious** fundamentalism

you don't get to make believe the religion doesn't matter there, but matters with muslims. by your definition, then muslims being violent is also just empty tribalism. if you go "but their religious texts..." well what the fuck do you think the buddhist is citing when he encourages violence?

you are not intellectually honest
"the usa did something bad, so i can't criticize another country for doing bad"

i'm not going to to take moral advice from someone who doesn't even know what morality is

hint: two wrong don't make a right
you think

&gt;"Do you support our country's great leader?"

is an effective screening question for extremist views?
"this guy was killed by a violent buddhist, so his death doesn't matter, he wasn't killed by a muslim"

"this guy spends his life devoted to charity, but he's muslim, so fuck him, he's a violent asshole obviously"

you stand against violent religious fundamentalism

you don't stand against islam

if you don't fucking understand that, you're a religious bigot, and you're just as much of a problem as the violent muslims you hate, because you hate muslims, even the peaceful ones, and you give a pass to violent buddhists and christians

YOU are the problem with this world, you're an empty tribal goon

you're exactly the same as what you hate

when you examine the thought processes of violent muslims, you will find exactly the same words as yours
i am attacking a straw man if the argument i am attacking doesn't exist

the argument does exist

so it isn't a straw man argument
"the usa did something bad. therefore, we cannot find anything bad in what iran is doing"

apparently you are too feeble to understand your own hypocrisy
99% huh? well with such ironclad cited and not in any way suspect hyperbole, i couldn't possibly argue with you
so how much old testament violent shit do you want me to cite?
sorry, i'm not stoned enough to grok your retarded disease analogy

but i'll try to frame my response in a way you may understand: "duuuude, it's like all religions have violent assholes man. so like, just stand against all of it, peace out bro"
he is also flashy and stands out

a genuinely effective spy is unremarkable. they go beyond blending in, they disappear to the point of not being noticed, you'd never give him or her a second thought
you want to keep an open mind, but not so open your brain falls out

you make simple deductions about the most obvious and logical possibilities

you don't actively suppress all thought on a topic because the slightest bias might creep in. there is bias in everything, and always will be. as long as it is the usual background noise, and not a loud red flashing hunk of propaganda, you entertain the possibility

Apples yes

Apple juice no/r/woahdudeYour sentence doesn't even make sense. They aren't a group if they have no central leadership. They aren't anything. That's the point. You kind of miss the whole "we aren't a team" if you think of them as a team.

And there is no integrity. Certain unknown individuals may have sterling integrity. Others may have none. There is nothing valid you can say about integrity about a group that doesn't exist.Even if they did it, why is that anonymous' fault? It's still the cartel's fault. They are the ones doing the killing for a disgusting reason.joke demands that may or may be not met, the info will be released anyways. they go through the motions because it's funny. lulz. faux grandiose drama for no particular reason

it's anonymous, not a professional kidnapping operation
use the /s sarcasm indicator

i don't think you believe that, but some people actually do believe what you wrote, that's why you're downvoted
lucius malfoy?

http://www.google.com/search?q=trey+gowdy+draco+malfoy&amp;tbm=ischidiots who don't understand morality would

if i threaten to cut a girl's throat unless i get $10,000, someone may or may not give me $10,000. either option is completely my fault, as i am the one who made the evil demand

the idea that "you didn't give me $10k so it is your fault i cut the girl's throat" is moronic wife beater logic: "i have to hit you because you wore that dress." is it the wife's fault, for wearing a dress? or the thug who beats her? it's completely the thug's fault

giving someone impossible demands does not shift blame to them. even if in some meek social retard's minds it does

excellent word. thank you. i'm totally stealing thatit represents treason

it always makes me laugh to hear about how it's protected speech, when the flag represents seccession from the government that extends that protection

logic, motherfuckers
nice comment, and good point

and a complete change of subject. that rebellion succeeded

the loser's rebellion with the loser's flag did not

furthermore, the american revolution was an extension of freedoms

while the civil war was started to continue DENYING freedom to people for the color of their skin

it deserved to lose, and anyone proud of that rebellion is a moron, for actually standing against freedoms with that flag, because denial of freedom due to skin color is what that flag represents

"states rights" is a lie. look at the statement of every state that seceded. their own fucking words. it was about slavery

i say this as someone who has blood who fought and died on both sides of the conflict

get over it morons. you lost. and you deserved to lose. stop being proud of something with no honor and no integrity to the cause of freedom. the lost cause deserved to lose
exactly

the unethicality of what anonymous is doing is a technicality

because the KKK itself is unethical

you can't logically claim to deserve ethical treatment exactly as you engage in unethical behavior
technically

but the group being violated behaves unethically

you can't have rights and freedoms extended to you that you yourself deny

freedoms for you exist only as long as you believe everyone should have those freedoms. the only time that freedom is denied is when you yourself violate it

this is why prisons exist in a free land. for people who violate freedoms. their freedoms are then denied


yes THEY would off a lot of people

for which anonymous is not responsible

if i say i will kill the next random pedestrian i see walk by unless you call me "sugar butt cheeks" in your next comment, and you don't, are you responsible for the death of a random pedestrian?

no

not in any logic or morality. i am, alone, responsible for the insane demand and the evil act
no i know

the only real unfortunate point here is the existence of social retards who actually would blame anonymous for what the cartels did. such idiots exist. such people are perhaps more of a problem than the cartels themselves

because evil exists and always will. it is the morons and cynical douchebags who accept great evil as "normal" that allows evil to extend and persist
the KKK does not exist to discuss philosophy

it exists to act on those beliefs of denying people's rights

you act like it's a debate society. it exists to coordinate terrorist actsyou're talking about people who are emotionally compromised

of course their sense of logic and reason is disengaged

that doesn't mean logic and reason cease to exist, it just means we can't look to that particular person for any sense of it

if someone kills someone in a drunk driving accident, the killer's wife may blame themselves for letting the killer drink

so what?

it doesn't matter how the wife feels

the law is going to prosecute the drunk driver no matter what the wife thinks, whether the wife hates her husband with every fiber of her being, or loves the husband so much she offers to serve his jail sentence for him, and every feeling in between

the law will follow what is actually right and logically correct, it's not going to follow the feelings of an emotionally compromised person

if an anonymous member blamed themselves for what the cartel did, that doesn't mean they are actually to blamethat link doesn't apply to this situation. that's a different ethical dilemma&gt; Unless they're lynching people or stopping them from voting by force

that's what the KKK does. it's not a philosophical debate society, it's a terrorist organization that commits crimes to suppress and attack people's fundamental rights, simply because of the color of their skin

seeing as they are secretive, nobody knows except them. and seeing as they continue to assert violence as a "right" to further their cause, a murder of a black person organized by the kkk probably wasn't that long ago
if an anonymous member blamed themselves for what the cartel did, that doesn't mean they are actually to blame

you describe some sort of emotionally compromised headcase. which surely exists. but again: if they didn't do it, they aren't to blame. period. it doesn't matter if they think they are to blame, that simply means you are talking about someone with an emotional and psychological problem
they are an organization that claims the right to commit violence to further a racist cause, and have an extensive documented track record of doing exactly that

do you have some sort of difficulty understanding this?
because the rebellion is against freedom itself

i have a right to rebel to extend my freedom (the american revolution). i do not have the right to rebel to deny someone else their freedom (the civil war)

yes, the point is to leverage the emotional suffering

this doesn't mean the victims (of the killing, and of the emotional suffering) are to blame for it

which is the topic of *this* thread


you' can hate anonymous if you want, no problem

but they're not responsible for anyone killing anyone

los zetas are

do you understand that?

&gt; Your comparison is so wildly different it's stupid and inapplicable

i'm sorry i stopped reading there

i described a threat of violence to get someone to do something, as an analogy to a drug cartel threatening violence to get anonymous to do something

could you please explain what is wildly different, stupid, and inapplicable?
you're describing the problem: emotional manipulation and blackmail

the world is full of this bullshit. someone make a lame anti-muslim video and there's riots in the middle east

emotional manipulation is easy. i understand the problem you are describing perfectly

what i don't understand is why you are not saying "yes, you're right, that's the fucking problem"

we're talking about the same thing, except at the conclusion of the description i go "that's the fucking problem," and you go "no, the manipulators win and we shouldn't disagree with that"
 &gt; They're guilty because you decide so.

what the fuck is your problem? they're guilty because they commit crimes moron

"this is the organization of chopping off people's fingers, and they have chopped off many fingers. they should be stopped from..."

"woah dude! you have no right to deny their rights just because you disagree with them!"

they commit CRIMES genius, they aren't a fucking DEBATE SOCIETY
&gt; so you have to internalize that and react to that thought process.

"you have to accept the criminal"

you fight crime. you fight evil. if you stop fighting it, it only grows

if everyone accepts the criminals, the criminals rule. your mentality is why the zetas are so powerful

you lack basic moral reasoning skills. and that makes you a victim
&gt;it leads to a bunch of innocent dead people

los zetas leads to innocent dead people

blaming anonymous for what los zetas does is not logical

&gt;I'm done with this.

you never started. you don't understand basic right and wrong. you are without morality in your thinking
you need to actually know the basics of a topic before injecting your ignorance into it

the violent activities of the KKK are well documented

you either understand that, or you don't. but the reality of that fact does not change

only your inability to understand basic facts of a topic is on display hereand i hope they do. an offer made in jest might still be honored
i have ancestry that died from both sides of the civil war. i am entitled to speak on this topicwhy do you think they stopped being violent?

because they say so? even though their literature and voices continue to assert violence to suppress people's rights? it doesn't happen in secret to avoid detection?

you **believe** a violent terrorist organization? does ISIS lie? of course. the KKK does not?

it's a serious question i have for you out of curiosity: when a group has decades of violent actions, and continues with the same ideology, why do you believe them when they say they don't resort to violence? even though that's their entire reason for existing and continues to be what they call for?

you're not asking me to have an open mind, you're asking me to be a moron. a violent organization that believes in denying people's rights lies violently... not violent. riiight

you go ahead. you believe an organization of such honor and integrity as the KKK at its word, even as it's word continues to support violence and its history proves it

i'll choose to use the fucking brain you seem to lack
i'm in portugal?

what the source of this deranged belief?

i'm actually related to robert e lee. no joke


their literature and voices continue to assert violence to suppress people's rights. that violence doesn't happen in secret to avoid detection?

do you believe the word of a violent terrorist organization? does ISIS lie? of course. the KKK does not? when a group has decades of violent actions, and continues with the same ideology, why do you believe them when they say they don't resort to violence?

where is this honor and integrity that i am supposed to trust about them not being violent. against their stated ideology and their proven history?

you're not asking me to have an open mind, you're asking me to be a moron. a violent organization that believes in denying people's rights violently... not violent. uh huh

i'm sorry, i'll choose to use my fucking brain, and look at their words and their history, rather than their lies
&gt;people you want to hurt

i can take fragments of sentences and invert meaning too. hours of retarded troll fun!
and this is the rationale by which los zetas will continue to exist, and continue killing

not because evil exists. but because spineless cowards and meek slaves yield to evil and submit to evil
every analogy that has ever existed is not the same as the situation in question that the analogy is used to probe

in fact it differs in trivial ways to illustrate the commonality that is in question

and the commonality is: yielding to evil demands. what is yielded, doing something, or not doing something, is arbitrary and not the point here
1. large long history of violence

2. continuing ideology that asserts the right to violence 

but you want me to believe that because the violence has gone underground to avoid detection it no longer exists

because apparently, with the KKK, we are dealing with a trustworthy organization that would never lie and has sterling honor and integrity

i'm sorry, i'm not that stupid. i will use my brain

you can choose continue to be a gullible idiot or a malicious liar if you want. because one or the other if you want me to believe a group like the KKK at their word
my words about the reality of the situation are True whether i lead the charge or i run away

you could indeed be talking to someone who would cower in fear at los zetas. still doesn't mean what i said is wrong

morality is to be understood if you wish to live in society and avoid prison, yes. because morality is the glue that makes civilization work

with the weight of their history, and their stated ideology, it is up to you to prove they AREN'T violent, it is not up to me to prove they are. their history and their ideology speaks for that

i am saying a group that engages in volence and asserts a violent ideology are liars. i am extremely comfortable with that assertion

and i am apparently talking to a moron who wishes to believe an organization that has committed violence and upholds a violent ideology at their word, or you are one of the violent douchebags themselves who wishes me to believe their lie

either way, it's not possible to consider you an intelligent and reasonable person, and accept the word of the KKK, with their proven track record and stated ideology



there is no strawman. i don't have anything to prove. the history and ideology of the KKK speaks for itself. it is incumbent on you to prove they aren't violent. i am simply illustrating how someone is a moron, or a liar, for believing lies

you're changing the topic. the kkk has a violent ideology and a history of violence. there is nothing for me to prove to you, it simply is what it is

but you are stating a belief that they are not violent. you have to prove that to me, i have nothing to prove to you

and for you to state the KKK is not violent, means either that you know they are violent and you are lying, or you believe they aren't violent for gullible reasons

one or the other is True about you
note that drugs are still illegal in portugal and dealers are still punished

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Drug_policy_of_Portugal

&gt;In July 2001, a new law maintained the status of illegality for using or possessing any drug for personal use without authorization. The offense was changed from a criminal one, with prison a possible punishment, to an administrative one if the amount possessed was no more than ten days' supply of that substance.[1] This was in line with the de facto Portuguese drug policy before the reform. Drug addicts were then to be aggressively targeted with therapy or community service rather than fines or waivers.[10] **Even if there are no criminal penalties, these changes did not legalize drug use in Portugal. Possession has remained prohibited by Portuguese law, and criminal penalties are still applied to drug growers, dealers and traffickers.**[11][12]

you probably already know that, but to make the note for everyone else reading because there are idiots who don't understand that addiction to substances is still the actual problem, not just society's reactions to drugs and addiction

you don't fix the problem of addiction by putting all blame on society. the addict still needs to come to terms that what they are doing is self-destructive and wrong, and to fix themselves. and, most usefully, avoid these substances entirely to begin with

what portugal did was change the TACTICS in the war on drugs, to much better ones: healthcare, not criminality. it didn't stop the war on drugs

the war on drugs is a permanent state of civilization, like the war on pedophilia or the war on rape or the war on murder

all of these things will be with us forever. but it doesn't mean we accept them. we must constantly exert effort to minimize the harm they do

because it's not really a war, it's a maintenance function



their stated violent ideology is the same. the violence is underground

when a black man dies mysteriously you expect them to write a letter to the editor of the local paper and go "oh, Fred Gallagher and Mitch Reardon, we killed Wilbur Oliver on November 13 in Shady Swamp. We just want to clear it up so no one thinks the KKK doesn't act the way it believes."

they keep it secret, to avoid punishment, and keep the fear and uncertainty going. that's why they cover their faces

they are a terrorist organization: they support violence to further racism. read what they believe. study what they have done. how much clearer do you need it?

what about those simple facts is confusing to you that you would actually believe an IDEOLOGICALLY STATED violent group like the KKK at their word "we uh hide our faces and have stated violence as our objective in secret... but naaah... we don't actually do what we say we should do, trust us"?

what kind of gullible moron trusts that?

i can't make you use your fucking brain. if you are going to trust a group that has a history of violence and secrecy and a stated ideology of violence and secrecy, you are beyond logic and reason
and then

&gt;because it's not really a war, it's a maintenance functionmorality is understandable by a kindergartener: don't do to others what you don't want done to yourself. the golden rule. that's all morality is. it's not complicated

&gt;there are basically infinite approaches to morality.

no, there's only one. treat others as you would want yourself treated. that's the root of all morality, it's universal
i understand what decriminalization means. there are idiots out there reading this who don't

**mandated, compulsory** healthcare instead of prison time is the important change here

the point is you don't get to do coke and heroin and you're free to go. but that's what some idiots believe decriminalization to mean

you are arguing

&gt;the merits of their brand of self-determination

does not exist

with the civil war, it was "the merits of their brand of tyranny"

the civil war was about the "right" to deny other people rights

the merits really is the issue here, not the method
there does not exist a form of morality that does not contain the golden rule

it's logically impossible

simply because any form of "morality" that does not contain that would not result in a functional society. basic human anture is fixed and basic rules about how humans function in groups leads to only one set of rules possible

i'm not talking about rules of fashion or etiquette, i'm talking about basic concepts like murder, rape, etc.

a sense of fairness and justice is essential to morality, period

oh i'm sure there's some weird philosophical mental masturbation about alternative realities. that's just random fan boy bullshit, not actual morality

it's like you're saying physics can exist without the basic laws of physics. yeah, maybe in science fiction, but that's not physics nor reality

ever since groog ate the fermenting berries and then slept all day instead of help with the hunt, humankind has understood drug use to be a problem

every society, since humankind began, has grappled with the effect of drugs and drug addiction. there is a large history of drug laws from every society past. what gave you this insane, completely False notion it's only a modern thing?

and drug addiction always will be a problem

because some people choose to do drugs then become useless and need to be taken care of. that's a drain on resources and a problem

it is a permanent problem of humanity that must be constantly minimized with constant effort, forever. a maintenance function. this problem will never go away and has always been with us


it is. it has logic and reason stemming from basic facts about human behavior and psychology

are you saying morality can exist without fairness and justice?

please tell me this morality without basic facts of human nature taken into account

with reciprocity, society can not function. you cannot trust people. if you cannot trust people, there is no civilization

this is not complicated. elementary school kids understand this

i think you're confusing edge cases, fluff cases, that is more culture than morality

i am talking about big simple moral thoughts: murder wrong. rape wrong. you get that right?

that place is obsessed with animal rights

i think you've fallen for the emperor's new clothes friend. morality isn't complicated
i know

you know

i am clarifying it because some idiots do not
then there's no argument. your previous comment about method rather than merit is counteracted by your current statement
well said
the KKK has a history of violence and its ideology calls for violence. they harm others

nevermind the fact that you cannot depend upon a freedom you want to deny others. that is when you lose your freedoms

everyone gets freedom. until they deny another person's freedom. then they get jail. that's how you maintain freedom

you can't just let people go around raping and murdering and expect freedom to reign
Congratulations on encouraging people to threaten murder to make money. Evil grows and spreads because of moral idiots like yourself.

You never ever give into violent demands. Because that's never the last one. In fact, it means you will have more vile demands. You are choosing to make things worse and for more people to die by rewarding evil douchebags for evil behavior. You are the problem in some ways more than them.the kkk never murdered anyone. okaaay, got it

and if you deny freedom: rape, murder, etc., you lose your freedom, you go to jail. this is a complicated concept for you?
you're splitting hairs. you do have a problem with the south seceding BECAUSE you have a problem with their reasons

nevermind: you are correct, we mostly agree, there's nothing to argue about. we just seem to be going back and forth on subtle nuance that doesn't amount to anything
its not complicated for elementary school kids: don't do to others what you don't want done to yourself. voila: the realization that is the spark of all morality

perhaps this simple concept is difficult for you
you're basically saying it's ok we have evil in the world because some people are spineless

i understand how and why the spineless let evil grow and continue, you understand it to

but i'm not going to accept it. neither should you
i could if their ideology hasn't changed and they still call for violence and now when it happens it's done secretly

i am certainly not going to believe an organization that has the same violent ideology is now magically squeaky clean. because i'm not stupid

are you? you trust the kkk, even though their violent ideology hasn't changed? why the fuck would you do that? do you think anyone is going to believe your lie, or are you yourself a gullible social retard?

that is the only way anyone can state that the kkk is peaceful:

1. gullible idiot
2. a liar themselves

stop trying to sell stupid. no one is buying
what complicated situation? go ahead, give me one

complicated edge cases are rare. 99% of moral questions we encounter on a daily basis are simple and refer to the simple concept that you shouldn't do to other people what you don't want done to yourself

give me an example of something that people encounter daily that can't be answered with the golden rule

go ahead

you can't

because it doesn't exist
i am being civil. i'm not being nice is what you mean

and i'm not interested in being nice. i'm not a politician nor a diplomat. if you say something stupid, i'll call you stupid

a policy of brutal honesty is better than placid lies, if truth is your goal. rather than simply playing nice for the empty sake of that

&gt;you come off as a bit of a belligerent kid

it also helps if you are able to follow your own advice exactly as you give it, or you come off as a hypocritical joke. you are me, more than you want to admit to yourself, even as i am 100% comfortable with who i am


i'm describing a tragedy

what i say is True about the effects of spinelessness on the proliferation of evil

even if i am spineless myself
i am anonymous

you are anonymous

the NSA can post as anonymous

it's called ANONYMOUS

you know what the word means, right?

you simply don't understand that what we are talking about is no one in particular and not organized in any way. calling them "they" is just a matter of the imprecision of language, because i am using that word to simply and concisely make my point, where "they" refers to the disorganized mass i am attempting to define for you, but you seem to fail to properly understand the nature of

&gt;integrity being an adherence to principles

what fucking principles are you fucking talking about? you are telling me they are basically anyone, and they have no organization. yet they magically possess some sort of agreed upon principles?
i would not expect someone to eat something i would not eat

the golden rule is adhered to, easily and simply

&gt;I think it would be rude to not eat something that someone has prepared for me

but that's not an imposition you are making

that's an imagined imposition you think someone else would be feeling

so you're at a second order reflection that doesn't even need to be referred to, to arrive at the simple and obvious moral decision

"how can you make simple and obvious moral decisions when i present to you these complicated mental gymnastics no one needs to do" is basically what you are presenting to me here

keep it simple stupid. KISS

you're overthinking it

Prove to me they don't do it. They have before. Their ideology is the same. Now you want me to believe they magically stopped. Who do you expect me to be so stupid?You're welcome for the glimpse of some self awareness, even though you dislike it. Your verbal gymnastics do not hide your word choice, nor intent.no, but the specific communist party that has done violence until very recently should be illegal, especially since its ideology and support for violence is unchanged. you are additionally a moron if you believe they are not still committing violence
you don't force someone to eat something they don't want to eat

what's the problem?

this overrides secondary reflections about what you think... someone should think... about what you're thinking... wtf?

you seem to be unable to squelch the noise in your head and you cannot locate the simple signal

a fifth grader gets this

you don't

you have issues with very simple concepts
It's not an ideology. It's an organization that committed violence, calls for continued violence, and continues to commit violence clandestinely. If anything, it continues to exist so the feds can monitor the shitbags. Make it illegal and they just keep committing their violence anyways, but harder to track. Flies to shit and all that.

But that doesn't mean I'm going to be a moron and make believe they have changed and are squeaky clean. For you to present that idea here makes you a gullible retard, or perhaps one of the lying violent assholes yourself.

Either way, stop selling stupid. No one is buying.My value system is 

murder wrong

Rape wrong

Other bone head fucking obvious points the whole fucking world agrees with.

There is no such thing as alternative moralities. There is simple right and wrong that springs as simple deductions from the golden rule. It's organic. It springs forth naturally from psychologically normal and normally socialized human groups reciprocating and cooperating.

Children understand it. If you can't agree with this or you have grave difficulty with the fucking obvious then maybe you have no morality. More likely though if this concept bothers you it reveals you to be just some socially maladroit weird crank, perhaos aspergers, nothing more.Fire is the chemical reaction itself. Heat is another product of the reaction.Yup, there's the catch.

With all battery tech you have to ask:

Is it stable?

Is it safe?

I hope they make progress, and the progress will have to include safety and stability studies and mitigations.

It's hard to pack that much energy density safely and stably. Not impossible, but hard.

It's not an ideology.

It's an organzation.

God you're dumb. You really think it's this platonic debate society? Do you know what they actually fucking talk about? And none of them do anything about it? They seek, desire, and agitate for violent racism... but they're all peaceful. Yeah right. Ignore their history. Ignore their words. Nobody is this stupid. Except maybe you.

Thank God for all the Feds watching and inflitrating, the only reason to let the KKK continue existing: attract the shitflies to shit, keep tabs on all the violent racist assholes.Morality is a natural product of normally socialized psychologically normal human beings. If you dont want it done to you don't do it to someone else. Check that concept every time you interact with another human being, and you're a moral person.

They don't need to consult philosophy books. No one does this. No one needs to do this. Why is this extremely simple idea so hard for you? I really wonder about you. You may have a social or psychological defect. I'm not insulting you, I'm looking for reasons why the obvious is so difficult for you.You know what kind of battery tech sauron needed to get those kind of powers in a small ring???why should we pay all that money for their continued existence?

maybe work camps. put them to some use

f you say that makes me pro slavery, you are making a judgment of my words without considering